 UNDER A PROPOSAL by Democrats to expand Individual Retirement Accounts, a $2,000 contribution by a taxpayer in the 33% bracket would save $330 on his taxes.  The savings was given incorrectly in Friday's edition.  (See: "Politics & Policy: Debate on IRAs Centers on Whether Tax Break Should Be Immediate or Put Off Till Retirement" -- WSJ Oct. 27, 1989)  In what could prove a major addition to the Philippines' foreign-investment portfolio, a Taiwanese company signed a $180 million construction contract to build the centerpiece of a planned petrochemical complex.  Taiwan's USI Far East Corp., a petrochemical company, initialed the agreement with an unidentified Japanese contractor to build a naphtha cracker, according to Alson Lee, who heads the Philippine company set up to build and operate the complex.  Mr. Lee, president of Luzon Petrochemical Corp., said the contract was signed Wednesday in Tokyo with USI Far East officials.  Contract details, however, haven't been made public.  The complex is to be located in Batangas, about 70 miles south of Manila.  USI Far East will hold a 60% stake in Luzon Petrochemical, according to papers signed with the Philippine government's Board of Investments.  The proposed petrochemical plant would use naphtha to manufacture the petrochemicals propylene and ethylene and their resin derivatives, polypropylene and polyethylene.  These are the raw materials used in making plastics.  The contract signing represented a major step in the long-planned petrochemical project.  At an estimated $360 million, the project would represent the single largest foreign investment in the Philippines since President Corazon Aquino took office in February 1986.  It also is considered critical to the country's efforts to both attract other investment from Taiwan and raise heavy industry capabilities.  The project has been in and out of the pipeline for more than a decade.  However, workers can't break ground until legal maneuvers to block the complex are resolved, moves which caused the signing to remain questionable up to the last moment.  As previously reported, a member of the Philippines' House of Representatives has sued to stop the plant.  The legislator, Enrique Garcia, had actively backed the plant, but at the original site in his constituency northwest of Manila.  The country's Supreme Court dismissed the suit, but Mr. Garcia late last month filed for a reconsideration.  In addition, President Aquino has yet to sign into law a bill removing a stiff 48% tax on naphtha, the principal raw material to be used in the cracker.  However, at a news conference Thursday, Mrs. Aquino backed the project and said her government was attempting to soothe the feelings of residents at the original site, adjacent to the government's major petroleum refinery in Bataan province.  "We have tried our best to tell the people in Bataan that maybe this time it will not go to them, but certainly we will do our best to encourage other investors to go to their province," Mrs. Aquino told Manila-based foreign correspondents.  The project appeared to be on the rocks earlier this month when the other major partner in the project, China General Plastics Corp., backed out.  China General Plastics, another Taiwanese petrochemical manufacturer, was to have a 40% stake in Luzon Petrochemical.  However, Mr. Lee said that USI Far East is confident other investors will take up the slack.  He said USI Far East has applied to both the Asian Development Bank and the World Bank's International Finance Corp. for financing that could include equity stakes.  Three new issues begin trading on the New York Stock Exchange today, and one began trading on the Nasdaq/National Market System last week.  On the Big Board, Crawford & Co., Atlanta, (CFD) begins trading today.  Crawford evaluates health care plans, manages medical and disability aspects of worker's compensation injuries and is involved in claims adjustments for insurance companies.  Also beginning trading today on the Big Board are El Paso Refinery Limited Partnership, El Paso, Texas, (ELP) and Franklin Multi-Income Trust, San Mateo, Calif., (FMI).  El Paso owns and operates a petroleum refinery.  Franklin is a closed-end management investment company.  On the Nasdaq over-the-counter system, Allied Capital Corp., Washington, D.C., (ALII) began trading last Thursday.  Allied Capital is a closed-end management investment company that will operate as a business development concern.  THE YALE POLITICAL UNION doesn't pay an honorarium to speakers.  In Thursday's edition, it was incorrectly indicated that the union had paid a fee to former House Speaker Jim Wright.  (See: "In Nation's Capital, Scandal Needn't Cut One's Speaking Fee --- Jim Wright, Michael Deaver and Host of Others Find Careers After Disgrace" -- WSJ Oct. 26, 1989)  President Bush insists it would be a great tool for curbing the budget deficit and slicing the lard out of government programs.  He wants it now.  Not so fast, says Rep. Mickey Edwards of Oklahoma, a fellow Republican.  "I consider it one of the stupidest ideas of the 20th century," he says.  It's the line-item veto, a procedure that would allow the president to kill individual items in a big spending bill passed by Congress without vetoing the entire bill.  Whatever one thinks of the idea, it's far more than the budgetary gimmick it may seem at first glance.  Rather, it's a device that could send shock waves through the president's entire relationship with Democrats and Republicans alike in Congress, fundamentally enhance the power of the presidency and transform the way the government does its business.  President Bush badly wants a line-item veto and has long called for a law giving it to the president.  Now the White House is declaring that he might not rely on Congress -- which hasn't shown any willingness to surrender such authority -- to pass the line-item veto law he seeks.  White House spokesmen last week said Mr. Bush is considering simply declaring that the Constitution gives him the power, exercising a line-item veto and inviting a court challenge to decide whether he has the right.  Although that may sound like an arcane maneuver of little interest outside Washington, it would set off a political earthquake.  "The ramifications are enormous," says Rep. Don Edwards, a California Democrat who is a senior member of the House Judiciary Committee.  "It's a real face-to-face arm wrestling challenge to Congress."  White House aides know it's a step that can't be taken lightly -- and for that reason, the president may back down from launching a test case this year.  Some senior advisers argue that with further fights over a capital-gains tax cut and a budget-reduction bill looming, Mr. Bush already has enough pending confrontations with Congress.  They prefer to put off the line-item veto until at least next year.  Still, Mr. Bush and some other aides are strongly drawn to the idea of trying out a line-item veto.  The issue arose last week when Vice President Dan Quayle told an audience in Chicago that Mr. Bush was looking for a test case.  White House Press Secretary Marlin Fitzwater confirmed that Mr. Bush was interested in the idea, but cautioned that there wasn't a firm decision to try it.  Mr. Bush, former President Reagan and a host of conservative activists have been arguing that a line-item veto would go a long way in restoring discipline to the budget process.  They maintain that a president needs the ability to surgically remove pork-barrel spending projects that are attached to big omnibus spending bills.  Those bills can't easily be vetoed in their entirety because they often are needed to keep the government operating.  Conservatives note that 43 governors have the line-item veto to use on state budgets.  More provocatively, some conservative legal theorists have begun arguing that Mr. Bush doesn't need to wait for a law giving him the veto because the power already is implicit in the Constitution.  They base their argument on a clause buried in Article I, Section 7, of the Constitution that states: "Every order, resolution, or vote to which the concurrence of the Senate and House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the same shall take effect, shall be approved by him or . . . disapproved by him. . . ."   This clause, they argue, is designed to go beyond an earlier clause specifying that the president can veto a "bill," and is broad enough to allow him to strike out items and riders within bills.  Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole (R., Kan.), for one, accepts this argument and earlier this year publicly urged Mr. Bush "to use the line-item veto and allow the courts to decide whether or not it is constitutional."  There's little doubt that such a move would be immediately challenged in court -- and that it would quickly make its way to the Supreme Court to be ultimately resolved.  "It's a major issue, and they wouldn't want to leave it at a lower level," says Stephen Glazier, a New York attorney whose writings have been instrumental in pushing the idea that a president already has a line-item veto.  Rep. Edwards, the California Democrat, is one who pledges that he would immediately challenge Mr. Bush in the courts, arguing a line-item veto would expand a president's powers far beyond anything the framers of the Constitution had in mind.  "It puts this president in the legislative business," he declares.  "That's not what our fathers had in mind."  In addition to giving a president powers to rewrite spending bills meant to be written in Congress, Rep. Edwards argues, a line-item veto would allow the chief executive to blackmail lawmakers.  He notes that, as a lawmaker from the San Francisco area, he fights each year to preserve federal funds for the Bay Area Rapid Transit system.  If a president had a line-item veto and wanted to force him to support a controversial foreign-policy initiative, Rep. Edwards says, the president could call and declare that he would single-handedly kill the BART funds unless the congressman "shapes up" on the foreign-policy issue.  Proponents maintain that a president would choose to use a line-item veto more judiciously than that.  But there may be another problem with the device: Despite all the political angst it would cause, it mightn't be effective in cutting the deficit.  Big chunks of the government budget, like the entitlement programs of Social Security and Medicare, wouldn't be affected.  Governors have found that they have to use the device sparingly to maintain political comity.  And it isn't even clear that some pork-barrel projects can be hit with a line-item veto because they tend to be listed in informal conference reports accompanying spending bills rather than in the official bills themselves.  Still, proponents contend that the veto would have what Mr. Glazier calls an important "chilling effect" on all manner of appropriations bills.  Lawmakers, they say, would avoid putting many spending projects into legislation in the first place for fear of the embarrassment of having them singled out for a line-item veto later.  Whatever the outcome of a test case, President Bush would have to move cautiously becase the very attempt would "antagonize not just Democrats but Republicans," says Louis Fisher, a scholar at the Congressional Research Service who specializes in executive-legislative relations.  Republicans have as much interest as Democrats in "the way the system works," he notes.  Indeed, although a majority of Republican lawmakers favor a line-item veto, some, ranging from liberal Oregon Sen. Mark Hatfield to conservative Rep. Edwards are opposed.  Rep. Edwards voices the traditional conservative view that it's a mistake to put too much power in the hands of a single person.  Conservatives pushing for a line-item veto now, he notes, may regret it later: "Sometime, you're going to have a Democratic president again" who'll use his expanded powers against those very same conservatives.  ---  @ In Search of a Line-Item Veto  "Every order, resolution, or vote to which the concurrence of the Senate and House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the same shall take effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall be repassed by two-thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according to the rules and limitations prescribed in the case of a bill."  -- The Constitution, Article I, Section 7, Clause 3  This hasn't been Kellogg Co.'s year.  The oat-bran craze has cost the world's largest cereal maker market share.  The company's president quit suddenly.  And now Kellogg is indefinitely suspending work on what was to be a $1 billion cereal plant.  The company said it was delaying construction because of current market conditions.  But the Memphis, Tenn., facility wasn't to begin turning out product until 1993, so the decision may reveal a more pessimistic long-term outlook as well.  Kellogg, which hasn't been as successful in capitalizing on the public's health-oriented desire for oat bran as rival General Mills Inc., has been losing share in the $6 billion ready-to-eat cereal market.  Kellogg's current share is believed to be slightly under 40% while General Mills' share is about 27%.  Led by its oat-based Cheerios line, General Mills has gained an estimated 2% share so far this year, mostly at the expense of Kellogg.  Each share point is worth about $60 million in sales.  Analysts say much of Kellogg's erosion has been in such core brands as Corn Flakes, Rice Krispies and Frosted Flakes, which represent nearly one-third of its sales volume.  Kellogg is so anxious to turn around Corn Flakes sales that it soon will begin selling boxes for as little as 99 cents, trade sources say.  "Cheerios and Honey Nut Cheerios have eaten away sales normally going to Kellogg's corn-based lines simply because they are made of oats," says Merrill Lynch food analyst William Maguire.  "They are not a happy group of people at Battle Creek right now."  Kellogg is based in Battle Creek, Mich., a city that calls itself the breakfast capital of the world.  Another analyst, John C. Maxwell Jr. of Wheat, First Securities in Richmond, Va., recently went to a "sell" recommendation on Kellogg stock, which closed Friday at $71.75, down 75 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  "I don't think Kellogg can get back to 40% this year," he said.  "Kellogg's main problem is life style.  People are reading the boxes and deciding they want something that's `healthy' for you -- oats, bran."  Mr. Maxwell said he wouldn't be surprised if, over the next two years or so, General Mills' share increased to 30% or more.  In announcing the plant delay, Kellogg Chairman William E. LaMothe said, "Cereal volume growth in the U.S. has not met our expectations for 1989."  He said construction wouldn't resume until market conditions warrant it.  Kellogg indicated that it has room to grow without adding facilities.  The company has five other U.S. plants, including a modern facility at its Battle Creek headquarters known as Building 100, which is to add bran-processing and rice-processing capacity next year.  General Mills, meanwhile, finds itself constrained from boosting sales further because its plants are operating at capacity.  A large plant in Covington, Ga., is to come on line next year.  A Kellogg officer, who asked not to be named, said the Memphis project was "pulled in for a reconsideration of costs," an indication that the ambitious plans might be scaled back in any future construction.  Initial cost estimates for the plant, which was to have been built in phases, ranged from $1 billion to $1.2 billion.  A company spokesman said it was "possible, but highly unlikely," that the plant might never be built.  "As we regain our leadership level where we have been, and as we continue to put new products into the marketplace and need additional capacity, we will look at resuming our involvement with our plan," he said.  The new facility was to have been the world's most advanced cereal manufacturing plant, and Kellogg's largest construction project.  The company had retained the Fluor Daniel unit of Fluor Corp. as general contractor.  But in recent weeks, construction-industry sources reported that early preparation work was slowing at the 185-acre site.  Subcontractors said they were told that equipment orders would be delayed.  Fluor Daniel already has reassigned most of its work crew, the sources said.  Last Friday's announcement was the first official word that the project was in trouble and that the company's plans for a surge in market share may have been overly optimistic.  Until recently, Kellogg had been telling its sales force and Wall Street that by 1992 it intended to achieve a 50% share of market, measured in dollar volume.  Although he called current market conditions "highly competitive," Mr. LaMothe, Kellogg's chairman and chief executive officer, forecast an earnings increase for the full year.  Last year, the company earned $480.4 million, or $3.90 a share, on sales of $4.3 billion.  As expected, Kellogg reported lower third-quarter earnings.  Net fell 16% to $123.1 million, or $1.02 a share, from $145.7 million, or $1.18 a share.  Sales rose 4.8% to $1.20 billion from $1.14 billion.  The company had a one-time charge of $14.8 million in the latest quarter covering the disposition of certain assets.  The company wouldn't elaborate, citing competitive reasons.  PARKER HANNIFIN Corp., which is selling three automotive replacement parts divisions, said it will retain its Automotive Connectors and Cliff Impact divisions.  The divisions that Parker Hannifin is retaining weren't mentioned in Thursday's edition.  (See: "Parker Hannifin Sale" -- WSJ Oct. 26, 1989)  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Sun Microsystems Inc. -- $125 million of 6 3/8% convertible subordinated debentures due Oct. 15, 1999, priced at 84.90 to yield 7.51%.  The debentures are convertible into common stock at $25 a share, representing a 24% conversion premium over Thursday's closing price.  Rated single-B-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Hertz Corp. -- $100 million of senior notes due Nov. 1, 2009, priced at par to yield 9%.  The issue, which is puttable back to the company in 1999, was priced at a spread of 110 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated single-A-3 by Moody's and triple-B by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ EUROBONDS  Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (Canada) -- 10 billion yen of 5.7% bonds due Nov. 17, 1992, priced at 101 1/4 to yield 5.75% less full fees, via LTCB International Ltd. Fees 1 3/8.  The Singapore and Kuala Lumpur stock exchanges are bracing for a turbulent separation, following Malaysian Finance Minister Daim Zainuddin's long-awaited announcement that the exchanges will sever ties.  On Friday, Datuk Daim added spice to an otherwise unremarkable address on Malaysia's proposed budget for 1990 by ordering the Kuala Lumpur Stock Exchange "to take appropriate action immediately" to cut its links with the Stock Exchange of Singapore.  The delisting of Malaysian-based companies from the Singapore exchange may not be a smooth process, analysts say.  Though the split has long been expected, the exchanges aren't fully prepared to go their separate ways.  The finance minister's order wasn't sparked by a single event and doesn't indicate a souring in relations between the neighboring countries.  Rather, the two closely linked exchanges have been drifting apart for some years, with a nearly five-year-old moratorium on new dual listings, separate and different listing requirements, differing trading and settlement guidelines and diverging national-policy aims.  QUANTUM CHEMICAL Corp.'s plant in Morris, Ill., is expected to resume production in early 1990.  The year was misstated in Friday's editions.  (See: "Dividend News: Payout Stalled at Quantum Chemical Corp. --- Firm Posts Quarterly Loss, Plans a Stock Dividend to Take Place of Cash" -- WSJ Oct. 27, 1989)  Italy's trade deficit narrowed to 2.007 trillion lire ($1.49 billion) in September from 2.616 trillion lire a year earlier, the state statistical office Istat said.  The deficit was 466 billion lire in August.  For the first nine months, the trade deficit was 14.933 trillion lire, compared with 10.485 trillion lire in the year-earlier period.  Istat said the statistics are provisional and aren't seasonally adjusted.  Imports rose 11% to 18.443 trillion lire in September from a year earlier, while exports rose 17% to 16.436 trillion lire.  In the nine months, imports rose 20% to 155.039 trillion lire, while exports grew 18% to 140.106 trillion lire.  Import values are calculated on a cost, insurance and freight (c.i.f.) basis, while exports are accounted for on a free-on-board (f.o.b.) basis.  As competition heats up in Spain's crowded bank market, Banco Exterior de Espana is seeking to shed its image of a state-owned bank and move into new activities.  Under the direction of its new chairman, Francisco Luzon, Spain's seventh largest bank is undergoing a tough restructuring that analysts say may be the first step toward the bank's privatization.  The state-owned industrial holding company Instituto Nacional de Industria and the Bank of Spain jointly hold a 13.94% stake in Banco Exterior.  The government directly owns 51.4% and Factorex, a financial services company, holds 8.42%.  The rest is listed on Spanish stock exchanges.  Some analysts are concerned, however, that Banco Exterior may have waited too long to diversify from its traditional export-related activities.  Catching up with commercial competitors in retail banking and financial services, they argue, will be difficult, particularly if market conditions turn sour.  If that proves true, analysts say Banco Exterior could be a prime partner -- or even a takeover target -- for either a Spanish or foreign bank seeking to increase its market share after 1992, when the European Community plans to dismantle financial barriers.  With 700 branches in Spain and 12 banking subsidiaries, five branches and 12 representative offices abroad, the Banco Exterior group has a lot to offer a potential suitor.  Mr. Luzon and his team, however, say they aren't interested in a merger.  Instead, they are working to transform Banco Exterior into an efficient bank by the end of 1992.  "I want this to be a model of the way a public-owned company should be run," Mr. Luzon says.  Banco Exterior was created in 1929 to provide subsidized credits for Spanish exports.  The market for export financing was liberalized in the mid-1980s, however, forcing the bank to face competition.  At the same time, many of Spain's traditional export markets in Latin America and other developing areas faced a sharp decline in economic growth.  As a result, the volume of Banco Exterior's export credit portfolio plunged from 824 billion pesatas ($7.04 billion) as of Dec. 31, 1986, to its current 522 billion pesetas.  The other two main pillars of Banco Exterior's traditional business -- wholesale banking and foreign currency trading -- also began to crumble under the weight of heavy competition and changing client needs.  The bank was hamstrung in its efforts to face the challenges of a changing market by its links to the government, analysts say.  Until Mr. Luzon took the helm last November, Banco Exterior was run by politicians who lacked either the skills or the will to introduce innovative changes.  But Mr. Luzon has moved swiftly to streamline bureaucracy, cut costs, increase capital and build up new areas of business.  "We've got a lot to do," he acknowledged.  "We've got to move quickly."  In Mr. Luzon's first year, the bank eliminated 800 jobs.  Now it says it'll trim another 1,200 jobs over the next three to four years.  The bank employs 8,000 people in Spain and 2,000 abroad.  To strengthen its capital base, Banco Exterior this year issued $105 million in subordinated debt, launched two rights issues and sold stock held in its treasury to small investors.  The bank is now aggressively marketing retail services at its domestic branches.  Last year's drop in export credit was partially offset by a 15% surge in lending to individuals and small and medium-sized companies.  Though Spain has an excess of banks, analysts say the country still has one of the most profitable markets in Europe, which will aid Banco Exterior with the tough tasks it faces ahead.  Expansion plans also include acquisitions in growing foreign markets.  The bank says it's interested in purchasing banks in Morocco, Portugal and Puerto Rico.  But the bank's retail activities in Latin America are likely to be cut back.  Banco Exterior was one of the last banks to create a brokerage house before the four Spanish stock exchanges underwent sweeping changes in July.  The late start may be a handicap for the bank as Spain continues to open up its market to foreign competition.  But Mr. Luzon contends that the experienced team he brought with him from Banco Bilbao Vizcaya, where he was formerly director general, will whip the bank's capital market division into shape by the end of 1992.  The bank also says it'll use its international network to channel investment from London, Frankfurt, Zurich and Paris into the Spanish stock exchanges.  General Motors Corp.'s general counsel hopes to cut the number of outside law firms the auto maker uses from about 700 to 200 within two years.  Harry J. Pearce, named general counsel in May 1987, says the reduction is a cost-cutting measure and an effort to let the No. 1 auto maker's 134-lawyer in-house legal department take on matters it is better equipped and trained to handle.  GM trimmed about 40 firms from its approved local counsel list, Mr. Pearce says.  The move is consistent with a trend for corporate legal staffs to do more work in-house, instead of farming it out to law firms.  Mr. Pearce set up GM's first in-house litigation group in May with four lawyers, all former assistant U.S. attorneys with extensive trial experience.  He intends to add to the litigation staff.  Among the types of cases the in-house litigators handle are disputes involving companies doing business with GM and product-related actions, including one in which a driver is suing GM for damages resulting from an accident.  Mr. Pearce has also encouraged his staff to work more closely with GM's technical staffs to help prevent future litigation.  GM lawyers have been working with technicians to develop more uniform welding procedures -- the way a vehicle is welded has a lot to do with its durability.  The lawyers also monitor suits to identify specific automobile parts that cause the biggest legal problems.  Mr. Pearce says law firms with the best chance of retaining or winning business with GM will be those providing the highest-quality service at the best cost -- echoing similar directives from GM's auto operations to suppliers.  This doesn't necessarily mean larger firms have an advantage; Mr. Pearce said GM works with a number of smaller firms it regards highly.  Mr. Pearce has shaken up GM's legal staff by eliminating all titles and establishing several new functions, including a special-projects group that has made films on safety and drunk driving.  ---  FEDERAL PROSECUTORS are concluding fewer criminal cases with trials.  That's a finding of a new study of the Justice Department by researchers at Syracuse University.  David Burnham, one of the authors, says fewer trials probably means a growing number of plea bargains.  In 1980, 18% of federal prosecutions concluded at trial; in 1987, only 9% did.  The study covered 11 major U.S. attorneys' offices -- including those in Manhattan and Brooklyn, N.Y., and New Jersey -- from 1980 to 1987.  The Justice Department rejected the implication that its prosecutors are currently more willing to plea bargain.  "Our felony caseloads have been consistent for 20 years," with about 15% of all prosecutions going to trial, a department spokeswoman said.  The discrepancy is somewhat perplexing in that the Syracuse researchers said they based their conclusions on government statistics.  "One possible explanation for this decline" in taking cases to trial, says Mr. Burnham, "is that the number of defendants being charged with crimes by all U.S. attorneys has substantially increased."  In 1980, the study says, prosecutors surveyed filed charges against 25 defendants for each 100,000 people aged 18 years and older.  In 1987, prosecutors filed against 35 defendants for every 100,000 adults.  Another finding from the study: Prosecutors set significantly different priorities.  The Manhattan U.S. attorney's office stressed criminal cases from 1980 to 1987, averaging 43 for every 100,000 adults.  But the New Jersey U.S. attorney averaged 16.  On the civil side, the Manhattan prosecutor filed an average of only 11 cases for every 100,000 adults during the same period; the San Francisco U.S. attorney averaged 79.  The study is to provide reporters, academic experts and others raw data on which to base further inquiries.  ---  IMELDA MARCOS asks for dismissal, says she was kidnapped.  The former first lady of the Philippines, asked a federal court in Manhattan to dismiss an indictment against her, claiming among other things, that she was abducted from her homeland.  Mrs. Marcos and her late husband, former Philippines President Ferdinand Marcos, were charged with embezzling more than $100 million from that country and then fraudulently concealing much of the money through purchases of prime real estate in Manhattan.  Mrs. Marcos's attorneys asked federal Judge John F. Keenan to give them access to all U.S. documents about her alleged abduction.  The U.S. attorney's office, in documents it filed in response, said Mrs. Marcos was making the "fanciful -- and factually unsupported -- claim that she was kidnapped into this country" in order to obtain classified material in the case.  The office also said Mrs. Marcos and her husband weren't brought to the U.S. against their will after Mr. Marcos was ousted as president.  The prosecutor quoted statements from the Marcoses in which they said they were in this country at the invitation of President Reagan and that they were enjoying the hospitality of the U.S.  Lawyers for Mrs. Marcos say that because she was taken to the U.S. against her wishes, the federal court lacks jurisdiction in the case.  ---  THE FEDERAL COURT of appeals in Manhattan ruled that the dismissal of a 1980 indictment against former Bank of Crete owner George Koskotas should be reconsidered.  The indictment, which was sealed and apparently forgotten by investigators until 1987, charges Mr. Koskotas and three others with tax fraud and other violations.  He made numerous trips to the U.S. in the early 1980s, but wasn't arrested until 1987 when he showed up as a guest of then-Vice President George Bush at a government function.  A federal judge in Manhattan threw out the indictment, finding that the seven-year delay violated the defendant's constitutional right to a speedy trial.  The appeals court, however, said the judge didn't adequately consider whether the delay would actually hurt the chances of a fair trial.  Mr. Koskotas is fighting extradition proceedings that would return him to Greece, where he is charged with embezzling more than $250 million from the Bank of Crete.  His attorney couldn't be reached for comment.  ---  PRO BONO VOLUNTARISM: In an effort to stave off a plan that would require all lawyers in New York state to provide twenty hours of free legal aid a year, the state bar recommended an alternative program to increase voluntary participation in pro bono programs.  The state bar association's policy making body, the House of Delegate, voted Saturday to ask Chief Judge Sol Wachtler to give the bar's voluntary program three years to prove its effectiveness before considering mandatory pro bono.  "We believe our suggested plan is more likely to improve the availability of quality legal service to the poor than is the proposed mandatory pro bono plan and will achieve that objective without the divisiveness, distraction, administrative burdens and possible failure that we fear would accompany an attempt to impose a mandatory plan," said Justin L. Vigdor of Rochester, who headed the bar's pro bono study committee.  ---  DALLAS AND HOUSTON law firms merge: Jackson & Walker, a 130-lawyer firm in Dallas and Datson & Scofield, a 70-lawyer firm in Houston said they have agreed in principle to merge.  The consolidated firm, which would rank among the 10 largest in Texas, would operate under the name Jackson & Walker.  The merger must be formally approved by the partners of both firms but is expected to be completed by year end.  Jackson & Walker has an office in Fort Worth, Texas, and Dotson & Scofield has an office in New Orleans.  ---  PILING ON?  Piggybacking on government assertions that General Electric Co. may have covered up fraudulent billings to the Pentagon, two shareholders have filed a civil racketeering suit against the company.  The suit was filed by plaintiffs' securities lawyer Richard D. Greenfield in U.S. District Court in Philadelphia.  He seeks damages from the company's 15 directors on grounds that they either "participated in or condoned the illegal acts . . . or utterly failed to carry out their duties as directors."  GE is defending itself against government criminal charges of fraud and false claims in connection with a logistics-computer contract for the Army.  The trial begins today in federal court in Philadelphia.  The government's assertions of the cover-up were made in last minute pretrial motions.  GE, which vehemently denies the government's allegations, denounced Mr. Greenfield's suit.  "It is a cheap-shot suit -- procedurally defective and thoroughly fallacious -- which was hurriedly filed by a contingency-fee lawyer as a result of newspaper reports," said a GE spokeswoman.  She added that the company was considering bringing sanctions against Mr. Greenfield for making "grossly inaccurate and unsupported allegations."  The head of the nation's largest car-dealers group is telling dealers to "just say no" when auto makers pressure them to stockpile cars on their lots.  In an open letter that will run today in the trade journal Automotive News, Ron Tonkin, president of the National Car Dealers Association, says dealers should cut their inventories to no more than half the level traditionally considered desirable.  Mr. Tonkin, who has been feuding with the Big Three since he took office earlier this year, said that with half of the nation's dealers losing money or breaking even, it was time for "emergency action."  U.S. car dealers had an average of 59 days' supply of cars in their lots at the end of September, according to Ward's Automotive Reports.  But Mr. Tonkin said dealers should slash stocks to between 15 and 30 days to reduce the costs of financing inventory.  His message is getting a chilly reception in Detroit, where the Big Three auto makers are already being forced to close plants because of soft sales and reduced dealer orders.  Even before Mr. Tonkin's broadside, some large dealers said they were cutting inventories.  Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp. representatives criticized Mr. Tonkin's plan as unworkable.  It "is going to sound neat to the dealer except when his 15-day car supply doesn't include the bright red one that the lady wants to buy and she goes up the street to buy one," a Chrysler spokesman said.  Southern Co.'s Gulf Power Co. unit may plead guilty this week to charges that it illegally steered company money to politicians through outside vendors, according to individuals close to an investigation of the utility holding company.  The tentative settlement between Gulf Power, a Pensacola, Fla., electric company, and federal prosecutors would mark the end of one part of a wide-ranging inquiry of Southern Co. in the past year.  A grand jury has been investigating whether officials at Southern Co. conspired to cover up their accounting for spare parts to evade federal income taxes.  The grand jury has also been investigating whether Gulf Power executives violated the federal Utility Holding Company Act, which prohibits certain utilities from making political contributions.  The individuals said Gulf Power and federal prosecutors are considering a settlement under which the company would plead guilty to two felony charges and pay fines totaling between $500,000 and $1.5 million.  Under one count, Gulf Power would plead guilty to conspiring to violate the Utility Holding Company Act.  Under the second count, the company would plead guilty to conspiring to evade taxes.  The guilty pleas would be made solely by Gulf Power, the individuals said.  No employee or vendor would be involved.  A spokesman for Southern Co. would say only that discussions are continuing between Gulf Power and federal prosecutors.  "We have no further developments to report," he said.  Officials at Gulf Power couldn't be reached for comment.  And prosecutors declined to comment.  While Southern Co. has been reluctant to discuss the grand jury investigations, Edward L. Addison, chief executive officer, has said the company is prepared to defend its tax and acccounting practices if any charges are brought against it.  Morever, Mr. Addison has said Southern Co. and its units don't condone illegal political contributions.  Neither Mr. Addison nor any other Southern Co. official has been charged with any wrongdoing in connection with the current inquiries.  The probe of Southern Co. has attracted considerable attention this year because of several events that have befallen the company, including the death of a Gulf Power executive in a plane crash and the disappearance of a company vendor who was to be a key grand jury witness.  Witnesses have said the grand jury has asked numerous questions about Jacob F. "Jake" Horton, the senior vice president of Gulf Power who died in the plane crash in April.  Mr. Horton oversaw Gulf Power's governmental-affairs efforts.  On the morning of the crash, he had been put on notice that an audit committee was recommending his dismissal because of invoicing irregularities in a company audit.  Investigators have been trying to determine whether the crash was an accident, sabotage or suicide.  Gulf Power said in May that an internal audit had disclosed that at least one vendor had used false invoices to fund political causes.  But the company said the political contributions had been made more than five years ago.  Exxon Corp. is resigning from the National Wildlife Federation's corporate advisory panel, saying the conservation group has been unfairly critical of the Exxon Valdez oil spill along the Alaskan coast.  The federation said Friday that it regrets the resignation, but issued a stinging response that called Exxon a "corporate pariah" that should keep an open dialogue with environmentalists.  The federation, with 5.8 million members nationwide, has been one of the sharpest critics of Exxon's handling of the 11 million gallon tanker spill and has accused the company of repeatedly ignoring requests to meet and discuss it.  The March 24 oil spill soiled hundreds of miles of shoreline along Alaska's southern coast and wreaked havoc with wildlife and the fishing industry.  Exxon's Exxon USA unit was one of the charter members of the Corporate Conservation Council, a panel of executives formed in 1982 by the National Wildlife Federation to foster "frank and open discussions" between industry and the federation's leaders.  In a letter to the federation, Raymond Campion, Exxon's environmental coordinator, said: "Recent public actions by you regarding the Valdez oil spill have failed to demonstrate any sense of objectivity or fairness."  The federation was among the plaintiffs in a lawsuit filed in August against Exxon seeking full payment of environmental recovery costs from the spill.  First Tennessee National Corp. said it would take a $4 million charge in the fourth quarter, as a result of plans to expand its systems operation.  The banking company said it reached an agreement in principle with International Business Machines Corp. on a systems operations contract calling for IBM to operate First Tennessee's computer and telecommunications functions.  Further, under the agreement, First Tennesse would continue to develop the software that creates customer products and sevices.  "Because personal computers will soon be on the desks of all of our tellers, and customer service and loan representatives, information will be instantly available to help customers with product decisions and provide them with information about their accounts," according to John Kelley, executive vice president and corporate services group manager at First Tennessee.  However, about 120 employees will be affected by the agreement.  First Tennessee, assisted by IBM, said it will attempt to place the employees within the company, IBM or other companies in Memphis.  The process will take as many as six months to complete, the company said.  The agreement is subject to the banking company's board approval, which is expected next month.  The Treasury Department said the U.S. trade deficit may worsen next year, after two years of significant improvement.  In its report to Congress on international economic policies, the Treasury said that any improvement in the broadest measure of trade, known as the current account, "is likely at best to be very modest," and "the possibility of deterioration in the current account next year cannot be excluded."  The statement was the U.S. government's first acknowledgement of what other groups, such as the International Monetary Fund, have been predicting for months.  Continued strength in the dollar was cited as one reason the trade position may deteriorate.  The Treasury's report, which is required annually by a provision of the 1988 trade act, again took South Korea to task for its exchange-rate policies.  "We believe that there have continued to be indications of exchange-rate `manipulation'" during the past six months, it said, citing the lack of market forces in South Korea's exchange-rate system and the use of capital and interest-rate controls to manipulate exchange rates.  The Treasury expressed pleasure, however, with the government of Taiwan, which was cited for exchange-rate manipulation in last year's report.  The Treasury said Taiwan has liberalized its exchange rate system in the past year.  The fiscal 1989 budget deficit figure came out Friday.  It was down a little.  The next time you hear a Member of Congress moan about the deficit, consider what Congress did Friday.  The Senate, 84-6, voted to increase to $124,000 the ceiling on insured mortgages from the FHA, which lost $4.2 billion in loan defaults last year.  Then, by voice vote, the Senate voted a pork-barrel bill, approved Thursday by the House, for domestic military construction.  Compare the Bush request to what the Senators gave themselves:  For construction in West Virginia, Mr. Bush requested $4.5 million; Congress gave Senator Byrd's state $21.5 million.  Senator Byrd is chairman of the Appropriations Committee.  For Iowa, a $1.8 million request became $12 million for Senator Grassley, ranking minority member of a military construction subcommittee.  Rep. Jamie Whitten of Mississippi and chairman of House Appropriations turned a $20 million Bush request for his state into a $49.7 million bequest.  Senator Sasser of Tennessee is chairman of the Appropriations subcommittee on military construction; Mr. Bush's $87 million request for Tennessee increased to $109 million.  In a remark someone should remember this time next year, Senator Sasser said, "I think we've seen the peak of military construction spending for many years to come."  Tell us about spending restraint.  Tell us about the HUD scandals.  Tell us what measure, short of house arrest, will get this Congress under control.  Costa Rica reached an agreement with its creditor banks that is expected to cut that government's $1.8 billion in bank debt by as much as 60%.  The agreement was announced by Costa Rican President Oscar Arias Friday, as President Bush and other leaders from the Western Hemisphere gathered in the Central American nation for a celebration of democracy.  Costa Rica had been negotiating with the U.S. and other banks for three years, but the debt plan was rushed to completion in order to be announced at the meeting.  The government had fallen $300 million behind in interest payments.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady called the agreement "an important step forward in the strengthened debt strategy," noting that it will "when implemented, provide significant reduction in the level of debt and debt service owed by Costa Rica."  Under the plan, Costa Rica will buy back roughly 60% of its bank debt outstanding at a deeply discounted price, according to officials involved in the agreement.  The remainder of the debt will be exchanged for new Costa Rican bonds with a 6 1/4% interest rate.  The International Monetary Fund and the World Bank are expected to provide approximately $180 million to help support the deal, and additional funds are expected from Japan.  Treasury officials say the Costa Rican agreement demonstrates that the Brady debt plan can benefit small debtor countries as well as big debtors, such as Mexico.  The Treasury said it plans to sell $2 billion of 51-day cash-management bills today, raising all new cash.  The bills will be dated Oct. 31 and will mature Dec. 21, 1989.  No non-competitive tenders will be accepted.  Tenders, available in minimum denominations of $1 million, must be received by noon EST today at Federal Reserve Banks or branches.  The Treasury also announced details of this week's unusual bill auction, which has been changed to accommodate the expiration of the federal debt ceiling at midnight tomorrow.  The 13-week and 27-week bills will be issued tomorrow rather than Thursday, Nov. 2, as originally planned.  The three-month bills will still mature Feb. 1, 1990, and the six-month bills on May 3, 1990.  The Treasury also said noncompetitive tenders will be considered timely if postmarked no later than Sunday, Oct. 29, and received no later than tomorrow.  The Treasury said it won't be able to honor reinvestment requests from holders of bills maturing Nov. 2 held in the Treasury's book-entry system.  The department will make payment for bills maturing on Nov. 2 to all investors who have requested reinvestment of their bills on that date, as well as to all account holders who have previously requested payment.  American Pioneer Inc. said it agreed in principle to sell its American Pioneer Life Insurance Co. subsidiary to Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc.'s HBJ Insurance Cos. for $27 million.  American Pioneer, parent of American Pioneer Savings Bank, said the sale will add capital and reduce the level of investments in subsidiaries for the thrift holding company.  Recently, the boards of both the parent company and the thrift also voted to suspend dividends on preferred shares of both companies and convert all preferred into common shares.  The company said the move was necessary to meet capital requirements.  The transaction is subject to execution of a definitive purchase agreement and approval by various regulatory agencies, including the insurance departments of the states of Florida and Indiana, the company said.  In the second quarter, American Pioneer reported a loss of $7.3 million, compared with net income of $1.1 million a year earlier.  The banking operation had a loss of $8.7 million in the second quarter, largely because of problem real-estate loans, while the insurance operations earned $884,000.  October employment data -- also could turn out to be the most confusing.  On the surface, the overall unemployment rate is expected to be little changed from September's 5.3%.  But the actual head count of non-farm employment payroll jobs is likely to be muddied by the impact of Hurricane Hugo, strikes, and less-than-perfect seasonal adjustments, economists said.  The consensus view calls for an overall job gain of 155,000 compared with September's 209,000 increase.  But the important factory-jobs segment, which last month plunged by 103,000 positions and raised recession fears, is most likely to be skewed by the month's unusual events.  Several other reports come before Friday's jobs data, including: the September leading indicators index, new-home sales and October agricultural prices reports due out tomorrow; the October purchasing managers' index and September construction spending and manufacturers' orders on Wednesday; and October chain-store sales on Thursday.  Friday brings the final count on October auto sales.  "The employment report is going to be difficult to interpret," said Michael Englund, economist with MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  Mr. Englund added that next month's data isn't likely to be much better, because it will be distorted by San Francisco's earthquake.  What's more, he believes seasonal swings in the auto industry this year aren't occurring at the same time as in the past, because of production and pricing differences that are curbing the accuracy of seasonal adjustments built into the employment data.  Wednesday's report from the purchasing agents will be watched to see if the index maintains a level below 50%, as it has for the past couple of months.  A reading of less than 50% indicates an economy that is generally contracting while a reading above 50% indicates an economy that's expanding.  Samuel D. Kahan, chief financial economist at Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc., Chicago, said that the purchasers' report is valuable because it often presents the first inkling of economic data for the month.  But he added: "Some people use the purchasers' index as a leading indicator, some use it as a coincident indicator.  But the thing it's supposed to measure -- manufacturing strength -- it missed altogether last month."  David Wyss, chief financial economist at Data Resources Inc., Boston, said that the purchasers' index "does miss occasionally," adding: "When it misses one month it tends to miss the next month, too."  The consensus view on September leading indicators calls for a gain of 0.3%, the same as in August.  Economists said greatly increased consumer optimism, a larger money supply and higher stock prices helped lift the index.  All orders-related components, such as consumer-goods orders and building permits, are thought to have been weaker.  Data Resources' Mr. Wyss added that he will be keeping a closer eye than ususal on October chain-store sales.  Usually, October "isn't a very interesting month {for retail figures} because school clothes have been bought and people are waiting for December to buy Christmas presents," he said.  But Mr. Wyss said he will watch the numbers to get an inkling of whether consumers' general buying habits may slack off as much as their auto-buying apparently has.  He noted that higher gasoline prices will help buoy the October totals.  Seasonal factors are also expected to have taken their toll on September new-home sales, which are believed to have fallen sharply from August's 755,000 units.  Construction spending is believed to have slipped about 0.5% from August levels, although economists noted the rate probably will pick up in the months ahead in response to hurricane and earthquake damage.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Oct. 27  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @Money Supply  @ M1 Week ended  @ Oct. 16 (in billions) $789.0 +$2.1  @ M2 Week ended  @ Oct. 16 (in billions) $3,179.0 +$7.7  @ M3 Week ended  @ Oct. 16 (in billions) $4,030.0 +$12.8  @Real GNP  @3rd quarter, advance,  @annual rate (in trillions) $4.158 +2.5%  @Savings rate  @September, change in  @percentage points 4.9% Unch.  @Durable goods orders  @September (in billions) $126.68 -0.1%  @Personal Income  @September, annual rate  @(in trillions) $4.469 +0.3%  @Personal consumption  @September, annual rate  @(in trillions) $3.526 +0.2%  @New jobless claims  @Week ended Oct. 14 332,000 -16.2%  @Auto sales  @Mid-Oct. total  @vs. year ago 253,406 -20.5%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @Leading indicators  @index (Tues.)  @September  @New homes sold (Tues.)  @September  @Agricultural prices (Tues.)  @October  @Purchasing managers'  @index (Wed.)  @October  @Construction spending (Wed.)  @September  @Manufacturers' orders (Wed.)  @September  @Manufacturers'  @shipments (Wed.)  @September  @New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @Money supply (Thurs.)  @Chain store sales  @PaineWebber Index (Thurs.)  @October  @Unemployment rate (Fri.)  @October  @Employment, payroll (Fri.)  @October  @Auto sales (Fri.)  @October  Factory owners are buying new machinery at a good rate this fall, machine tool makers say, but sluggish sales of new cars and trucks raise questions about fourth-quarter demand from the important automotive industry.  September orders for machine tools rebounded from the summer doldrums, but remained 7.7% below year-earlier levels, according to figures from NMTBA -- the Association for Manufacturing Technology.  Domestic machine tool plants received $303 million of orders last month, up 33% from August's $227.1 million, but still below the $328.2 million of September 1988, NMTBA said.  Machine tools are complex machines ranging from lathes to metal-forming presses that are used to shape most metal parts.  "Overall demand still is very respectable," says Christopher C. Cole, group vice president at Cincinnati Milacron Inc., the nation's largest machine tool producer.  "The outlook is positive for the intermediate to long term."  September orders for all U.S. producers, in fact, were slightly above the monthly average for 1988, a good year for the industry.  "Aerospace orders are very good," Mr. Cole says.  "And export business is still good.  While some automotive programs have been delayed, they haven't been canceled."  "September was one of the biggest order months in our history," says James R. Roberts, vice president, world-wide sales and marketing, for Giddings & Lewis Inc., Fond du Lac, Wis.  At a recent meeting of manufacturing executives, "everybody I talked with was very positive," he says.  Most say they plan to spend more on factory equipment in 1990 than in 1989.  But sales of North American-made 1990-model cars are running at an annual rate of only six million, down from 7.1 million a year earlier.  And truck sales also are off more than 20%.  Auto makers, who began deferring some equipment purchases last spring, can be expected to remain cautious about spending if their sales don't pick up, machine tool builders say.  Machine tool executives are hopeful, however, that recent developments in Eastern Europe will expand markets for U.S.-made machine tools in that region.  There is demand for state-of-the-art machine tools in the Soviet Union and in other Eastern European countries as those nations strive to improve the efficiency of their ailing factories as well as the quality of their goods.  However, there's a continuing dispute between machine tool makers and the Defense Department over whether sophisticated U.S. machine tools would increase the Soviet Union's military might.  "The Commerce Department says go, and the Defense Department says stop," complains one machine tool producer.  If that controversy continues, U.S. machine tool makers say, West German and other foreign producers are likely to grab most of the sales in Eastern Europe.  September orders for machining centers, lathes, milling machines, grinders, boring mills and other machines that shape metal by cutting totaled $192.9 million, down 28% from $266.5 million a year earlier, but a 23% increase from August's $156.3 million, NMTBA said.  Orders last month for metal-forming presses and other machinery to form metal with pressure surged to $110.1 million, a 78% rise from $61.7 million a year earlier and a 55% gain from $70.9 million in August.  Today's presses are large and costly machines, and a few orders can produce a high total for one month that doesn't necessarily indicate a trend.  Machine tool shipments last month were $281.2 million, a 24% rise from a year earlier and a 25% increase from August.  Shipments have run well ahead of 1988 all year, as machine tool builders produce against relatively good backlogs.  U.S. producers had a $2.15 billion backlog of unfilled orders at the end of September.  That was up 2.8% from a year earlier, even though orders for the first nine months of 1989 were down 19% from the comparable 1988 period.  ---  @ Comparative new orders for metal-cutting machines:  @ Sept. 1989 Aug. 1989 Sept. 1988  @ Domestic ...... $171,700,000 $120,700,000 $252,950,000  @ Foreign ....... 21,150,000 35,550,000 13,550,000  @ Total ......... 192,850,000 156,250,000 266,500,000  @ 9 month total for '89: $1,554,400,000; for '88: $2,057,750,000.  @ Metal-forming machine orders:  @ Domestic ...... $104,950,000 $70,450,000 $51,650,000  @ Foreign ....... 5,150,000 400,000 10,050,000  @ Total ......... 110,100,000 70,850,000 61,700,000  @ 9 month total for '89: $668,200,000; for '88: $675,400,000.  @ Comparative shipment of metal-cutting machines:  @ Domestic ..... $188,600,000 $147,200,000 $133,500,000  @ Foreign ...... 39,150,000 22,700,000 17,700,000  @ Total ........ 227,750,000 169,900,000 151,200,000  @ 9 month total for '89: $1,632,950,000; for '88: $1,048,500,000.  @ Metal-forming machine shipments:  @ Domestic ...... $44,400,000 $49,750,000 $65,700,000  @ Foreign ....... 9,050,000 6,150,000 10,650,000  @ Total ......... 53,450,000 55,900,000 76,350,000  @ 9 month total for '89: $617,250,000; for '88: $588,350,000.  In Bombay stock market circles, the buzzword is "mega."  At least 40 companies are coming to the capital market to raise $6 billion, an amount never thought possible in India.  "When they talk mega-issues, they're truly talking mega," says S.A. Dave, chairman of the Securities and Exchange Board of India.  "The capital market is booming."  But the mega-issues are raising megaquestions about the rapidly evolving Indian capital market.  One is whether there is enough money to fund the new issues without depressing stock trading.  Moreover, in the relatively unregulated Indian stock markets, investors frequently don't know what they are getting when they subscribe to an issue.  A prospectus in India doesn't always tell a potential investor much.  Some of the large amounts are being raised by small firms.  In addition, once money is raised, investors usually have no way of knowing how it is spent.  Some analysts are concerned that the mega-issues, in such an unregulated environment, could lead to a mega-crash.  "The rate of failures will be much more than the rate of successes in the mega-projects," says G.S. Patel, a former chairman of the giant, government-run mutual fund, the Unit Trust of India.  "They're going to have mega-problems."  The Indian stock markets have been on a five-year high, with dips and corrections, since Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi started liberalizing industry.  But the last stock market boom, in 1986, seems small compared with the current rush to market.  The $6 billion that some 40 companies are looking to raise in the year ending March 31 compares with only $2.7 billion raised on the capital market in the previous fiscal year.  In fiscal 1984, before Mr. Gandhi came to power, only $810 million was raised.  This year's biggest issue, $570 million of convertible debentures by engineering company Larsen & Toubro Ltd., is the largest in Indian history.  And it isn't the only giant issue: together, the top four issues will raise $1.3 billion.  Convertible debentures -- bonds that can later be converted into equity shares -- are the most popular instrument this year, though many companies are also selling nonconvertible bonds or equity shares.  These mega-issues are being propelled by two factors, economic and political.  In the past, the socialist policies of the government strictly limited the size of new steel mills, petrochemical plants, car factories and other industrial concerns to conserve resources and restrict the profits businessmen could make.  As a result, industry operated out of small, expensive, highly inefficient industrial units.  When Mr. Gandhi came to power, he ushered in new rules for business.  He said industry should build plants on the same scale as those outside India and benefit from economies of scale.  If the output was too great for the domestic market, he said, companies should export.  India's overregulated businessmen had to be persuaded, but they have started to think big.  Some of the projects being funded by the new issues are the first fruits of Mr. Gandhi's policy, and they require more capital than the smaller industrial units built in the past.  The industrial revolution has produced an explosion in the capital market, which is a far cheaper source of funds than government-controlled banks, where interest rates for prime borrowers are around 16%.  The second factor spurring mega-issues is political.  Mr. Gandhi has called general elections for November, and many businessmen fear that he and his Congress (I) Party will lose.  Some companies are raising money in anticipation of a government less predictable than Mr. Gandhi's, and possibly more restrictive.  The buoyant Bombay rumor mill also says that some of the money raised in the current spate of issues will be used as campaign donations before the elections.  No one admits to anything, but India's industrialists have a history of making under-the-table campaign donations.  So far, the mega-issues are a hit with investors.  Earlier this year, Tata Iron & Steel Co.'s offer of $355 million of convertible debentures was oversubscribed.  Essar Gujarat Ltd., a marine construction company, had similar success with a slightly smaller issue.  Larsen & Toubro started accepting applications for its giant issue earlier this month; bankers and analysts expect it to be oversubscribed.  Still to come are big issues by Bindal Agro Chem Ltd., a petrochemical and agrochemical company, and Usha Rectifier Corp. (India), a semiconductor maker.  While many investors are selling parts of their portfolios to buy the new issues, prices on India's 16 stock exchanges are holding up so far.  "I don't think it will lead to any chaos in the secondary market," says Mr. Patel, "only a sagging tendency."  Says M.J. Pherwani, chairman of the Unit Trust of India: The "markets are headed for growth unheard of and unseen before."  But with growth come growing pains, and never has this been clearer on the Indian capital market than now.  In the past, the government controlled the markets indirectly, through its tight grip on industry itself.  Various ministries decided the products businessmen could produce and how much; and government-owned banks controlled the financing of projects and monitored whether companies came through on promised plans.  The government has been content with this far-reaching, subtle form of control, exercised on a case-by-case basis with no clear rules or guidelines.  But now, with large amounts being raised from investors, the government's dawdling on regulation and disclosure requirements has a more dangerous aspect.  The Securities and Exchange Board of India was set up earlier this year, along the lines of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, but New Delhi hasn't pushed the legislation to make it operational.  Mr. Dave, its head, acts cheery and patient, but he makes no bones about the need to get to work.  "Mega or non-mega, we feel the prospectus standards need to be considerably improved," he says.  "Disclosures are very poor in India."  He says the big questions -- "Do you really need this much money to put up these investments?  Have you told investors what is happening in your sector?  What about your track record? -- "aren't asked of companies coming to market.  Instead, he says, most investors have to rely on the rumor-happy Indian press.  An example is the biggest offering of them all, Larsen & Toubro's $570 million bond issue.  The engineering company was acquired in a takeover earlier this year by the giant Reliance textile group.  Although Larsen & Toubro hadn't raised money from the public in 38 years, its new owners frequently raise funds on the local market. (Reliance floated a $357 million petrochemical company in 1988 that was, at the time, the largest public issue in Indian history.) The media has raised questions about Larsen & Toubro's issue, pointing out that it exceeds the company's annual sales and its market capitalization.  Even stranger is the case of Usha Rectifier, a semiconductor company with 1988 sales of $28 million that's raising $270 million to build an iron plant.  Once the money is raised, it isn't always certain how it is used.  Larsen & Toubro, for example, says it's raising $570 million to use as supplier credit on large engineering jobs.  Unlike other companies, it hasn't pin-pointed specific projects for the funds.  And even when specific projects are described in prospectuses, the money often is used elsewhere, according to analysts.  "Someone must monitor where the funds are deployed," says Mr. Dave.  Mr. Patel agrees: "There is no proper monitoring and screening of the use of these funds.  They're trying to plug the various loopholes, but they're totally unprepared for this."  Because of the large amounts of money being raised, the loose disclosure requirements and the casual monitoring of how the money is used, some analysts fear that there could be a few mega-crashes, which could hurt market confidence far more than the small bankruptcies that followed the boom of 1986.  The government insists that such a possibility is low.  It says that despite loose regulation of the market itself, its longstanding regulation of industry will prevent such crashes.  ---  T.T. Ram Mohan contributed to this article.  Lion Nathan Ltd., a New Zealand brewing and retail concern, said Friday that Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd. is "committed" to a transaction whereby Lion Nathan would acquire 50% of Bond's Australian brewing assets.  Lion Nathan issued a statement saying it is applying to Australia's National Companies & Securities Commission, the nation's corporate watchdog agency, for a modification to takeover regulations "similar to that obtained by" S.A. Brewing Holdings Ltd.  SA Brewing, an Australian brewer, last Thursday was given approval to acquire an option for up to 20% of Bell Resources Ltd., a unit of Bond Corp.  Bell Resources is acquiring Bond's brewing businesses for 2.5 billion Australian dollars (US$1.9 billion).  S.A. brewing would make a takeover offer for all of Bell Resources if it exercises the option, according to the commission.  Bond Corp., a brewing, property, media and resources company, is selling many of its assets to reduce its debts.  "Lion Nathan has a concluded contract with Bond and Bell Resources," said Douglas Myers, chief executive of Lion Nathan.  Finnair, Finland's state-owned airline, joined the wave of global airline alliances and signed a wide-ranging cooperation agreement with archrival Scandinavian Airlines System.  Under the accord, Finnair agreed to coordinate flights, marketing and other functions with SAS, the 50%-state-owned airline of Denmark, Norway and Sweden.  The pact also calls for coordination between Finnair and Switzerland's national carrier, Swissair, with which SAS entered a similar alliance last month.  Finnair and SAS said they plan to swap stakes in each other.  Neither disclosed details pending board meetings next month.  Officials hinted, however, that SAS would take a stake of at least 6% in Finnair, valued at about $40 million at current market prices.  Finnair would receive SAS shares valued at the same amount, officials said.  General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co. are now going head to head in the markets for shares of Jaguar PLC, as GM got early clearance from the Federal Trade Commission to boost its stake in the British luxury car maker.  GM confirmed Friday that it received permission late Thursday from U.S. antitrust regulators to increase its Jaguar holdings past the $15 million level.  Ford got a similar go-ahead earlier in October, and on Friday, Jaguar announced that the No. 2 U.S. auto maker had raised its stake to 13.2%, or 24.2 million shares, from 12.4% earlier in the week.  A spokesman for GM, the No. 1 auto maker, declined to say how many Jaguar shares that company owns.  In late trading Friday, Jaguar shares bucked the downward tide in London's stock market and rose five pence to 725 pence ($11.44).  Trading volume was a moderately heavy 3.1 million shares.  In the U.S., Jaguar's American depositary receipts were among the most active issues Friday in national over-the-counter trading where they closed at $11.625 each, up 62.5 cents.  Analysts expect that the two U.S. auto giants will move quickly to buy up 15% stakes in Jaguar, setting up a potential bidding war for the prestigious Jaguar brand.  British government restrictions prevent any single shareholder from going beyond 15% before the end of 1990 without government permission.  The British government, which owned Jaguar until 1984, still holds a controlling "golden share" in the company.  With the golden share as protection, Jaguar officials have rebuffed Ford's overtures, and moved instead to forge an alliance with GM. Jaguar officials have indicated they are close to wrapping up a friendly alliance with GM that would preserve Jaguar's independence, but no deal has been announced.  Ford, on the other hand, has said it's willing to bid for all of Jaguar, despite the objections of Jaguar chairman Sir John Egan.  Analysts continued to speculate late last week that Ford may try to force the issue by calling for a special shareholder's meeting and urging that the government and Jaguar holders remove the barriers to a full bidding contest before December 1990.  But a Ford spokeswoman in Dearborn said Friday the company hasn't requested such a meeting yet.  Individuals close to the situation believe Ford officials will seek a meeting this week with Sir John to outline their proposal for a full bid.  Any discussions with Ford could postpone the Jaguar-GM deal, headed for completion within the next two weeks.  The GM agreement is expected to retain Jaguar's independence by involving an eventual 30% stake for the U.S. auto giant as well as joint manufacturing and marketing ventures.  Jaguar and GM hope to win Jaguar shareholders approval for the accord partly by structuring it in a way that wouldn't preclude a full Ford bid once the golden share expires.  "There's either a minority {stake} package capable of getting Jaguar shareholder approval or there isn't," said one knowledgeable individual.  "If there isn't, {the deal} won't be put forward" to shareholders.  Union sentiment also could influence shareholder reaction to a Jaguar-GM accord.  GM's U.K. unit holds crucial talks today with union officials about its consideration of an Ellesmere Port site for its first major engine plant in Britain.  One auto-industry union leader said, "If they try to build it somewhere else {in Europe} besides the U.K., they are going to be in big trouble" with unionists over any Jaguar deal.  These are the last words Abbie Hoffman ever uttered, more or less, before he killed himself.  And You Are There, sort of:  ABBIE: "I'm OK, Jack.  I'm OK." (listening) "Yeah.  I'm out of bed.  I got my feet on the floor.  Yeah.  Two feet.  I'll see you Wednesday? . . .  Thursday."  He listens impassively.  ABBIE (cont'd.): "I'll always be with you, Jack.  Don't worry."  Abbie lies back and leaves the frame empty.  Of course that wasn't the actual conversation the late anti-war activist, protest leader and founder of the Yippies ever had with his brother.  It's a script pieced together from interviews by CBS News for a re-enactment, a dramatic rendering by an actor of Mr. Hoffman's ultimately unsuccessful struggle with depression.  The segment is soon to be broadcast on the CBS News series "Saturday Night With Connie Chung," thus further blurring the distinction between fiction and reality in TV news.  It is the New Journalism come to television.  Ms. Chung's program is just one of several network shows (and many more in syndication) that rely on the controversial technique of reconstructing events, using actors who are supposed to resemble real people, living and dead.  Ms. Chung's, however, is said to be the only network news program in history to employ casting directors.  Abbie Hoffman in this case is to be played by Hollywood actor Paul Lieber, who isn't new to the character.  He was Mr. Hoffman in a 1979 Los Angeles production of a play called "The Chicago Conspiracy Trial."  Television news, of course, has always been part show-biz.  Broadcasters have a healthy appreciation of the role entertainment values play in captivating an audience.  But, as CBS Broadcast Group president Howard Stringer puts it, the network now needs to "broaden the horizons of nonfiction television, and that includes some experimentation."  Since its premiere Sept. 16, the show on which Ms. Chung appears has used an actor to portray the Rev. Vernon Johns, a civil-rights leader, and one to play a teenage drug dealer.  It has depicted the bombing of Pan Am flight 103 over the Scottish town of Lockerbie.  On Oct. 21, it did a rendition of the kidnapping and imprisonment of Associated Press correspondent Terry Anderson, who was abducted in March 1985 and is believed to be held in Lebanon.  The production had actors playing Mr. Anderson and former hostages David Jacobsen, the Rev. Benjamin Weir and Father Lawrence Jenco.  ABC News has similarly branched out into entertainment gimmickry.  "Prime Time Live," a new show this season featuring Sam Donaldson and Diane Sawyer, has a studio audience that applauds and that one night (to the embarrassment of the network) waved at the camera like the crowd on "Let's Make a Deal." (ABC stops short of using an "applause" sign and a comic to warm up the audience.  The stars do that themselves.) NBC News has produced three episodes of an occasional series produced by Sid Feders called "Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow," starring Maria Shriver, Chuck Scarborough and Mary Alice Williams, that also gives work to actors.  Call it a fad.  Or call it the wave of the future.  NBC's re-creations are produced by Cosgrove-Meurer Productions, which also makes the successful prime-time NBC Entertainment series "Unsolved Mysteries."  The marriage of news and theater, if not exactly inevitable, has been consummated nonetheless.  News programs, particularly if they score well in the ratings, appeal to the networks' cost-conscious corporate parents because they are so much less expensive to produce than an entertainment show is -- somewhere between $400,000 and $500,000 for a one-hour program.  Entertainment shows tend to cost twice that.  Re-enactments have been used successfully for several seasons on such syndicated "tabloid TV" shows as "A Current Affair," which is produced by the Fox Broadcasting Co. unit of Rupert Murdoch's News Corp.  That show, whose host is Ms. Chung's husband, Maury Povich, has a particular penchant for grisly murders and stories having to do with sex -- the Robert Chambers murder case, the Rob Lowe tapes, what have you.  Gerald Stone, the executive producer of "A Current Affair," says, "We have opened eyes to being a little less conservative and more imaginative in how to present the news."  Nowhere have eyes been opened wider than at CBS News.  At 555 W. 57th St. in Manhattan, one floor below the offices of "60 Minutes," the most successful prime-time news program ever, actors wait in the reception area to audition for "Saturday Night With Connie Chung."  CBS News sends scripts to agents, who pass them along to clients.  The network deals a lot with unknowns, including Scott Wentworth, who portrayed Mr. Anderson, and Bill Alton as Father Jenco, but the network has some big names to contend with, too.  James Earl Jones is cast to play the Rev. Mr. Johns.  Ned Beatty may portray former California Gov. Pat Brown in a forthcoming epsiode on Caryl Chessman, the last man to be executed in California, in 1960.  "Saturday Night" has cast actors to appear in future stories ranging from the abortion rights of teen-agers to a Nov. 4 segment on a man named Willie Bosket, who calls himself a "monster" and is reputed to be the toughest prisoner in New York.  CBS News, which as recently as two years ago fired hundreds of its employees in budget cutbacks, now hires featured actors beginning at $2,700 a week.  That isn't much compared with what Bill Cosby makes, or even Connie Chung for that matter (who is paid $1.6 million a year and who recently did a guest shot of her own on the sitcom "Murphy Brown").  But the money isn't peanuts either, particularly for a news program.  CBS News is also re-enacting the 1979 Three Mile Island nuclear accident in Middletown, Pa., with something less than a cast of thousands.  It is combing the town of 10,000 for about 200 extras.  On Oct. 20, the town's mayor, Robert Reid, made an announcement on behalf of CBS during half-time at the Middletown High School football game asking for volunteers.  "There was a roll of laughter through the stands," says Joe Sukle, the editor of the weekly Press and Journal in Middletown.  "They're filming right now at the bank down the street, and they want shots of people getting out of cars and kids on skateboards.  They are approaching everyone on the street and asking if they want to be in a docudrama."  Mr. Sukle says he wouldn't dream of participating himself: "No way.  I think re-enactments stink."  Though a re-enactment may have the flavor, Hollywood on the Hudson it isn't.  Some producers seem tentative about the technique, squeamish even.  So the results, while not news, aren't exactly theater either, at least not good theater.  And some people do think that acting out scripts isn't worthy of CBS News, which once lent prestige to the network and set standards for the industry.  In his review of "Saturday Night With Connie Chung," Tom Shales, the TV critic of the Washington Post and generally an admirer of CBS, wrote that while the show is "impressive, . . . one has to wonder if this is the proper direction for a network news division to take."  Re-creating events has, in general, upset news traditionalists, including former CBS News President Richard S. Salant and former NBC News President Reuven Frank, former CBS News anchorman Walter Cronkite and the new dean of the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism, Joan Konner.  Says she: "Once you add dramatizations, it's no longer news, it's drama, and that has no place on a network news broadcast. . . .  They should never be on.  Never."  Criticism of the Abbie Hoffman segment is particularly scathing among people who knew and loved the man.  That includes his companion of 15 years, Johanna Lawrenson, as well as his former wife, Anita.  Both women say they also find it distasteful that CBS News is apparently concentrating on Mr. Hoffman's problems as a manic-depressive.  "This is dangerous and misrepresents Abbie's life," says Ms. Lawrenson, who has had an advance look at the 36-page script.  "It's a sensational piece about someone who is not here to defend himself."  Mrs. Hoffman says that dramatization "makes the truth flexible.  It takes one person's account and gives it authenticity."  CBS News interviewed Jack Hoffman and his sister, Phyllis, as well as Mr. Hoffman's landlord in Solebury Township, Pa.  Also Jonathan Silvers, who collaborated with Mr. Hoffman on two books.  Mr. Silvers says, "I wanted to be interviewed to get Abbie's story out, and maybe talking about the illness will do some good."  The executive producer of "Saturday Night With Connie Chung," Andrew Lack, declines to discuss re-creactions as a practice or his show, in particular.  "I don't talk about my work," he says.  The president of CBS News, David W. Burke, didn't return numerous telephone calls.  One person close to the process says it would not be in the best interest of CBS News to comment on a "work in progress," such as the Hoffman re-creation, but says CBS News is "aware" of the concerns of Ms. Lawrenson and Mr. Hoffman's former wife.  Neither woman was invited by CBS News to participate in a round-table discussion about Mr. Hoffman that is to follow the re-enactment.  Mr. Lieber, the actor who plays Mr. Hoffman, says he was concerned at first that the script would "misrepresent an astute political mind, one that I admired," but that his concerns were allayed.  The producers, he says, did a good job of depicting someone "who had done so much, but who was also a manic-depressive."  Dentsu Inc., the world's largest advertising agency on the strength of its dominance in the Japanese market, is setting its sights on overseas expansion.  Last year, Dentsu started HDM, a joint network with U.S. ad agency Young & Rubicam and Eurocom of France.  A few months ago, Dentsu acquired 69% of Australian agency Fortune Communication Holdings Ltd. for 5.9 million Australian dollars (US$4.6 million).  Dentsu has U.S. subsidiaries, but they keep low profiles.  Now, the giant marketing company, which holds 25% of Japan's 4.4 trillion yen ($30.96 billion) advertising industry, is considering the acquisition of an advertising network in the U.S. or Europe.  What is driving Dentsu's international expansion largely is the need to keep up with its Japanese clients as they grow in the U.S. and Europe.  "If we don't do something . . . we won't be able to catch up with demand," says a Dentsu spokesman.  "Our president said acquisition is an effective method."  Last year, Dentsu's foreign business accounted for less than 10% of total billings, but the company is aiming at 20% in the near future.  So far, it appears cautious about taking the big step.  For example, the spokesman says Dentsu has been approached by banks and securities companies a number of times to invest in the troubled British marketing group Saatchi & Saatchi PLC.  But he said Dentsu hasn't looked seriously at Saatchi.  Though Dentsu says it has no concrete acquisition plans or deadlines, it is laying the groundwork for international growth.  It is setting up a special team in charge of international markets and training workers to do business abroad.  For the year ended March 31, Dentsu sales rose 19% to $8.9 billion from $7.5 billion, and net income jumped 59% to $102 million from $64 million.  Dentsu's billings last year were larger than those of Young & Rubicam, the world's second-largest ad agency, according to a survey by the publication Advertising Age.  But success overseas in unfamiliar markets could be trickier than for other industries such as manufacturers.  On its own, Dentsu's muscle in Japan may count for little in major foreign markets when seeking non-Japanese clients.  Thus, an acquisition may prove the necessary course.  But Japanese agencies are cautious about expanding abroad because client relationships are different.  Japanese agencies do business with rival clients in the same industry, a practice "that would be unacceptable by traditional Western conflict rules," says Roy Warman, the London chief executive of Saatchi & Saatchi's communications division.  Although acquiring a foreign company would expand Japanese advertising agencies' business to foreign clients, many clients would also be Japanese companies expanding overseas, says the Dentsu spokesman.  But the different business system would make it hard for Dentsu to provide these Japanese companies the same kind of services they do in Japan.  Ciba-Geigy AG, the big Swiss chemicals company, said that it agreed in a letter of intent with Corning Inc. to acquire Corning's 50% share of Ciba Corning Diagnostics Corp., based in Medfield, Mass.  Ciba Corning, which had been a 50-50 venture between Basel-based Ciba-Geigy and Corning, has annual sales of about $300 million, the announcement said.  Terms of the transaction weren't disclosed.  Ciba Corning makes clinical diagnostics systems and related products for the medical-care industry.  The announcement said the acquisition should be completed by December after a definitive agreement is completed and regulatory approval is received.  Ciba-Geigy intends to develop the Ciba Corning unit into a "substantial business," making the unit an "integral part" of Ciba-Geigy's "comprehensive disease management concept."  The NBC network canceled its first new series of the fall TV season, killing Mel Brooks's wacky hotel comedy "The Nutt House."  The show, one of five new NBC series, is the second casualty of the three networks so far this fall.  Last week CBS Inc. canceled "The People Next Door."  NBC's comedy had aired Wednesdays at 9:30 p.m. and in five outings had drawn an average of only 13.2% of homes, lagging behind the Jamie Lee Curtis comedy "Anything But Love" on ABC and CBS's one-hour drama "Jake and the Fatman."  NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., hasn't decided on a permanent replacement for the canceled series.  John Labatt Ltd. said it plans a private placement of 150 million Canadian dollars (US$127.5 million) in preferred shares, to be completed around Nov. 1.  Proceeds will be used to reduce short-term debt at the beer and food concern, said Robert Vaux, vice president, finance.  The preferred shares will carry a floating annual dividend equal to 72% of the 30-day bankers' acceptance rate until Dec. 31, 1994.  Thereafter, the rate will be renegotiated.  Mr. Vaux said that if no agreement is reached, other buyers will be sought by bid or auction.  The shares are redeemable after the end of 1994.  Mr. Vaux said the share issue is part of a strategy to strengthen Labatt's balance sheet in anticipation of acquisitions to be made during the next 12 to 18 months.  Labatt's has no takeover bids outstanding currently, he said.  Lead underwriter to the issue is Toronto Dominion Securities Inc.  Texas Instruments Inc., once a pioneer in portable computer technology, today will make a bid to reassert itself in that business by unveiling three small personal computers.  The announcements are scheduled to be made in Temple, Texas, and include a so-called "notebook" PC that weighs less than seven pounds, has a built-in hard disk drive and is powered by Intel Corp.'s 286 microprocessor.  That introduction comes only two weeks after Compaq Computer Corp., believing it had a lead of three to six months on competitors, introduced the first U.S. notebook computer with such features.  Despite the inevitable comparison with Compaq, however, Texas Instruments' new notebook won't be a direct competitor.  While Compaq sells its machines to businesses through computer retailers, Texas Instruments will be selling most of its machines to the industrial market and to value-added resellers and original-equipment manufacturers.  The introductions also mark Texas Instruments' plunge back into a technology it has all but ignored for the past several years.  Although the Dallas-based computer giant introduced the first portable data terminal in 1971 -- a 38-pound monster -- and the world's first microprocessor-based portable in 1976, the only portable machines it has introduced since the first part of the decade have been "dumb" terminals with limited on-board processing ability.  It stopped selling a standard personal computer a while ago.  Now that is about to change, as Texas Instruments begins marketing two 14-pound laptop PCs with 20 megabyte and 40 megabyte hard drives.  The laptops are not revolutionary and, indeed, are tardy in a market first opened by GRiD Systems Corp., now a unit of Tandy Corp., almost two years ago.  But the notebook, with the more advanced microprocessor and hard disk, is more innovative.  Weighing 6.7 pounds with battery, the notebook measures 8.2 by 11.7 inches, has a 20-megabyte hard disk drive and boasts a backlit screen that is 22% larger than Compaq's.  Its keyboard, according to industry consultants, is better than Compaq's, but its battery life of two to three hours is shorter.  It doesn't have an internal floppy disk drive, although a snap-on drive can be purchased separately.  Its greatest drawback may be its 3-inch thickness, big enough for one consultant to describe it as "clunky."  List prices on the heavier Texas Instrument laptops will be $4,999 for the TI Model 25, with a 20 megabyte disk drive, and $5,599 for the 40-megabyte Model 45.  The notebook, the TI Model 12, will be priced at $4,199.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. said it applied to Taiwanese securities officials for permission to open brokerage offices in Taipei.  Shearson's application is the first since the Taiwan Securities and Exchange Commission announced June 21 that it would allow foreign brokerage firms to do business in that country.  Taiwan officials are expected to review the Shearson application later this year.  Under current rules, investors in Taiwan can buy overseas stocks only through the purchase of mutual funds issued by local and foreign investment trusts.  The new rules will allow investors to buy foreign stocks directly.  A spokesman for Shearson said the brokerage service will be directed at individual investors who want to buy foreign and domestic stocks.  "It's an attractive market with good growth opportunities," he added.  Retailers in the West and parts of the South are entering the critical Christmas shopping season with more momentum than those in other regions.  In a new report, the International Council of Shopping Centers said sales of general merchandise in the West for the first seven months of 1989 rose 6.6% above year-earlier levels.  Sales increased a more modest 4.8% in the South and 4.4% in the Midwest.  But sales in the oil-patch state of Texas surged 12.9% and sales in South Carolina jumped 10.6% in the period, the New York trade group said.  In the Northeast, however, sales declined 0.4% in the period, with sales in New England falling 2.6%.  The numbers show that "we don't have a monolithic economy," said Isaac Lagnado, council research director.  "There are a lot of have and have-not markets."  Sales nationally rose 3.9% through July, the latest month for which the figures are available, the council said.  The Northern California earthquake and Hurricane Hugo are likely to temporarily damp sales growth in the West and South Carolina.  But Mr. Lagnado predicted the regional trends would continue through Christmas.  "The big mo is as much of a factor in retailing as in politics," he said.  The Christmas quarter is important to retailers because it represents roughly a third of their sales and nearly half of their profits.  The council's report is based on data the trade group buys from the U.S. Census Bureau.  The information on 125 metropolitan markets is supplied by retailers such as Sears, Roebuck & Co. and K mart Corp. as well as closely held concerns such as R.H. Macy & Co.  The council plans to release its regional reports monthly.  Mr. Lagnado said strength in employment appears to have the biggest impact on sales growth.  El Paso, Austin and Fort Worth, the three strongest retail markets in the nation, are all located in Texas, where employment grew a relatively strong 2%.  Massachusetts, which has lost jobs in the computer and defense-related industries, was the weakest link in bleak New England.  The results reflect a reversal in the fortunes of the regions during the past two years.  In 1987, the West had the slowest sales growth, and the South and the Midwest were first and second respectively, according to the council.  Mr. Lagnado said that although retailers probably won't ever recover sales lost because of the California quake and Hurricane Hugo, they could see some benefits later on.  Stores such as Sears that sell big-ticket durable goods might actually get a boost as consumers rush to replace items lost in the disasters, he said.  Kerr-McGee Corp. said it will spend $42 million to purchase land and relocate its ammonium perchlorate storage facility to Clark County, Nev., from Henderson, Nev.  The company said it will move the storage and cross-blending operations to a site 23 miles northeast of Las Vegas to distance the operations from residential areas.  Ammonium perchlorate is an oxidizer that is mixed with a propellant to make rocket fuel used in the space shuttle and military rockets.  In May 1988, an ammonium perchlorate plant in Henderson owned by an American Pacific Corp. unit was leveled by a series of explosions.  After the explosion, Kerr-McGee temporarily shut down its facility just south of Las Vegas for a safety inspection.  American Pacific and Kerr-McGee are the only two U.S. manufacturers of ammonium perchlorate.  When the plant was destroyed, "I think everyone got concerned that the same thing would happen at our plant," a KerrMcGee spokeswoman said.  That prompted Kerr-McGee to consider moving the potentially volatile storage facilities and cross-blending operations away from town.  Kerr-McGee said it has purchased 3,350 acres from the federal government in Clark County and plans to begin construction early next year.  The new facility is expected to begin operations in early 1991.  The Henderson plant will continue its other chemical operations, the company said.  This maker of electronic devices said it replaced all five incumbent directors at a special meeting called by Milton B. Hollander, whose High Technology Holding Co. of Stamford, Conn. acquired most of its 49.4% stake in Newport in August.  Elected as directors were Mr. Hollander, Frederick Ezekiel, Frederick Ross, Arthur B. Crozier and Rose Pothier.  Removed from office were George Pratt, Robert E. Davis, Norman Gray, John Virtue, corporate secretary, and Barrett B. Weekes, chairman, president and chief executive officer.  Newport officials didn't respond Friday to requests to discuss the changes at the company but earlier, Mr. Weekes had said Mr. Hollander wanted to have his own team on the board.  Shiseido Co., Japan's leading cosmetics producer, said it had net income of 5.64 billion yen ($39.7 million) in its first half, which ended Sept. 30.  Exact comparisons with the previous year were unavailable because of a change in the company's fiscal calendar.  The Tokyo-based company had net of 3.73 billion yen in the previous reporting period, which was the four months ended March 31.  Sales in the first half came to 159.92 billion yen, compared with 104.79 billion yen in the four-month period.  Shiseido predicted that sales for the year ending next March 31 will be 318 billion yen, compared with 340.83 billion yen in the year ended Nov. 30, 1988.  It said it expects net to rise to 11 billion yen from 8.22 billion yen.  Bruce W. Wilkinson, president and chief executive officer, was named to the additional post of chairman of this architectural and design services concern.  Mr. Wilkinson, 45 years old, succeeds Thomas A. Bullock, 66, who is retiring as chairman but will continue as a director and chairman of the executive committee.  Merger and acquisition activity in the third quarter exceeded the year-earlier pace, said Merrill Lynch & Co.'s W.T. Grimm & Co. unit in Schaumburg, Ill.  A total of 672 transactions were announced during the latest quarter, up 13% from the year-earlier period's 597, Grimm said.  Transactions in which prices were disclosed totaled $71.9 billion, up 36% from $52.9 billion a year earlier, the company added.  Grimm counted 16 transactions valued at $1 billion or more in the latest period, twice as many as a year earlier.  The largest was the $12 billion merger creating Bristol-Myers Squibb Co.  In the first nine months, 1,977 transactions were announced, up 15% from 1,716 in the year-earlier period.  Transactions in which prices were disclosed totaled $188.1 billion, up 15% from $163.2 billion a year earlier.  Citing current stock market conditions and the trend away from highly leveraged transactions, Grimm said it wasn't certain that the total value of transactions for the year will exceed the record $247 billion in 1988.  MEDICINE SHOPPE INTERNATIONAL Inc. declared a 3-for-2 stock split, and substantially boosted the dividend payout.  The franchiser of pharmacies said the added shares will be distributed Dec. 4 to stock of record Nov. 13.  The company also changed its dividend policy, under which holders had received an annual 10 cents-a-share payment, by declaring a four-cents-a-share dividend, to be paid quarterly on post-split shares.  NBI Inc. said that it cannot pay the Oct. 31 dividend on its Series A convertible preferred stock, allowing the stock's holder to convert the shares into as much as 27.7% of NBI's shares outstanding.  NBI said that it has the funds to pay the dividend, but that it doesn't have the surplus or profit required under Delaware law for payment of the dividend.  All the preferred stock is held by the Yukon Office Supply Stock Ownership Plan.  Under terms of the stock, the Yukon ESOP can demand that the stock be redeemed for $4,090,000 on Nov. 30, but NBI said it is legally prohibited from making the redemption.  Failure to pay the dividend allows Yukon to convert all or some of its shares into NBI common after Nov. 30, at a conversion price based on NBI's closing stock price.  NBI, a maker of word-processing systems, said it can't predict if any of the preferred stock will be converted.  NBI also said it has hired Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. as its financial adviser and investment banker to help it restructure financially and improve its balance sheet.  Insurers may see claims resulting from the San Francisco earthquake totaling nearly $1 billion -- far less than the claims they face from Hurricane Hugo -- but the recent spate of catastrophes should jolt property insurance rates in coming months.  The property claims service division of the American Insurance Services Group estimated insured losses from the earthquake at $960 million.  This estimate doesn't include claims under workers' compensation, life, health disability and liability insurance and damage to infrastructure such as bridges, highways and public buildings.  The estimated earthquake losses are low compared with the $4 billion in claims that insurers face from Hurricane Hugo, which ripped through the Caribbean and the Carolinas last month.  That's because only about 30% of California homes and businesses had earthquake insurance to cover the losses.  However, insurance brokers and executives say that the combination of the Bay area earthquake, Hugo and last week's explosion at the Phillips Petroleum Co.'s refinery in Pasadena, Texas, will cause property insurance and reinsurance rates to jump.  Other insurance rates such as casualty insurance, which would cover liability claims, aren't likely to firm right away, says Alice Cornish, an industry analyst with Northington Research in Avon, Conn.  She believes the impact of losses from these catastrophes isn't likely to halt the growth of the industry's surplus capital next year.  Property reinsurance rates are likely to climb first, analysts and brokers believe.  "The reinsurance market has been bloodied by disasters" in the U.S. as well as in Great Britain and Europe, says Thomas Rosencrants, director of research at Interstate/Johnson Lane Inc. in Atlanta.  Insurers typically retain a small percentage of the risks they underwrite and pass on the rest of the losses.  Insurers buy this insurance protection for themselves by giving up a portion of the premiums they collect on a policy to another firm -- a reinsurance company, which, in turn, accepts a portion of any losses resulting from this policy.  Insurers, such as Cigna Corp., Transamerica Corp, and Aetna Life & Casualty Co., buy reinsurance from other U.S.-based companies and Lloyd's of London for one catastrophe at a time.  After Hugo hit, many insurers exhausted their reinsurance coverage and had to tap reinsurers to replace that coverage in case there were any other major disasters before the end of the year.  After the earthquake two weeks ago, brokers say companies scrambled to replace reinsurance coverages again and Lloyd's syndicates turned to the London market excess lines for protection of their own.  James Snedeker, senior vice president of Gill & Roeser Inc., a New York-based reinsurance broker, says insurers who took big losses this fall and had purchased little reinsurance in recent years will be asked to pay some pretty hefty rates if they want to buy reinsurance for 1990.  However, companies with few catastrophe losses this year and already big buyers of reinsurance are likely to see their rates remain flat, or perhaps even decline slightly.  Many companies will be negotiating their 1990 reinsurance contracts in the next few weeks.  "It's a seller's market," said Mr. Snedeker of the reinsurance market right now.  But some large insurers, such as State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Co., don't purchase reinsurance, but fund their own program.  A few years ago, State Farm, the nation's largest home insurer, stopped buying reinsurance because no one carrier could provide all the coverage that it needed and the company found it cheaper to self-reinsure.  The $472 million of losses State Farm expects from Hugo and an additional $300 million from the earthquake are less than 5% of State Farm's $16.7 billion total net worth.  Since few insurers have announced what amount of losses they expect to see from the earthquake, it's impossible to get a clear picture of the quake's impact on fourth-quarter earnings, said Herbert Goodfriend at Prudential-Bache Securities Corp.  Transamerica expects an after-tax charge of less than $3 million against fourth-quarter net; Hartford Insurance Group, a unit of ITT Corp., expects a $15 million or 10 cents after-tax charge; and Fireman's Fund Corp. expects a charge of no more than $50 million before taxes and after using its reinsurance.  Sharp Corp., Tokyo, said net income in its first half rose 59% to 18.32 billion yen ($128.9 million) from 11.53 billion yen a year earlier.  The consumer electronics, home appliances and information-processing concern said revenue in the six months ended Sept. 30 rose 8.9% to 517.85 billion yen from 475.6 billion yen.  Sales of information-processing products and electric parts increased a strong 22% to 236.23 billion yen from 194.24 billion yen and accounted for 46% of total sales.  In audio equipment, sales rose 13% to 44.3 billion yen from 39.19 billion yen.  Sales of electric appliances were flat, and sales of electronic equipment declined slightly.  Sharp projected sales for the current year ending March 31 at 1.6 trillion yen, a 7% increase the previous fiscal year.  It said it expects net to rise 45% to 380 billion yen.  Sun Microsystems Inc., a computer maker, announced the effectiveness of its registration statement for $125 million of 6 3/8% convertible subordinated debentures due Oct. 15, 1999.  The company said the debentures are being issued at an issue price of $849 for each $1,000 principal amount and are convertible at any time prior to maturity at a conversion price of $25 a share.  The debentures are available through Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Nelson Holdings International Ltd. shareholders approved a 1-for-10 consolidation of the company's common stock at a special meeting.  At the same time, shareholders approved the adoption of a rights plan and a super-majority voting approval requirement.  They also approved the relocation of the company's registered office to Toronto from Vancouver and a name change to NHI Nelson Holdings International Ltd.  Following the consolidation, the entertainment company, which has film and television operations in Beverly Hills, Calif., will have about 4.1 million shares outstanding.  The number of authorized common shares will remain at 100 million.  Under the rights plan, holders will have one right for each common share held, with each right entitling the purchase of one common share for 100 Canadian dollars.  The rights plan would be triggered if a person or group acquires 20% or more of the common shares outstanding without making an offer to all shareholders.  Under the super-majority amendment, certain mergers and other transactions would require approval of holders of 80% of the company's common shares outstanding.  Wilfred American Educational Corp. said a federal grand jury in Boston indicted the operator of cosmetology and business schools for mail fraud.  The charges in the 12-count indictment, which stem from events that allegedly occurred in late 1984 and early 1985, involve enrollment procedures of six students and the preparation of certain reports, Wilfred said.  No individuals were charged in the indictment.  Wilfred American said it will "vigorously defend" itself against the charges and added that the charges relate to procedures that it has since changed.  Eight admissions representatives at two of Wilfred's former Massachusetts schools previously pleaded guilty to charges of aiding, abetting and counseling students to submit false financial-aid applications.  Wilfred closed its Massachusetts schools earlier this year.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Wilfred fell 6.25 cents to 93.75 cents a share.  Rally's Inc. said it filed suit in U.S. District Court in Delaware against a group led by Burt Sugarman, seeking to block the investors from buying more shares.  Rally's, a Louisville, Ky., fast-food chain, alleges that the three investors, who are directors of the company, broke securities laws because they didn't disclose their intentions to acquire a big Rally's stake.  The group, led by Giant Group Ltd. and its chairman, Mr. Sugarman, owns about 45.2% of Rally's.  In the Securities and Exchange Commission filings, the group has said it may seek control of Rally's.  Mr. Sugarman called the lawsuit "not nice" and said his group will continue to push for control of the company and the removal of certain directors.  He asserts that some directors, who have joined forces with company founder James Patterson, have ties to Wendy's, a competing hamburger chain.  The Patterson group, which controls about 42% of Rally's shares, also may seek control.  Rally's also said it formed a committee of three directors, who aren't associated with either the Patterson or Sugarman groups, to analyze the situation.  Leaseway Transportation Corp. said it will restructure $192.5 million of certain subordinated debentures to reduce its debt obligations and interest expense.  The 13.25% subordinated debentures due 2002 were issued in August 1987 as part of the $690 million financing for a leveraged buy-out of the company.  Leaseway provides transportation services for manufacturers, distributors and retailers.  Leaseway said it has begun discussions with certain institutional debt holders to review the proposed private placement transaction, which would exchange the debt for new subordinated debt instruments and equity securities.  Specific terms are subject to review and a final agreement with debt holders, the company said.  But the proposed transaction calls for an exchange of the debt for new debentures of lower face value and reduced cash interest.  Also, debt holders would be offered an equity position in Leaseway, which in total would represent a controlling interest in the company.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. is the adviser on the transaction.  Company officials said Leaseway fulfilled payment requirements of its debt obligations since the leveraged buy-out, but "our performance since the {buy-out} makes it imperative to implement actions that will further improve our cash flow."  Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega may have accomplished over the weekend what his U.S. antagonists have failed to do: revive a constituency for the Contra rebels.  Lawmakers haven't publicly raised the possibility of renewing military aid to the Contras, and President Bush parried the question at a news conference here Saturday, saying only that "if there's an all-out military offensive, that's going to change the equation 180 degrees."  But Mr. Ortega's threat over the weekend to end a 19-month cease-fire with the rebels seeking to topple him, effectively elevated the Contras as a policy priority just as they were slipping from the agendas of their most ardent supporters.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell (D., Maine) said yesterday on NBC-TV's "Meet the Press" that Mr. Ortega's threat was "a very unwise move, particularly the timing of it."  The threat came during a two-day celebration in Costa Rica to highlight Central America's progress toward democracy in the region, attended by President Bush, Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney and 14 other Western Hemisphere leaders.  Mr. Bush returned to Washington Saturday night.  Mr. Ortega announced on Friday that he would end the cease-fire this week in response to the periodic Contra assaults against his army.  Saturday, he amended his remarks to say that he would continue to abide by the cease-fire if the U.S. ends its financial support for the Contras.  He asked that the remaining U.S. humanitarian aid be diverted to disarming and demobilizing the rebels.  Not only did Mr. Ortega's comments come in the midst of what was intended as a showcase for the region, it came as Nicaragua is under special international scrutiny in anticipation of its planned February elections.  Outside observers are gathering in Nicaragua to monitor the registration and treatment of opposition candidates.  And important U.S. lawmakers must decide at the end of November if the Contras are to receive the rest of the $49 million in so-called humanitarian assistance under a bipartisan agreement reached with the Bush administration in March.  The humanitarian assistance, which pays for supplies such as food and clothing for the rebels amassed along the Nicaraguan border with Honduras, replaced the military aid cut off by Congress in February 1988.  While few lawmakers anticipated that the humanitarian aid would be cut off next month, Mr. Ortega's threat practically guarantees that the humanitarian aid will be continued.  Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole (R., Kan.) said yesterday on "Meet the Press": "I would hope after his {Mr.  Ortega's} act yesterday or the day before, we'd have unanimous support for quick action on remaining humanitarian aid."  Sen. Dole also said he hoped for unanimous support for a resolution he plans to offer tomorrow denouncing the Nicaraguan leader.  While renewing military aid had been considered out of the question, rejected by Congress and de-emphasized by the Bush administration, Mr. Ortega's statement provides Contra supporters with the opportunity to press the administration on the issue.  "The administration should now state that if the {February} election is voided by the Sandinistas . . . they should call for military aid," said former Assistant Secretary of State Elliott Abrams.  "In these circumstances, I think they'd win."  Sen. Mitchell said that congressional Democrats intend to honor the March agreement to give non-lethal support to the Contras through the February elections, although he added that the agreement requires that the Contras not initiate any military action.  Mr. Ortega's threat to breach the cease-fire comes as U.S. officials were acknowledging that the Contras have at times violated it themselves.  Secretary of State James Baker, who accompanied President Bush to Costa Rica, told reporters Friday: "I have no reason to deny reports that some Contras ambushed some Sandinista soldiers."  Mr. Baker's assistant for inter-American affairs, Bernard Aronson, while maintaining that the Sandinistas had also broken the cease-fire, acknowledged: "It's never very clear who starts what."  He added that the U.S. has cut off aid to some rebel units when it was determined that those units broke the cease-fire.  In addition to undermining arguments in favor of ending Contra aid, Mr. Ortega's remarks also played to the suspicions of some U.S. officials and conservatives outside the government that he is searching for ways to manipulate or void the February elections.  Administration officials traveling with President Bush in Costa Rica interpreted Mr. Ortega's wavering as a sign that he isn't responding to the military attacks so much as he is searching for ways to strengthen his hand prior to the elections.  Mr. Abrams said that Mr. Ortega is seeking to demobilize the Contras prior to the elections to remove any pressure to hold fair elections.  "My sense is what they have in mind is an excuse for clamping down on campaigning" by creating an atmosphere of a military emergency, he said.  Milton Petrie, chairman of Petrie Stores Corp., said he has agreed to sell his 15.2% stake in Deb Shops Corp. to Petrie Stores.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Petrie said that on Oct. 26 Petrie Stores agreed to purchase Mr. Petrie's 2,331,100 Deb Shops shares.  The transaction will take place tomorrow.  The filing said Petrie Stores of Secaucus, N.J., is purchasing Mr. Petrie's Deb Shops stake as an investment.  Although Petrie Stores has considered seeking to acquire the remaining equity of Deb Stores, it has no current intention to pursue such a possibility, the filing said.  Philadelphia-based Deb Shops said it saw little significance in Mr. Petrie selling his stock to Petrie Stores.  "We didn't look at it and say, `Oh my God, something is going to happen,'" said Stanley Uhr, vice president and corporate counsel.  Mr. Uhr said that Mr. Petrie or his company have been accumulating Deb Shops stock for several years, each time issuing a similar regulatory statement.  He said no discussions currently are taking place between the two companies.  Nikon Corp. said unconsolidated pretax profit increased 70% to 12.12 billion yen ($85.3 million) in the first half ended Sept. 30, from 7.12 billion yen a year ago.  The Tokyo camera maker said net income more than doubled to 5.85 billion yen, or 16.08 a share, from 2.63 billion yen, or 7.24 yen a share.  Nikon said sales rose despite the adverse effect of Japan's unpopular consumption tax, introduced in April.  Increasing personal spending and capital investment are fueling growth, the company said.  Rising export sales also contributed to strong growth, Nikon added.  Total sales gained 20% to 122.36 billion yen from 102.01 billion yen.  Exports made up 46.2% of the latest year's total, up from 39.8% a year ago.  Camera sales showed the strongest gains, rising 37% to 50.59 billion yen.  Nikon forecast sales for the year ending March 31 will rise 9.6% to 240 billion yen.  Pretax profit is expected to increase 18% to 22 billion yen and net income is expected to rise 53% to 10.5 billion yen.  Presidio Oil Co. said it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Gulf Canada Resources Ltd.'s U.S. unit for $163 million.  Presidio, a Denver oil and gas concern, said it will acquire the properties and operations of Home Petroleum Corp., which includes two regional gas-gathering systems and proved reserves of about nine million barrels of oil and 72 billion cubic feet of natural gas.  Presidio said the properties are generally situated in Wyoming, North Dakota, Texas, Oklahoma and Louisiana.  Gulf Canada, Calgary, said the transaction is part of its plan to sell non-strategic assets and focus operations on Canada, Indonesia and other international areas.  A spokesman for Gulf Canada, which is controlled by Toronto's Reichmann family, said the properties account for about 6% of the company's assets and produce about 5,000 barrels of oil and 35 million cubic feet of gas a day.  He said Gulf Canada will likely report an extraordinary gain from the sale in the fourth quarter, but he wouldn't offer a specific estimate.  The transaction is expected to close by Nov. 30.  NEC Corp., a Tokyo-based computer and electronics concern, said net income rose 18% to 29.66 billion yen ($208.7 million) in the fiscal first half, ended Sept. 30, from 25.12 billion yen a year earlier.  Sales rose 7.4% to 1.255 trillion yen from 1.168 trillion yen.  NEC said first-half computer sales totaled 555.5 billion yen, up 11% from 500.26 billion yen a year earlier.  Sales of electrical devices rose 13% to 283.8 billion yen from 251.8 billion yen.  It said sales of home electronic products advanced 3.7% to 44.92 billion yen from 43.34 billion yen.  In the period just ended, computers accounted for 44% of total sales, NEC said, and electrical devices made up 23%.  NEC forecast sales for the year ending next March 31 of 2.74 trillion yen, an increase of 27% from the previous fiscal year.  It said net income will rise 25% to 69 billion yen.  Montedison S.p.A. definitively agreed to buy all of the publicly held shares of Erbamont N.V. for $37 each.  Montedison now owns about 72% of Erbamont's shares outstanding.  The companies said the accord was unanimously approved by a special committee of Erbamont directors unaffiliated with Montedison.  Under the pact, Montedision will make a $37-a-share tender offer for Erbamont stock outstanding.  The tender offer will be followed by the sale of all of Erbamont's assets, subject to all of its liabilities, to Montedison.  Erbamont will then be liquidated, with any remaining Erbamont holders receiving a distribution of $37 a share.  The companies said the transaction is being structured this way because the laws of the Netherlands Antilles, under which Erbamont is organized, don't provide for merger transactions.  A unit of DPC Acquisition Partners launched a $10-a-share tender offer for the shares outstanding of Dataproducts Corp., and said it would seek to liquidate the computer-printer maker "as soon as possible," even if a merger isn't consummated.  DPC Acquisition is controlled by Crescott Investment Associates, Wilson Investment Group, Kernel Corp. and Catalyst Partners.  The investor group owns 1,534,600 Dataproducts common shares, or a 7.6% stake.  The offer is based on several conditions, including obtaining financing.  DPC Acquisition said it had received the reasonable assurance of Chase Manhattan Bank N.A. that the financing can be obtained.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, DPC Acquisition said it expects it will need about $215 million to buy the shares and pay related fees and expenses.  DPC Acquisition added that it has not begun discussions with financing sources, and said it expected to repay the amounts borrowed through proceeds of the liquidation.  Dataproducts officials declined to comment, and said they had not yet seen a suit filed in federal court by DPC Acquisition that seeks to nullify a standstill agreement between DPC Acquisition and Dataproducts.  Earlier this year, DPC Acquisition made a $15-a-share offer for Dataproducts, which the Dataproducts board said it rejected because the $283.7 million offer was not fully financed.  Dataproducts has since started a restructuring, and has said it is not for sale.  Jayark Corp. agreed to pay $4 million in cash, $2 million of 12% convertible debentures, and 1.6 million common shares to acquire closely held Kofcoh Imports Inc.  In over-the-counter trading Friday, Jayark was quoted at 87.5 cents bid, down 15.625 cents.  At the market price, the transaction has a total indicated value of $7.4 million.  Kofcoh is a New York holding company for Rosalco Inc., which imports furniture and other items.  David L. Koffman, president and chief executive officer of Jayark, holds about 40% of Kofcoh, Jayark said.  Jayark, New York, distributes and rents audio-visual equipment and prints promotional ads for retailers.  In the quarter ended July 31, Jayark had an average of 5.6 million shares outstanding.  The transaction is subject to approval by a panel of disinterested directors, the company said, adding that shareholder approval isn't needed.  Ajinomoto Co., a Tokyo-based food-processing concern, said net income in its first half rose 8.9% to 8.2 billion yen ($57.7 million) from 7.54 billion yen a year earlier.  Sales in the six months ended Sept. 30 were up 4.5% to 229.03 billion yen from 219.27 billion yen.  Sales were higher in all of the company's business categories, with the biggest growth coming in sales of foodstuffs such as margarine, coffee and frozen food, which rose 6.3%.  Oils and fats also did well, posting a 5.3% sales increase.  Sales in the category that includes pharmaceuticals, amino acids and chemicals rose 4.7%.  Ajinomoto predicted sales in the current fiscal year ending next March 31 of 480 billion yen, compared with 460.05 billion yen in fiscal 1989.  It said it expects full-year net of 16 billion yen, compared with 15 billion yen in the latest year.  The New York Mercantile Exchange, the world's chief oil futures marketplace, is at a critical juncture.  Several longtime observers of the commodities industry think the fortunes of the Merc over the next decade will be determined to a large extent by how well its new natural gas futures contract does and how successful its new president is in raising the level of compliance by floor traders with exchange and Commodity Futures Trading Commission rules.  If the exchange falters in these moves, they say, it might once again fall behind its chief New York competitor, the Commodity Exchange.  On Friday, the Merc's board announced that it had approved Sabine Pipe Line Co.'s Henry Hub in Erath, La., as the delivery site for its long-awaited natural gas futures contract.  It also said that it would start trading the contract as soon as the CFTC approved it.  The CFTC has 90 days to respond to such applications.  The Merc first started working on developing this contract in 1984.  Only three weeks earlier, the Merc had turned to one of its own executives, 40-year-old R. Patrick Thompson, to replace Rosemary T. McFadden as president.  Mr. Thompson is believed to have a mandate from the board of directors to help improve the Merc's tarnished reputation as an exchange whose floor traders don't follow the rules very well.  Ms. McFadden had been forced out in July in a bitter power struggle with Z. Lou Guttman, chairman and a longtime floor trader on the exchange.  Mr. Guttman told one person familiar with the New York exchanges during the search for a replacement that he was looking for a president who would be "responsive to the needs of the membership and the board."  Mr. Thompson first came to the exchange in 1981 and has been executive vice president since March 1988.  He previously held posts of senior vice president of compliance and senior vice president and general counsel.  By contrast, the Comex in July imported a highly regarded outsider, Arnold F. Staloff, as its president.  Mr. Staloff, 44, was a senior officer of the Philadelphia Stock Exchange and is considered a specialist in new financial products.  Mr. Thompson isn't bereft of experience with new products, however.  For the past two years, he said, he and the exchange's research department have been working on the new natural gas contract, seeking a good delivery site and studying the natural gas market.  "Our members are eager to begin trading this contract, so we expect no difficulty in attracting locals to the natural gas pit," he said.  The educational effort of teaching companies in the natural gas industry how to use the futures to hedge would have to continue for another a year or two, he added.  The Merc's extremely successful contracts in crude oil, gasoline and heating oil have made it the largest futures exchange in New York, and third behind the Chicago Board of Trade and Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  In a recent interview, Mr. Thompson said the biggest problem facing all commodity exchanges was one of image.  Earlier this year, the U.S. attorney indicted 45 floor traders and one clerk at the two big Chicago exchanges.  Federal authorities in New York started investigating exchanges in May, though no indictments have been handed down there.  So far they have issued scores of subpoenas, some of which went to members of the New York Merc.  Mr. Thompson will have to face some of the consequences of those subpoenas.  In a recent General Accounting Office study, the Merc was found to have been the most lax in enforcing exchange rules.  It levied the smallest number of suspensions of traders and fines of the four largest commodity exchanges studied over the past five years.  It also had both the fewest, and least experienced, investigators per million contracts traded.  The Merc received considerable criticism in 1987 when it was discovered that its compliance director, Kevin P. Conway, who then was responsible for policing the exchange's busy oil and metal pits, "was engaged in other personal business activities on Exchange time," including out-of-state trips, according to a New York Merc report prepared last year.  Mr. Conway is no longer at the exchange.  "We had a management breakdown in 1987 in terms of compliance," Mr. Thompson says.  "We recognized the problem and took care of it."  He says that even if the natural gas contract boosts volume at the exchange strongly, the 1990 business plan calls for having adequate compliance people to ensure that exchange rules are being followed.  For years the five New York exchanges have been talking about cooperating in various aspects of their business in order to improve the efficiency of their operations.  Periodically, there has even been talk of mergers between one or more exchanges.  So far there is little to show for such efforts.  Mr. Thompson believes the case for working together is stronger now than ever.  "The cost of competition has become extremely high," he says.  "We must find ways to save money for the futures commission merchants who do business on our exchanges."  He thinks that progress in cooperation can be made in areas where no vested interests have built up.  One of those areas is the development of a hand-held electronic device that would permit floor traders to enter trades as they make them.  The GAO has recommended the creation of a system to record trade data so that an independent, verifiable audit trail can be established to prevent customer fraud.  The Merc is now cooperating with the Comex in developing such a device to provide such an audit trail.  The Chicago exchanges also are working on such a device.  Another major electronics problem faces Mr. Thompson -- the creation of a 24-hour trading system that can be used outside normal trading hours.  In January, the New York Merc signed a letter of intent with the Chicago Merc as a preliminary step to joining their electronic system called Globex.  But in May, the Chicago Merc said it was looking into creating a common system with the Chicago Board of Trade, and it suspended negotiations with the New York Merc.  Mr. Thompson says his exchange isn't waiting for the results of the Chicago exchanges' cooperation.  It recently began a pilot program to test an electronic trading system called ATS/2, the automated trading system created by the International Commodities Clearing House.  Looking ahead to commodity markets this week:  Copper  Michael Frawley, metals trader for PaineWebber Inc. in New York, said there is good technical support between $1.10 and $1.12 a pound for December copper, which ended Friday at $1.1580 a pound, up 1.6 cents.  He views the $1.10 to $1.12 range as a buying opportunity and considers the market oversold.  "I think the market could pop up to the $1.22 to $1.25 level without too much difficulty," he said.  But he said it won't climb further and he expects it to remain in a trading range between $1.10 and $1.25.  He noted that the equity markets will set the tone for the industrial metals this week and traders should keep an eye on Wall Street.  William O'Neill, research director for Elders Futures Inc. in New York, said for a rally to occur, there must be demand from the Far East.  He added that talk of strike settlements at producing mines has been fully discounted.  However, to resume the bull trend, according to Mr. O'Neill, copper would have to close over $1.19.  He said there are two reports this week that might affect prices: the purchasing managers report on Wednesday and the unemployment report on Friday.  Precious Metals  Friday's strong price gains confirmed a turnaround in the precious metals markets, according to PaineWebber's Mr. Frawley.  "Most traders will be looking to buy {on} pullbacks," he said.  He thought the moves in the metals last week were most influenced by the uncertainty in the equity and other financial markets.  According to Mr. Frawley, floor traders say there is good support for December gold in the $374 to $375 per ounce area, around $5.20 an ounce for December silver and in the $485 to $490 an ounce range for January platinum.  William O'Neill, research director for Elders Futures Inc. in New York, said the price action for all of last week is the best he has seen on a weekly basis in more than a year.  He said last week's activity in gold could portend a move to $390 an ounce for the December contract.  He also said traders should keep an eye on the stock market, because "if the stock market rallies, that could spell trouble for the precious metals."  He said traders should be on the lookout for how metals producers react to this rally.  "I expect to see some selling, but will they kill this one as they have every rally in the recent past" by selling and locking in prices for their production?  He noted that for the first time in months there was some light investor interest in the metals.  Grains And Soybeans  Prices this week will likely be dominated by reports on the progress of the corn and soybean harvest as well as by speculation about more purchases of U.S. crops by the Soviet Union.  In recent weeks, warm and dry weather has sped the Midwest harvest and that is permitting farmers to rebuild the stockpiles that were cut by the 1988 drought.  If the weather allowed farmers to work in their fields over the weekend, many Midwest grain elevators will probably sell futures contracts today at the Chicago Board of Trade in order to hedge their weekend purchases from farmers.  That selling of futures contracts by elevators is what helps keep downward pressure on crop prices during the harvest.  Traders will also watch for whether the Soviet Union continues its traditional fall buying of U.S. grain.  So far this month, the Soviets have bought about 7.2 million metric tons of U.S. corn.  There may be some activity in soybean prices this week as investors try to get rid of the contract for November delivery.  Investors usually don't want to take physical delivery of a contract, preferring instead to profit from its price swings and then end any obligation to take delivery or make delivery as it nears expiration.  Employees of the Globe and Mail, a Thomson Corp. newspaper in Toronto, voted to accept a tentative contract agreement Saturday, averting a strike at Canada's leading daily.  Under the terms of the three-year contract, similar to one reached at Torstar Corp.'s Toronto Star newspaper earlier this month, the 500 Globe and Mail workers will see a raise of 8% in the contract's first year and 7% in each of the following two years.  Lorne Slotnick, vice chairman of the Southern Ontario Newspaper Guild, the union representing the workers, said Thomson made significant concessions in the final round of talks.  In addition to wage increases, the union negotiated improved vacation plans, benefit packages and pension plans, Mr. Slotnick said.  He said more than 70% of the bargaining unit voted in favor of the agreement.  Wall Street is just about ready to line the bird cage with paper stocks.  For three years, a healthy economy and the export-boosting effects of a weak dollar propelled sales and earnings of the big paper companies to record levels.  As the good times rolled they more than doubled their prices for pulp, a raw material used in all sorts of paper, to $830 a metric ton this past spring from $380 a ton at the start of 1986.  But now the companies are getting into trouble because they undertook a record expansion program while they were raising prices sharply.  Third-quarter profits fell at several companies.  "Put your money in a good utility or bank stock, not a paper company," advises George Adler of Smith Barney.  Other analysts are nearly as pessimistic.  Gary Palmero of Oppenheimer & Co. expects a 30% decline in earnings between now and 1991 for "commodity-oriented" paper companies, which account for the majority of the industry.  Robert Schneider of Duff & Phelps sees paper-company stock prices falling 10% to 15% in 1990, perhaps 25% if there's a recession.  Paper companies concede that business has been off recently.  But they attribute much of the weakness to customer inventory reductions.  Generally they maintain that, barring a recession and a further strengthening of the dollar against foreign currencies, the industry isn't headed for a prolonged slump.  "It won't be an earthshaking drop," a Weyerhaeuser spokesman says.  Last week Mr. Adler lowered his rating from hold to "avoid" on Boise Cascade, Champion International, Great Northern Nekoosa, International Paper, Louisiana Pacific and Weyerhaeuser.  Oppenheimer's Mr. Palmero, meanwhile, is steering clear of Gaylord Container, Stone Container and Federal Paper Board.  Mr. Schneider is cool to Georgia Pacific and Abitibi-Price.  Lawrence Ross of PaineWebber would avoid Union Camp.  The companies in question believe the analysts are too pessimistic.  Great Northern Nekoosa said, "The odds of the dire predictions about us being right are small."  International Paper emphasizes that it is better positioned than most companies for the coming overcapacity because its individual mills can make more than one grade of paper.  A Boise-Cascade spokesman referred to a speech by Chairman John Fery, in which he said that markets generally are stable, although some risk of further price deterioration exists.  Stone Container Chairman Roger Stone said that, unlike for some other paper products, demand for Stone's principal commodity, unbleached containerboard, remains strong.  He expects the price for that product to rise even more next year.  Gaylord Container said analysts are skeptical of it because it's carrying a lot of debt.  Champion International said, "We've gotten our costs down and we're better positioned for any cyclical downturn than we've ever been."  Louisiana Pacific and Georgia Pacific said a number of other analysts are recommending them because of their strong wood-products business.  Federal Paper Board said, "We're not as exposed as the popular perception of us."  The company explained that its main product, bleached paperboard, which goes into some advertising materials and white boxes, historically doesn't have sharp price swings.  Because the stock prices of some paper companies already reflect an expected profit slump, PaineWebber's Mr. Ross says he thinks that next year the share prices of some companies may fall at most only 5% to 10%.  A company such as Federal Paper Board may be overly discounted and looks "tempting" to him, he says, though he isn't yet recommending the shares.  Wall Street isn't avoiding everything connected with paper.  Mr. Palmero recommends Temple-Inland, explaining that it is "virtually the sole major paper company not undergoing a major capacity expansion," and thus should be able to lower long-term debt substantially next year.  A Temple-Inland spokesman said the company expects record earnings in 1989, and "we're still pretty bullish" on 1990.  The analysts say their gloomy forecasts have a flip side.  Some take a warm view of consumer-oriented paper companies, which buy pulp from the commodity producers and should benefit from the expected declines in pulp prices.  Estimates on how much pulp prices will fall next year currently run between $150 and $250 a metric ton.  Analysts agree that the price drop should especially benefit the two big tissue makers, Scott Paper and Kimberly-Clark.  A spokesman for Scott says that assuming the price of pulp continues to soften, "We should do well."  Shoney's Inc. said it will report a write-off of $2.5 million, or seven cents a share, for its fourth quarter ended yesterday.  The restaurant operator cited transaction costs from its 1988 recapitalization as a result of a $160 million restructuring of its bank debt.  The write-off will be reported as an extraordinary item in the company's 1989 operating results.  In addition, the effective interest rate on the $410 million of total remaining bank debt after the restructuring is 10.66%.  The combined effect of these changes is expected to save the company about $4 million in interest expenses next year, or six cents a share.  Shoney's said the latest restructuring affected bank indebtedness that was incurred to finance $585 million of the company's $728 million recapitalization that took place in 1988.  The company has made payments of $175 million against the original $585 million of bank debt incurred in connection with the recapitalization.  These payments consisted of $54 million in scheduled payments and $121 million in prepayments, funded by $82.8 million from operating cash flow, zero-coupon subordinated debt and assets sales.  ABB Asea Brown Boveri B.V. said it signed a contract for the largest-ever power plant order in the Netherlands.  ABB said the contract, signed with the Dutch utility N.V. Energieproduktiebedrijf UNA, is valued in excess of $200 million.  The accord is for a turbogenerator plant at the coal-fired power station Hemweg in Amsterdam.  ABB Asea Brown Boveri is the Dutch unit of the Swedish-Swiss electrical engineering group ABB Asea Brown Boveri AG.  ABB said a significant portion of the order will be placed with Dutch subcontractors, adding that a group has been set up for this purpose.  The Dutch utility firm serves the Amsterdam and Utrecht areas.  The planned turbogenerator plant is expected to go into operation in 1994.  Nissan Motor Co. expects net income to reach 120 billion yen (U.S. $857 million) in its current fiscal year, up from 114.6 billion yen in the previous year, Yutaka Kume, president, said.  Mr. Kume made the earnings projection for fiscal 1990, ending next March 31, in an interview with U.S. automotive writers attending the Tokyo Motor Show.  The executive said that the anticipated earnings increase is fairly modest because Nissan is spending heavily to bolster its dealership network in Japan and because of currency-exchange fluctuations.  During the next decade, Mr. Kume said, Nissan plans to boost overseas vehicle production sufficiently to account for a majority of sales outside Japan.  Last year, Mr. Kume said, Nissan exported slightly over one million vehicles, and produced 570,000 cars and trucks at its factories in North America, Europe and Australia.  But by 1992, he added, Nissan will build one million vehicles a year outside Japan, or sufficient to equal exports.  "By the end of the 1990s," he said, "we want to be producing roughly two vehicles overseas for every vehicle that we export from Japan."  That will involve a substantial increase in overseas manufacturing capacity, he acknowledged, but didn't provide specific details.  National Intergroup Inc. said it expects to report a charge of $5.3 million related to the sale of its aluminum unit's extrusion division for the third quarter.  The company said it has agreed to sell the extrusion division for $15 million to R.D. Werner Co., a closely held firm based in Greenville, Pa.  The charge is offset by an after-tax gain of about $30 million in the quarter from the previously announced pact to sell National Aluminum's rolling division.  National Intergroup in the year-ago third quarter earned $22.5 million, or 97 cents a share, including a gain of $18 million from the sale of a steel tube company.  Revenue was $778.6 million.  The company also said it continues to explore all options concerning the possible sale of National Aluminum's 54.5% stake in an aluminum smelter in Hawesville, Ky.  The sale of the extrusion division is subject to audit adjustments for working capital changes through the closing.  The agreement also provides for potential payments of additional proceeds to National Aluminum over the next two years, depending on the plant's shipping levels.  The extrusion unit produces bare and painted custom extrusions for building products and construction industries.  In fiscal 1989, it had sales of about $40 million and an operating loss of $1.5 million.  The municipal bond market is bracing for tough times through the end of the year as it struggles to absorb an oversupply of bonds and two of its best customers turn into sellers.  Commercial banks and property/casualty insurers, which together own about 36% of all municipal bonds, have been dumping their securities for weeks.  Last week, traders said, there were three institutional sellers for every buyer.  "Every day we're getting new bid lists" from would-be sellers, one trader said.  "Most dealers cannot continue to absorb this supply."  As a result, yields on long-term muni bonds now stand at about 95% of long-term Treasury yields, the highest such level in more than two years.  "There is incredible negative psychology building in the market," said Donna Avedisian, a vice president at Merrill Lynch & Co. "People are very concerned about who is going to step up to the plate and buy municipal bonds in the absence of institutional buyers."  The yield on a group of 25 revenue bonds compiled by the Bond Buyer, a trade publication, now exceeds 7.50%.  At this week's New York City bond sale, traders expect yields on the 20-year New York bonds to nearly match the 7.9% yield on 30-year Treasury bonds.  For an investor in the 28% federal tax bracket, 7.9% tax-free is the same as 10.38% on a taxable investment.  That's a taxable-equivalent yield nearly three percentage points more than the current yield on 30-year Treasury bonds.  How quickly things change.  This past summer, investors' appetite for municipal bonds seemed insatiable.  Individuals eager for tax-free income drove up bond prices, making state and local government debt one of the best-performing types of fixed-income investments during the period.  But while analysts say that municipal bonds still offer good value, you wouldn't know it by the way institutional investors are rushing to dump their holdings.  Bond market analysts say the institutional selling was triggered by several factors.  Big banks such as Chemical Bank and Chase Manhattan, which have been taking heavy charges to expand their Third World loan-loss reserves, aren't looking for tax-exempt income.  "We don't need the shelter of tax-free bonds," said a spokeswoman at Chemical.  In recent weeks, traders said, Chemical has sold more than $1 billion of tax-free bonds.  The spokeswoman confirmed that the bank has significantly reduced its muni holdings, but couldn't immediately confirm the amount.  Insurance companies are rushing to sell before the end of the year, when some of their tax benefits associated with municipal bonds will be phased out.  There is speculation that property/casualty firms will sell even more munis as they scramble to raise cash to pay claims related to Hurricane Hugo and the Northern California earthquake.  Fundamental factors are at work as well.  Muni bond holders are worried about the impact of a slowing economy on tax revenue, at a time when many state and local governments already face budget deficits and huge spending needs.  The recent natural disasters, and the need of many other cities to rebuild crumbling infrastructure, suggests that supply of new issues will continue to rise sharply -- even as demand tapers off.  "There is just so much going on that it's difficult to pick just one factor that's driving the market," said Ronald Ian Heller, vice president at First Chicago Capital Markets Inc., a subsidiary of First Chicago Corp.  Some of the recent selling could actually be considered a positive sign.  Mutual funds, for example, are said to be selling existing municipal bonds to raise cash to buy new issues.  Because municipal bonds yields have risen at a time when interest rates generally have fallen, some portfolio managers are assuming that bonds bought now will appreciate in value as the municipal bond market rebounds.  Ms. Avedisian believes that the mutual funds are selling muni bonds that have a negative convexity -- those that have appreciated in price slowly relative to the decline in interest rates.  Such bonds, she says, are those that are nearing their call date.  But traders said the market's tone could pick up this week if New York City's $787 million bond offering goes well.  The offering will include $729 million of 20-year tax-exempt bonds and $57.8 million of taxable bonds.  A few weeks ago, New York sold $750 million of tax-exempts.  New York City bonds have been beaten down for three straight weeks.  On Friday, some issues fell nearly one point, or close to $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  The sell-off in New York City bonds was triggered by concerns about the city's financial health and political uncertainty in view of the impending mayoral election.  The city's economy is growing weaker and expenditures are rising as tax revenue is falling.  "The city has issued so much supply recently that some people are getting a little concerned.  They'd like to see some other names in their portfolios," said Michael S. Appelbaum, first vice president at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  But he thinks investors may be overreacting to the market's problems.  Overall, he says, municipal prices are "very cheap" and represent an "excellent buying opportunity."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Treasury bonds fell sharply on confusion about this week's Treasury debt auction and rumors that a major Japanese investor was unloading large amounts of long-term bonds.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond ended at a price of 102 2/32, down nearly 5/8 point from Thursday, or about $6.25 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield rose to 7.93% from 7.88%.  Late Thursday, the Treasury said it needed to raise $17 billion quickly and would do so by issuing new securities this week.  Credit market analysts expected the Treasury to cancel today's three-month and six-month sale and to sell $17 billion of cash management bills.  Instead, the Treasury announced it would sell $2 billion of 51-day cash management bills today and said that the weekly sale of $15.6 billion of three-month and six-month bills will take place today, as usual, but the sale will settle tomorrow instead of Thursday.  By moving the settlement date ahead, the Treasury can raise money under the $2.87 trillion debt ceiling that is in effect through tomorrow, after which it reverts to $2.8 trillion.  The market also was hurt by rumors that Nippon Kangyo Kakumaru, a Japanese brokerage firm, was unloading some of the 30-year bonds it recently purchased.  One dealer said the talk was that the firm sold about $500 million of bellwether 30-year bonds.  The firm is thought to have purchased up to $3 billion of 30-year bonds in a buying spree on Wednesday and the previous Thursday.  Dealers say the firm apparently has wanted to publicize its recent buying and subsequent selling of 30-year bonds by using Cantor Fitzgerald Securities Corp. as a broker.  Cantor provides price quotes to Telerate Systems Inc., a widely used electronic system.  Nippon Kangyo's moves puzzled traders and created confusion among potential investors, many of whom decided to stay out of the market.  As a result of its large-scale buying, some analysts now say that liquidity, or the ability to easily buy and sell, has been constrained in the benchmark Treasury bond issue.  In other markets:  -- The junk bonds of RJR Nabisco Inc. rallied Friday on news that the company is selling its candy bar brands to Nestle Foods Corp. for $370 million.  The sale price, which was above Wall Street expectations, sent many RJR securities up by one point.  "It shows that there are buyers of high-quality assets at high prices in today's market," said Robert Long, managing director and head of the high-yield research department at First Boston Corp.  Many of the RJR securities, which had been trading near their 52-week lows earlier in the session, bounced back after the company's announcement that it agreed to sell its Baby Ruth, Butterfinger and Pearson candy businesses to Nestle Foods, a unit of the Swiss-based food concern.  The sale, expected to close before the end of the year, also includes a manufacturing plant in Franklin Park, Ill.  RJR's subordinated discount debentures of 2001, which traded as low as 45 Friday, finished the day at 46 7/8.  Other RJR securities also closed higher.  RJR Holdings Capital Corp.'s 14.7% convertible pay-in-kind securities maturing in 2009 closed 1/2 higher at 86 1/2 after trading as low as 85 1/4.  Most other junk bond issues finished a quarter-point lower on rumors that Campeau Corp. was filing for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code.  A spokesman for Campeau called the rumors "ridiculous."  Most investment-grade bonds fell 3/8 to 1/2 point.  -- Mortgage securities fell 7/32 to 8/32 but held up better than intermediate Treasurys.  Dealers said some defensive investors were buyers of mortgages, as were dealers seeking collateral for REMICs priced earlier last week.  Among major issues, Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for November delivery ended at 98 12/32, down 8/32 point for a yield of about 9.35% to a 12-year average life assumption.  The premium the elderly pay for coverage of doctor's bills under Part B of the Medicare health insurance plan will rise to $29 a month in 1990 from $27.90, the Department of Health and Human Services said.  In addition, a second Part B premium to cover the cost of the new program of insurance against catastrophic illness will rise to $4.90 a month from $4, if Congress doesn't change the program.  The House has voted to repeal most of the Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, however, which would end the monthly catastrophic-care premium, as well as an unpopular income surtax paid by about 40% of the wealthier Medicare beneficiaries.  Under a less-sweeping Senate plan, the catastrophic-care monthly premium would continue, rising to $4.90 next year, but the surtax would be abolished.  Medicare Part B pays 80% of a beneficiary's allowable doctor's bills after an annual deductible of $75.  The Catastrophic Coverage Act would add a stop-loss provision next year to limit the maximum beneficiaries must pay for doctors.  Both the House and Senate bills to reduce the cost and coverage of the catastrophic-care plan would eliminate the cap on doctor's bills.  If the House prevails in its efforts to kill the catastrophic-care plan, the monthly Part B premium will be $29 next year.  If the Senate plan prevails, the premium will be $33.90, with the additional $4.90 going to pay for expanded hospital coverage under Part A of Medicare.  Most of Part A's costs are paid by a payroll tax on workers and employers.  Lockheed Corp. said it will trim its Aeronautical Systems work force in California and Georgia by several hundred workers, reflecting the defense industry's decline.  The Lockheed unit has 24,000 workers; it expects to make the cuts through a combination of furloughs, attrition and retirements.  The reductions should be complete by the end of the year, a spokesman said, adding that the exact number to be cut hasn't been determined.  Lockheed reported a $32 million third-quarter net loss, largely because of cost overruns on fixed-price military contracts.  Noting that other defense contractors are complaining of losses on such contracts, analysts say taxpayers have been getting illusionary bargains on weapons systems in recent years.  Defense contractors "cannot continue to get contracts on that basis," said Howard Rubel, an analyst with C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. in New York.  "The pain is too great."  Jim Pattison Industries Ltd., one of a group of closely held companies owned by entrepreneur James Pattison, said it "intends to seek control" of 30%-owned Innopac Inc., a Toronto packaging concern.  Jim Pattison Industries, a holding company with annual sales of about C$1.9 billion, largely from car dealerships and grocery stores, didn't elaborate on the statement, and a company official declined further comment.  The company said it currently holds about 4.2 million of Innopac's 13.8 million common shares outstanding, which have an aggregate market value of about 137.8 million Canadian dollars (US$117.3 million).  Separately, Innopac reported a fourth-quarter loss of about C$2.6 million, or 18 Canadian cents a share, reflecting inventory write-downs.  The results made net income for the year ended Aug. 31 C$2.7 million, or 20 Canadian cents a share, down from C$9.7 million, or 70 Canadian cents a share last year.  Revenue was C$291.6 million, up from C$252 million in 1988.  Martin Fabi, Innopac's president and chief executive, said Innopac viewed Mr. Pattison's decision to seek control as a "very positive" move.  "I'm happy that he feels positively about our company," he said.  Mr. Fabi wouldn't say directly whether Mr. Pattison has disclosed potential terms for his planned bid for control.  Among other things, Innopac is involved in recycling polystyrene foam products that are often used by fast food chains, such as McDonald's Corp., for food packaging.  A joint venture involving units of Innopac and Mobil Corp. earlier this year opened the first U.S. polystyrene recycling plant, in Leominster, Mass.  PROGRAM TRADING is being curbed by more securities firms, but big institutional investors are expected to continue the practice, further roiling the stock market.  Bowing to criticism, Bear Stearns, Morgan Stanley and Oppenheimer joined PaineWebber in suspending stock-index arbitrage trading for their own accounts.  Still, stock-index funds are expected to continue launching big programs through the market.  Several Big Board firms are organizing to complain about program trading and the exchange's role in it.  The effort is being led by Contel.  ---  Personal spending rose 0.2% in September, the smallest gain in a year.  The slowdown raises questions about the economy's strength because spending fueled much of the third-quarter GNP growth.  Meanwhile, personal income edged up 0.3%.  Factory owners are buying new machinery at a healthy rate this fall, machine-tool makers say.  But weak car sales raise questions about future demand from the auto sector.  ---  Southern's Gulf Power unit may plead guilty this week to charges it illegally steered company money to politicians through third parties.  The tentative pact would resolve part of a broad investigation of the Atlanta-based company in the past year.  ---  LIN Broadcasting and BellSouth sweetened their plan to merge cellular phone operations, offering LIN holders a special $42-a-share payout.  But the new pact will force huge debt on the new firm and could still fail to thwart rival suitor McCaw Cellular.  ---  Unisys posted a $648.2 million loss for the third quarter as it moved quickly to take write-offs for various problems and prepare for a turnaround.  But some analysts wonder how strong the recovery will be.  ---  RJR Nabisco agreed to sell three candy businesses to Nestle for $370 million.  The accord helps RJR pay off debt and boosts Nestle's 7% share of the U.S. candy market to 12%.  --- GM and Ford are expected to go head to head in the markets to buy up rival 15% stakes in Jaguar.  GM confirmed it received U.S. antitrust clearance to boost its holding.  ---  Sansui Electric agreed to sell a 51% stake to Polly Peck of Britain for $110 million.  Still, analysts said the accord doesn't suggest Japan is opening up to more foreign takeovers.  ---  Kellogg suspended work on a $1 billion cereal plant, indicating a pessimistic outlook by the cereal maker, which has been losing market share.  ---  Insurers could see claims totaling nearly $1 billion from the San Francisco earthquake, far less than the $4 billion from Hurricane Hugo.  ---  Nashua strengthened its poison-pill plan after announcing a Dutch firm is seeking to buy up to 25% of the New Hampshire copier company.  ---  Mobil is cutting back its U.S. oil and gas exploration and production group by up to 15% as part of a restructuring of the business.  ---  Markets ---  Stocks: Volume 170,330,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2596.72, off 17.01; transportation 1190.43, off 14.76; utilities 215.86, up 0.19.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3406.31, off 19.29.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.49, up 0.27; spot index 130.80, off 0.24.  Dollar: 141.65 yen, off 0.45; 1.8300 marks, off 0.0100.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  Thomas Jefferson sold Congress on the idea of the decimal system for currency, thus saving Americans the headaches of pounds, shillings and pence.  But he struck out with the decimal system of metric weights and measures the French had invented.  Instead, Congress opted for the inches, feet and yards the colonists had brought with them.  Americans didn't dislike metrics; they simply ignored them.  Scientists felt differently.  In 1807, the Swiss mathematician who headed the U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey made an "iron meter" that he had brought from Europe the standard of measure.  By the end of the century scientists had embraced the system.  Businessmen took their cue from the engineers.  When Congress finally passed the Metric Conversion Act in 1975, industry was far ahead.  Because the law made compliance voluntary, it inspired little more than jokes. (The press had a field day with questions about what would happen to "six-footer," "yardstick" and "inchworm.")  Today, though the public is barely aware, much of U.S. industry, particularly companies manufacturing or selling overseas, have made metrics routine.  General Motors, for example, uses metric terms for its automobile bodies and power trains. (In auto advertising, however, items such as wheelbases are still described in inches.) Farm-machine makers such as Caterpillar and Deere work in the metric system.  The liquor industry went metric 10 years ago.  The Pentagon has led the charge, particularly as military alliances spread world-wide.  New weapons systems will be around until the next century, notes John Tascher, the Defense Department's metric coordinator.  Still, like the auto makers, when dealing with Mr. Everyman the Pentagon sticks to the tried and true.  Soldiers and sailors are still measured in inches and pounds.  Whittle Communications L.P., which for months has fought a public relations battle with education leaders, said it has signed 500 schools in 24 states to subscribe to the controversial Channel One news program and its sister programs.  Channel One, a satellite-delivered daily program supported by advertising, is scheduled to be launched next March.  Whittle said its field staff signed up the 500 schools in 238 school districts after only eight weeks and company executives now expect to reach their start-up goal of 1,000 schools before the end of this year.  Christopher Whittle, chairman of the Knoxville, Tenn., media company that is 50% owned by Time Warner Inc., said that by December 1990 he expects to have Channel One installed in about 8,000 schools with a potential audience of six million.  Installation of the TV system, which includes providing free 19-inch TV sets in classrooms, begins in January.  "What we've done in eight weeks shows we won't have enormous difficulties getting to the place we want to be," said Mr. Whittle.  He said his sales force is signing up schools at the rate of 25 a day.  In California and New York, state officials have opposed Channel One.  Mr. Whittle said private and parochial schools in both states will be canvassed to see if they are interested in getting the programs.  Subscribing schools get the 12-minute daily Channel One news program, whose four 30-second TV ads during each show have drawn protests from educators.  Subscribers also get the Classroom Channel, which will feature ad-free educational programming similar to some public-TV shows, and the Educator's Channel, which will offer instructional programming for teachers and school administrators and will be supported by advertising.  Whittle has met some resistance.  The Educational Network, as Mr. Whittle has named the three programs, has been offered to 1,290 school districts and Whittle continues to negotiate with 919 districts.  About 10% of the school districts approached have rejected the network.  Mr. Whittle said that so far, three of the six schools that carried the program in a five-week test last spring have subscribed to the program.  One of the test schools, Withrow High School in Cincinnati, rejected the project.  John Bruner, associate director of communications for Cincinnati Public Schools, said Channel One was rejected because students watching the program didn't fare particularly better on a 28-question current events quiz than a control school without the program and school absences were almost unchanged during the period when the program was being aired.  "The number of correct responses was 45% on the test and school absences didn't change much," said Mr. Bruner.  "The pilot program was received well (by teachers and students), but there wasn't reason enough to sign up.  We even invited the public to stop by and see the program, but there wasn't much interest."  Advertisers are showing interest.  Last month, Whittle announced it had sold $150 million in advertising time on the network to national advertisers.  Mr. Whittle Friday said several more advertisers have been added.  Whittle is spending $150 million initially to launch the network.  Installation of satellite dishes, TVs and videocassette equipment will cost the company about $20,000 per school, Mr. Whittle said.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S TREASURY  @ Today  $15.6 billion of three-month and six-month bills. $2 billion of 51-day cash management bills.  @ Corporate  @ One Day This Week  Associated Natural Gas Corp. -- 1.4 million common shares, via Dillon Read & Co.  B & H Crude Carriers Ltd. -- Four million common shares, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  Chemical Banking Corp. -- 14 million common shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Chemex Pharmaceuticals Inc. -- 1.2 million units consisting of two shares of common stock and one common warrant, via PaineWebber Inc.  Comcast Corp. -- $150 million convertible debentures, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Energy Service Co. -- 9.5 million common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  Harmonia Bancorp Inc. -- 4,750,000 common shares, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Healthsource Inc. -- Two million common shares, via Kidder, Peabody & Co.  Immune Response Corp. -- Three million common shares, via Merrill Lynch.  Marsam Pharmaceuticals Inc. -- 1.3 million common shares, via Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co.  Potash Corp. of Saskatchewan Inc. -- 13 million common shares, via Merrill Lynch.  Municipal  @ Tuesday  New Jersey Wastewater Treatment Trust -- $75,075,000 of various bonds, including $40.86 million Wastewater Treatment insured bonds, Series 1989A, and $34,215,000 Wastewater Treatment bonds, Series 1989B, via competitive bid.  @ Wednesday  Eastern Municipal Water District, Calif. -- $56,565,000 of 1989 certificates of participation (treatment plant projects), via competitive bid.  @ One Day In The Week  California Health Facilities Financing Authority -- $114 million of health facility revenue bonds (Catholic Healthcare West), Series 1989A, via a First Boston Corp. group.  Detroit -- $130 million of distributable state aid bonds, via a Chemical Securities Inc. group.  Maryland Community Development Administration, Department of Housing and Community Development -- $80 million of single-family program bonds, 1989 4th and 5th Series, via a Merrill Lynch group.  Matagorda County Navigation District No. 1, Texas -- $70,315,000 of pollution control revenue Alternative Minimum Tax (AMT) bonds (South Texas Project Units No. 1 and 2), via a Goldman Sachs group.  New York City -- $786,860,000 of bonds, Fiscal 1990 Series C and D, including $729.04 million tax-exempt bonds and $57.82 million taxable bonds, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Santa Ana Redevelopment Agency -- $107 million of tax allocation bonds, 1989 Series A-D, via a Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. group.  Pending Shelby County, Tenn. -- $80 million of refunding bonds, Series 1989, via a First Tennessee Bank group.  Hewlett-Packard Co. said it raised its stake in Octel Communications Corp. to 8.5% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Hewlett-Packard said it now holds 1,384,119 Octel common shares, including 100,000 shares bought from Aug. 26 to Oct. 20 for $23.31 to $24.25 a share.  Hewlett-Packard, a Palo Alto, Calif., computer company, said it acquired the stock "to develop and maintain a strategic partnership in which each company remains independent while working together to market and sell their products."  Octel said the purchase was expected.  Hewlett-Packard affirmed it doesn't plan to obtain control of Octel, a Milpitas, Calif., maker of voice-processing systems.  According to the filing, Hewlett-Packard acquired 730,070 common shares from Octel as a result of an Aug. 10, 1988, stock purchase agreement.  That accord also called for Hewlett-Packard to buy 730,070 Octel shares in the open market within 18 months.  In addition, Hewlett-Packard acquired a two-year option to buy an extra 10%, of which half may be sold directly to Hewlett-Packard by Octel.  Following is a weekly listing of unadited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @Adams Express NYSE 19.12 16 1/4 - 15.01  @Baker Fentress NYSE 27.98 22 - 21.37  @Blue Chip Value NYSE 7.61 7 1/8 - 6.37  @Clemente Global Gro NYSE b11.19 9 1/8 - 18.45  @Gemini II Capital NYSE 18.92 16 1/2 - 12.79  @Gemini II Income NYSE 10.07 12 7/8 + 27.86  @General Amerinvest NYSE 22.20 18 3/4 - 15.54  @Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.52 9 3/4 - 7.32  @Lehman Corp. NYSE 15.84 13 - 17.93  @Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.46 7 5/8 - 19.40  @Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.28 14 1/8 - 18.26  @Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 10.87 9 1/2 - 12.60  @Quest for Value Cap NYSE 16.73 12 1/8 - 27.53  @Quest for Value Inco NYSE 11.69 12 1/2 + 6.93  @Royal Value Trust NYSE 10.70 9 1/4 - 13.55  @Schafer Value Trust NYSE 11.70 10 1/8 - 13.46  @Source Capital NYSE 42.57 42 1/4 - 0.75  @Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 28.61 23 3/8 - 18.30  @Worldwide Value NYSE 20.14 17 - 15.59  @Zweig Fund NYSE 11.06 11 5/8 + 5.11  Closed End Bond Funds  @CIM High Yield Secs AMEX a7.94 7 1/4 - 8.69  @Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b8.75 10 + 14.29  @Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b8.81 8 3/8 - 4.94  @Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.51 9 1/2 - 0.11  @Zenith Income Fund NYSE 7.33 7 1/8 - 2.80  Flexible Portfolio Funds  @America's All Season OTC 5.75 5 1/4 - 8.70  @America's All S Inco OTC 9.10 9 1/2 + 4.40  @Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.54 9 3/4 + 2.20  Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @American Capital Conv NYSE 23.58 20 5/8 - 12.53  @ASA Ltd. NYSE bc58.11 46 - 20.84  @Asia Pacific NYSE 14.08 12 3/4 - 9.45  @Austria Fund NYSE 10.59 11 5/8 + 9.77  @Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.46 18 1/2 - 13.79  @Bergstrom Capital AMEX 64.17 61 1/8 - 4.75  @BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.45 10 1/8 - 11.57  @Brazil NYSE 24.61 11 5/8 - 52.76  @CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.13 5 3/8 - 44.47  @CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.42 11 3/4 + 24.73  @Castle Convertible AMEX 21.78 19 1/8 - 12.19  @Central Fund Canada AMEX b5.02 4 13/16 - 4.13  @Central Securities AMEX 12.60 10 - 20.63  @Chile Fund NYSE z z z  @Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.06 9 7/8 - 18.12  @Cypress Fund AMEX 10.82 11 5/8 + 7.44  @Duff & Phelps Sel  @ Utils NYSE 8.52 8 1/8 - 4.64  @Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc. AMEX 8.56 7 3/8 - 13.84  @Engex AMEX 13.62 10 - 26.58  @1st Australia AMEX 10.32 8 5/8 - 16.42  @First Financial Fund NYSE 10.80 9 1/2 - 12.04  @First Iberian AMEX 10.02 14 1/8 + 40.97  @France Fund NYSE b13.09 12 1/4 - 6.42  @Gabelli Equit Trust NYSE 13.80 13 3/8 - 3.08  @Germany Fund NYSE 9.58 10 7/8 + 13.52  @H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 10.47 8 5/8 - 17.62  @Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.64 10 - 14.09  @Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b48.83 47 5/8 - 2.47  @Helvetia Fund (Swiss) NYSE 12.32 12 1/8 - 1.58  @India Growth Fund NYSE f14.41 15 + 4.09  @Italy Fund NYSE b11.35 12 1/8 + 6.83  @Korea Fund NYSE 17.94 35 1/4 + 96.49  @Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.94 12 + 0.50  @Meeschaert G&C MWSE 8.66 8 - 7.62  @Mexico Fund NYSE b12.11 10 1/2 - 13.29  @Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.48 8 7/8 - 15.31  @Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.63 10 1/4 + 6.44  @Petrol & Resources NYSE 29.34 26 - 11.38  @Pilgrim Regional NYSE 10.85 9 3/8 - 13.59  @Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.06 7 5/8 - 5.40  @Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.59 8 3/4 - 8.76  @ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 15.93 12 5/8 - 20.75  @Scudder New Asia NYSE 15.97 13 5/8 - 14.68  @SE Savings Inst Fd OTC b10.67 11 1/4 + 5.44  @Spain Fund NYSE 13.96 30 5/8 +119.38  @Taiwan Fund NYSE b44.32 38 3/4 - 12.57  @TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b8.55 7 7/8 - 7.89  @Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b13.49 13 - 3.63  @Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.03 9 7/8 - 1.55  @Thai Fund NYSE 16.97 23 + 35.53  @United Kingdom Fund NYSE 10.65 8 7/8 - 16.67  @Z-Seven OTC 13.49 13 1/2 + 0.07  a-Ex-dividend. b-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. e-In Canadian dollars. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  Wham] Bam] Twice in two weeks the unraveling of the on-again, off-again UAL buy-out slammed the stock market.  Now, stock prices seem to be in a general retreat.  Since peaking at 2791.41 on Oct. 9, the Dow Jones Industrial Average has lost 194.69 points, or 7%, closing Friday at 2596.72, down 17.01.  The number of issues falling on the New York Stock Exchange each day is eclipsing the number of gainers.  And the number of stocks hitting new lows far outstrips the number setting new highs.  But why should an iffy $6.79 billion leveraged buy-out deal shake the foundations of the entire stock market?  Opinions vary about how important the UAL deal was to the market's health, but analysts generally agree that the market gyrations created as the UAL plan crumbled revealed a fundamental change in investor psychology.  "If this had happened a few months ago when the atmosphere was still very positive it wouldn't have been greeted with anything like the impact it has had over the past two weeks," says Dennis Jarrett, a market strategist at Kidder Peabody.  There are, of course, analysts who view the near-panic that briefly swept through investors on Oct. 13 and again on Oct. 24 as momentary lapses of good judgment that have only temporarily undermined a healthy stock market.  Sure, price action is volatile and that's scary, but all-in-all stocks are still a good place to be, they suggest.  The reaction to the UAL debacle "is mindless," says John Connolly, chief market strategist at Dean Witter.  "UAL is a small deal as far as the overall market is concerned.  The only way you can make it a big deal is to draw linkages that just don't make sense."  He suggests, for example, that investors may have assumed that just because UAL couldn't get financing, no leveraged buy-outs can get financing.  Carried even further, some investors assumed that since leveraged buy-outs are the only thing propping up stock prices, the market would collapse if no more LBOs could be done.  "There will still be deals," argues Mr. Connolly.  "There may not be as many and the buyers may not get away with some of the things they've done in the past, but deals won't disappear."  He forecasts that the emphasis in mergers and acquisitions may soon return to what he calls "strategic deals, in which somebody is taking over a company not to milk the cash flow, but because it's a good fit."  And even without deals, Mr. Connolly figures the market would remain healthy.  He notes, for instance, that there hasn't been a merger or acquisition among the 30 stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average since 1986, yet that average only three weeks ago hit a record high.  "Those stocks are up because their earnings are up and their dividends are up," he says.  Even the volatility created by stock index arbitrage and other computer-driven trading strategies isn't entirely bad, in Mr. Connolly's view.  For the long-term investor who picks stocks carefully, the price volatility can provide welcome buying opportunities as short-term players scramble frantically to sell stocks in a matter of minutes.  "Who can make the better decision, the guy who has 10 seconds to decide what to do or the guy with all the time in the world?" he says.  "What on earth does the UAL deal have to do with the price of Walmart, which I was able to buy on Oct. 16 at a very attractive price?"  Kidder Peabody's Mr. Jarrett also sees some benefits to the stock market's recent drop.  "We've run into a market that was beginning to run out of steam and get frothy," he says.  "The balloon had been blown up so big that when somebody came along with a pin -- in this case the UAL deal -- we got a little pop."  The pop sobered up investors who had been getting a little too ebullient, says Mr. Jarrett.  "It provided an excuse for people to get back to reality and to look at the economic data, especially the third-quarter economic numbers, and to realize that we can't continue to gloss over what is going on in the junk bond market."  But he figures that at current levels the stock market is comfortably valued, even with the economy obviously slowing.  "Just because we've got some realism back in the market doesn't mean it's going lower from here," he says.  "The bottom line is that it's healthy to have this kind of sideways activity, especially after a 30% gain in stock values over the past 12 months."  He's now estimating that after a period of consolidation, the Dow Jones Industrial Average will once again forge new highs.  Maybe, maybe not.  Abby Joseph Cohen, a market strategist at Drexel Burnham Lambert, isn't nearly so sanguine about the market's chances of surging to new highs anytime soon.  Her view is that stock prices have three major props: merger and buy-out proposals, earnings and the economic outlook.  At current levels of economic activity and earnings, stocks are fairly valued, she says.  But any chance for prices to surge above fair value lies in the speculation that accompanies a vigorous merger and buy-out business, and UAL has obviously put a damper on that.  "Stocks aren't cheap anymore, there have been some judicial and legislative changes in the merger area and all of this changes the arithmetic of deals," she says.  "I'm not saying they've stopped altogether, but future deals are going to be structured differently and bids probably won't be as high."  But that's not the only problem for stocks.  The other two props -- earnings and the economic outlook -- are troubling, too.  "M&A is getting all the headlines right now, but these other things have been building up more gradually," she says.  Third-quarter earnings have been generally disappointing and with economic data showing a clear slowing, the outlook for earnings in the fourth quarter and all of 1990 is getting worse.  "There are a lot more downward than upward revisions and it looks like people are questioning corporate profits as a means of support for stock prices," she says.  With all this, can stock prices hold their own?  "The question is unanswerable at this point," she says.  "It depends on what happens.  If the economy slips into a recession, then this isn't a level that's going to hold."  ---  @ Behind the Stock Market's Woes  @ Profits are disappointing...  @Positive earnings surprises  @ Number of companies: 64  @ Average difference from consensus estimate: 27.78%  @Negative earnings surprises  @ Number of companies: 143  @ Average difference from consensus estimates: -34.51%  @Source: Zacks Investment Research  ---  @ Analysts lower forecasts...  @Analyst's 1989 earnings revisions from Sept. 15 through Oct. 15  @ S&P 500 ......................................... - 4.9%  @ Consumer non-durables ........................... - 0.7%  @ Health care ..................................... - 0.8%  @ Public utilities ................................ - 0.9%  @ Consumer durables ............................... - 1.3%  @ Capital goods ................................... - 1.5%  @ Basic industry .................................. - 1.5%  @ Energy .......................................... - 1.6%  @ Technology ...................................... - 6.2%  @ Consumer services ............................... - 7.3%  @ Financial services .............................. -13.3%  @ Source: Institutional Broker Estimate Service  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Stock prices tumbled for a third consecutive day as earnings disappointments, a sluggish economy and a fragile junk bond market continued to weigh on investors.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 17.01 points to 2596.72 in active trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 170,330,000 shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were far ahead of gainers, 1,108 to 416.  For the week the Dow Jones Industrial Average sank 92.42 points, or 3.4%.  Oil stocks escaped the brunt of Friday's selling and several were able to post gains, including Chevron, which rose 5/8 to 66 3/8 in Big Board composite trading of 2.4 million shares.  The stock's advance reflected ongoing speculation that Pennzoil is accumulating a stake in the company, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Both companies declined to comment on the rumors, but several industry analysts told the Professional Investor Report they believed it was plausible that Pennzoil may be buying Chevron shares as a prelude to pushing for a restructuring of the company.  USX gained 1/2 to 33 3/8 on a report in Business Week magazine that investor Carl Icahn is said to have raised his stake in the oil and steel company to just about 15%.  Earlier this month, Mr. Icahn boosted his USX stake to 13.4%.  Elsewhere in the oil sector, Exxon rallied 7/8 to 45 3/4; Amoco rose 1/8 to 47; Texaco was unchanged at 51 3/4, and Atlantic Richfield fell 1 5/8 to 99 1/2.  Mobil, which said it plans to cut its exploration and production work force by about 8% in a restructuring, dropped 5/8 to 56 1/8.  The precious metals sector outgained other Dow Jones industry groups by a wide margin for the second consecutive session.  Hecla Mining rose 5/8 to 14; Battle Mountain Gold climbed 3/4 to 16 3/4; Homestake Mining rose 1 1/8 to 16 7/8; Lac Minerals added 5/8 to 11; Placer Dome went up 7/8 to 16 3/4, and ASA Ltd. jumped 3 5/8 to 49 5/8.  Gold mining stocks traded on the American Stock Exchange also showed strength.  Echo Bay Mines rose 5/8 to 15 7/8; Pegasus Gold advanced 1 1/2 to 12, and Corona Class A gained 1/2 to 7 1/2.  Unisys dropped 3/4 to 16 1/4 after posting a third-quarter loss of $4.25 a share, including restructuring charges, but other important technology issues were mixed.  Compaq Computer, which had lost 8 5/8 Thursday following a disappointing quarterly report, gained 5/8 to 100 5/8.  International Business Machines dropped 7/8 to 99 7/8.  Digital Equipment tacked on 1 1/8 to 89 1/8, and Hewlett-Packard fell 3/8 to 49 3/8.  Dividend-related trading swelled volume in Merrill Lynch, which closed unchanged at 28 3/8 as 2.7 million shares changed hands.  The stock has a 3.5% dividend yield and goes ex-dividend today.  Erbamont advanced 1 1/8 to 36 1/2 on 1.9 million shares.  Montedison, which owns about 72% of the company's common stock, agreed to buy the rest for $37 a share.  Himont, another majority-owned unit of Montedison, added 1 1/4 to 47 1/8.  Milton Roy jumped 2 to 18 3/8.  Crane said it holds an 8.9% stake in the company and may seek control.  Crane dropped 1 1/8 to 21 1/8.  Comprehensive Care, which terminated its agreement to merge with First Hospital, dropped 7/8 to 3 7/8.  The company's decision was made after First Hospital failed to obtain financing for its offer.  Federal investigators have identified the problem in last July's crash of a United Airlines flight in Iowa: a structural flaw that developed during the making of a titanium engine disk.  For several months, officials at the Federal Aviation Administration and the National Transportation Safety Board have suspected that a metallurgical flaw in the disk led to a crack that ultimately caused the tail engine to break apart in flight.  The explosion sent shards of metal flying, severing the DC-10's hydraulic or control systems, and led to the crash that killed 112 people.  But investigators could confirm their theory only after the recent retrieval of a big chunk of Flight 232's tail engine from a cornfield near the Sioux City Airport in Iowa.  The safety board will begin four days of hearings on the accident tomorrow in Sioux City.  Among the issues the board will examine is whether United Airlines, a unit of UAL Corp., should have been able to detect the cracks through maintenance checks.  The engine involved was a CF6-6 made by General Electric Co.  Anthony Broderick, the FAA's acting executive director for regulatory standards and compliance, said that recent tests of the failed engine disk indicate that a flaw -- known as "hard alpha" -- occurred in the titanium during its production almost 20 years ago.  He said there wasn't any way to detect the flaw at that time, and that the process has since been changed to decrease the chance that such flaws would occur.  The FAA already has ordered that all 232 disks made by the old process be removed from the planes and subjected to an ultrasonic test in a water-submersion chamber.  Such tests make the FAA confident that a Sioux City-type accident "won't happen again," said Mr. Broderick.  A spokesman for GE said that the company has been working with the FAA all along on this issue and "will comply fully with the required inspections."  But he also pointed out that the recalls will have no impact on GE's engine production.  The CF6-6 series engines aren't being manufactured any more; they are only being used in the DC-10 Series 10 planes currently in service, he said.  A frozen mountaintop in Tibet may offer an important clue about whether the Earth is warming perilously.  Researchers at Ohio State University and Lanzhou Institute of Glaciology and Geocryology in China have analyzed samples of glacial ice in Tibet and say temperatures there have been significantly higher on average over the past half-century than in any similar period in the past 10,000 years.  The ice samples are an important piece of evidence supporting theories that the Earth has warmed considerably in recent times, largely because of pollutants in the air, and will warm far more in the century ahead.  A substantial warming would melt some of the Earth's polar ice caps, raising the level of the oceans and causing widespread flooding of heavily populated coastal areas.  "If you can use data to reconstruct what happened in the past, you have much more confidence in predictions for the future," said Lonnie Thompson, a research scientist at Ohio State who dug for and analyzed the ice samples.  To compare temperatures over the past 10,000 years, researchers analyzed the changes in concentrations of two forms of oxygen.  These measurements can indicate temperature changes, researchers said, because the rates of evaporation of these oxygen atoms differ as temperatures change.  Analysis of ice from the Dunde ice cap, a glacial plateau in Tibet 17,000 feet above sea level, show that average temperatures were higher in 1937-87 than in any other 50-year period since before the last Ice Age, Mr. Thompson said.  Some climate models project that interior regions of Asia would be among the first to heat up in a global warming because they are far from oceans, which moderate temperature changes.  But the ice-core samples aren't definitive proof that the so-called greenhouse effect will lead to further substantial global heating, Mr. Thompson acknowledged.  According to greenhouse theories, increased carbon dioxide emissions, largely caused by burning of fossil fuels, will cause the Earth to warm up because carbon dioxide prevents heat from escaping into space.  Skeptics say that if that's the case, temperatures should have risen fairly uniformly over the past century, reflecting the increase in carbon dioxide.  Instead, the Dunde ice-core record shows increasing temperatures from 1900 through the early 1950s, decreasing temperatures from the late 1950s through the mid-1970s, then higher temperatures again through last year.  Other temperature data show similar unexplained swings.  "Climate varies drastically due to natural causes," said Mr. Thompson.  But he said ice samples from Peru, Greenland and Antarctica all show substantial signs of warming.  Telxon Corp. said its vice president for manufacturing resigned and its Houston work force has been trimmed by 40 people, or about 15%.  The maker of hand-held computers and computer systems said the personnel changes were needed to improve the efficiency of its manufacturing operation.  The company said it hasn't named a successor to Ronald Bufton, the vice president who resigned.  Its Houston work force now totals 230.  CNW Corp. said the final step in the acquisition of the company has been completed with the merger of CNW with a subsidiary of Chicago & North Western Holdings Corp.  As reported, CNW agreed to be acquired by a group of investors led by Blackstone Capital Partners Limited Partnership for $50 a share, or about $950 million.  Congress sent to President Bush an $8.5 billion military construction bill that cuts spending for new installations by 16% while revamping the Pentagon budget to move more than $450 million from foreign bases to home-state projects.  The fiscal 1990 measure builds on a pattern set earlier this year by House and Senate defense authorizing committees, and -- at a time of retrenchment for the military and concern about the U.S.'s standing in the world economy -- overseas spending is most vulnerable.  Total Pentagon requests for installations in West Germany, Japan, South Korea, the United Kingdom and the Philippines, for example, are cut by almost two-thirds, while lawmakers added to the military budget for construction in all but a dozen states at home.  The result is that instead of the Pentagon's proposed split of 60-40 between domestic and foreign bases, the reduced funding is distributed by a ratio of approximately 70-30.  The extra margin for bases in the U.S. enhances the power of the appropriations committees; meanwhile, lawmakers used their positions to garner as much as six times what the Pentagon had requested for their individual states.  House Appropriations Committee Chairman Jamie Whitten (D., Miss.) helped secure $49.7 million for his state, or more than double the Pentagon's budget.  West Virginia, home of Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd, would receive $21.5 million -- four times the military's request.  Tennessee and North Carolina, home states of the two Democratic chairmen of the House and Senate military construction subcommittees, receive $243.2 million, or 25% above the Pentagon's request.  Though spending for Iowa and Oregon was far less, their increases above Pentagon requests -- 640% and 430%, respectively -- were much greater because of the influence of Republicans at critical junctures.  The swift passage of the bill, which cleared the Senate and House on simple voice votes last week, contrasts with the problems still facing a more cumbersome $66.8 billion measure funding housing, environmental, space and veterans programs.  By an 84-6 margin, the Senate approved the bulk of the spending Friday, but the bill was then sent back to the House to resolve the question of how to address budget limits on credit allocations for the Federal Housing Administration.  The House Democratic leadership could seek to waive these restrictions, but the underlying bill is already under attack for excesses elsewhere.  Appropriations committees have used an assortment of devices to disguise as much as $1 billion in spending, and as critics have awakened to these devices, the bill can seem like a wounded caribou trying to make it past ice and wolves to reach safer winter grazing.  Much of the excess spending will be pushed into fiscal 1991, and in some cases is temporarily parked in slow-spending accounts in anticipation of being transferred to faster-spending areas after the budget scorekeeping is completed.  For example, a House-Senate conference ostensibly increased the National Aeronautics and Space Administration budget for construction of facilities to nearly $592 million, or more than $200 million above what either chamber had previously approved.  Part of the increase would provide $90 million toward ensuring construction of a costly solid rocket-motor facility in Mr. Whitten's Mississippi.  But as much as $177 million, or nearly 30% of the account, is marked for potential transfers to research, management and flight accounts that are spent out at a faster clip.  The bill's managers face criticism, too, for the unusual number of conditions openly imposed on where funds will be spent.  Conservatives, embarrassed by Republican influence-peddling scandals at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, have used the issue in an effort to shift blame onto a Democratic-controlled Congress.  HUD Secretary Jack Kemp backed an unsuccessful effort to strike such language last week, but received little support from the White House budget office, which wants to protect space-station funding in the bill and has tended to turn its eyes from pork-barrel amendments.  Within discretionary funds for community development grants, more than $3.7 million is allocated to six projects in Michigan, home state of a subcommittee chairman, Rep. Bob Traxler.  House Speaker Thomas Foley won $510,000 for a project in his district in Washington state, and $1.3 million, earmarked by Sen. Daniel Inouye, amounts to a business subsidy under the title "Hawaiian sugar mills job retention."  The powerful Democrat had first wanted to add language relaxing environmental restrictions on two mills on the Hamakua coast that are threatening to close.  When this plan met resistance, it was agreed instead to take money from HUD to subsidize needed improvements in two settling ponds for the mills, which employ an estimated 1,500 workers, according to Mr. Inouye's office.  Dennis Farney's Oct. 13 page-one article "River of Despair," about the poverty along the Mississippi, fanned childhood memories of when my parents were sharecroppers in southeastern Arkansas, only a few miles from the river.  Although we were white, the same economic factors affected us as affects the black people Mr. Farney writes about.  Fortunately, an aunt with a college degree bought a small farm and moved us 50 miles north to good schools and an environment that opened the world of opportunity for me as an eight-year-old.  Though I've been blessed with academic degrees and some success in the materialistic world, I've never forgotten or lost contact with those memories of the 1930s.  Most of the land in that and other parts of the Delta are now owned by second, third or fourth generations of the same families.  These are the families who used -- and sometime abused -- their sharecroppers, people who had no encouragement and little access to an education or training for a better life.  Following World War II, when one family with mechanized equipment could farm crops formerly requiring 20 families, the surplus people were dumped into the mainstream of society with no Social Security, no skills in the workplace, no hope for their future except welfare.  And today, many of their children, grandchildren and great-grandchildren remain on welfare.  In the meantime, the landowners continue receiving generous subsidies that began during New Deal days.  Or those who choose not to farm can lease their lands and crop allotments for handsome sums.  Farmers in the Midwest and other areas have suffered, but those along the Mississippi continue to prosper with holdings that were built with the sweat of men and women living in economic slavery.  And when they were no longer needed, they were turned loose unprepared to build lives of their own.  Denton Harris  Chairman  Metro Bank  Atlanta  ---  Because the cycle of poverty along the lower Mississippi goes back so many generations, breaking this cycle will be next to impossible.  Sadly, the cycle appears not as waves but as a downward spiral.  Yet the evidence that we have not hit bottom is found in the fact that we are not yet helping ourselves.  The people of the Delta are waiting for that big factory to open, river traffic to increase, government spending to fund job-training programs or public schools to educate apathetic students.  Because we refuse to face the tough answers, the questions continue as fodder for the commissions and committees, for the media and politicians.  Coffee-shop chatter does not lend itself to solving the problems of racism, teen pregnancy or lack of parental support or guidance.  Does the Delta deserve government help in attracting industry when the majority of residents, black and white, do not realize racism alienates potential employers?  Should we focus on the region's infant-mortality rate when the vocal right-wingers and the school boards, mayors and legislators prohibit schools from teaching the two ways (abstinence or contraceptives) of decreasing teen pregnancy?  Delta problems are difficult, not impossible, to solve -- I am just not convinced that we are ready to solve them yet.  Leslie Falls Humphries  Little Rock, Ark.  ---  I would like to issue a challenge to corporate America.  The next time expansion plans are mentioned at the old company and somebody says, "Aw heck, guys, nobody can do it like Japan or South Korea," I wish you would butt in and say, "Hold it, fellas, why don't we compare prices and use our own little Third World country.  We would even save on freight."  There is no mystery why the Delta originated "Singin' the Blues."  Eugene S. Clarke IV  Hollandale, Miss.  ---  Your story is an insult to the citizens of the Mississippi Delta.  Many of the problems you presented exist in every part of this country.  Poverty is only two blocks from President Bush's residence.  For years, we tried to ignore the problem of poverty, and now that it has gotten out of hand it's a new crusade for the media and our Democratic Congress.  Nobody should have to live in such poor conditions as in "Sugar Ditch," but when you travel to Washington, Boston, Chicago or New York, the same problems exist.  The only difference is, in those cities the poor are housed in high-rise-project apartments each consisting of one room, with rusty pipes called plumbing, rodents and cockroaches everywhere and nonworking elevators -- and with the building patrolled by gangs and drug dealers.  Many middle-class people would love free food, Medicaid insurance, utilities and rent.  Then maybe I could stay home and have seven children and watch Oprah Winfrey, like Beulah in the article, instead of having one child and working constantly just to stay above water, like so many families in this country.  Dee Ann Wilson  Greenville, Miss.  Mobil Corp. is in the midst of cutting back its exploration and production group, which finds and develops oil and gas reserves in the U.S., by as much as 15% as part of a new restructuring of that sector of its business.  Management advised employees Friday that it was going to reduce employment in production operations of the group by 8%, or 400 people.  The exploration side of the unit has recently undergone a similar overhaul, during which it also lost as many as 400 employees, a company spokesman said in response to questions.  Mobil Exploration & Producing U.S. Inc., the group involved, currently has a work force of somewhat less than 5,000.  A few years ago, Mobil restructured the entire company during an industrywide shakeout.  But since then U.S. oil production has declined and Mobil wants to focus its oil-finding efforts overseas.  Mobil alluded to the work-force cuts last week when it took a $40 million charge as part of its third-quarter earnings and attributed it to a restructuring.  Mobil officials said that it is unlikely any additional charges related to this move will be taken in future quarters.  On Wednesday, Mobil will begin offering separation packages and voluntary retirement in its U.S. production operation.  Mobil officials said they have been studying ways of streamlining these operations since early this year.  During the coming months, layers of management will be peeled away and regional offices will become more autonomous.  For greater efficiency, employees at those locations will be reorganized into teams responsible for managing the properties under their jurisdiction, Mobil said.  "The main feature of the new organization is that each local manager will have both the authority and accountability for profitable and technically sound operations," said Charles E. Spruell, president of the Mobil unit.  Field offices at New Orleans; Houston; Denver; Midland, Tex.; Bakersfield, Calif.; Oklahoma City; and Liberal, Kan., will be maintained.  But the staffs at some of those locations will be slashed while at others the work force will be increased.  For instance, employment in Denver will be reduced to 105 from 430.  But on the West Coast, where profitable oil production is more likely than in the midcontinent region, the Bakersfield, Calif., office staff of 130 will grow by 175 to 305.  The reorganization will "focus on the value and potential of assets," Mr. Spruell said.  Wanted: An investment that's as simple and secure as a certificate of deposit but offers a return worth getting excited about.  With $150 billion of CDs maturing this month, a lot of people have been scouring the financial landscape for just such an investment.  In April, when many of them bought their CDs, six-month certificates were yielding more than 9%; investors willing to look could find double-digit yields at some banks and thrifts.  Now, the nationwide average yield on a six-month CD is just under 8%, and 8.5% is about the best around.  But investors looking for alternatives aren't finding it easy.  Yields on most fixed-income securities are lower than several months ago.  And the stock market's recent gyrations are a painful reminder of the dangers there.  "If you're looking for a significantly higher yield with the same level of risk as a CD, you're not going to find it," says Washington financial planner Dennis M. Gurtz.  There are, however, some alternatives that income-oriented investors should consider, investment advisers say.  Short-term municipal bonds, bond funds and tax-deferred annuities are some of the choices they mention -- and not just as a way to get a higher return.  In particular, advisers say, investors may want to look at securities that reduce the risk that CD holders are confronting right now, of having to reinvest the proceeds of maturing short-term certificates at lower rates.  A mix of CDs and other holdings may make the most sense.  "People should remember their money isn't all or nothing -- they don't need to be shopping for the one interest-rate-type investment and putting all their money in it," says Bethesda, Md., adviser Karen Schaeffer.  Here's a look at some of the alternatives:  SHORT-TERM MUNICIPALS: Investors with a heavy tax load should take out their calculators.  Yields on municipal bonds can be higher than after-tax yields on CDs for maturities of perhaps one to five years.  That's because municipal-bond interest is exempt from federal income tax -- and from state and local taxes too, for in-state investors.  For an investor paying tax at a 33% rate, a seemingly puny 6% yield on a one-year muni is equivalent to a taxable 9%.  Rates approach 6.5% on five-year municipals.  Some of the more cautious CD holders might like "pre-refunded" municipals.  These securities get top credit ratings because the issuers have put aside U.S. bonds that will be sold to pay off holders when the municipals are retired.  "It's a no-brainer: You don't have to worry about diversification; you don't have to worry about quality," says Steven J. Hueglin, executive vice president of the New York bond firm of Gabriele, Hueglin & Cashman Inc.  Consider a "laddered" bond portfolio, with issues maturing in, say, 1992, 1993 and 1994, advises Malcolm A. Makin, a Westerly, R.I., financial planner.  The idea is to have money rolling over each year at prevailing interest rates.  BOND FUNDS: Bond mutual funds offer diversification and are easy to buy and sell.  That makes them a reasonable option for investors who will accept some risk of price fluctuation in order to make a bet that interest rates will decline over the next year or so.  Buyers can look forward to double-digit annual returns if they are right.  But they will have disappointing returns or even losses if interest rates rise instead.  Bond resale prices, and thus fund share prices, move in the opposite direction from rates.  The price movements get bigger as the maturity of the securities lengthens.  Consider, for instance, two bond funds from Vanguard Group of Investment Cos. that were both yielding 8.6% on a recent day.  The Short Term Bond Fund, with an average maturity of 2 1/2 years, would deliver a total return for one year of about 10.6% if rates drop one percentage point and a one-year return of about 6.6% if rates rise by the same amount.  But, in the same circumstances, the returns would be a more extreme 14.6% and 2.6% for the Vanguard Bond Market Fund, with its 12 1/2-year average maturity.  "You get equity-like returns" from bonds if you guess right on rates, says James E. Wilson, a Columbia, S.C., planner.  If interest rates don't change, bond fund investors' returns will be about equal to the funds' current yields.  DEFERRED ANNUITIES: These insurance company contracts feature some of the same tax benefits and restrictions as non-deductible individual retirement accounts: Investment gains are compounded without tax consequences until money is withdrawn, but a 10% penalty tax is imposed on withdrawals made before age 59 1/2.  Aimed specifically at CD holders are so-called CD-type annuities, or certificates of annuity.  An interest rate is guaranteed for between one and seven years, after which holders get 30 days to choose another guarantee period or to switch to another insurer's contract without the surrender charges that are common to annuities.  Some current rates exceed those on CDs.  For instance, a CD-type annuity from North American Co. for Life & Health Insurance, Chicago, offers 8.8% interest for one year or a 9% rate for two years.  Annuities are rarely a good idea at age 35 because of the withdrawal restrictions.  But at age 55, "they may be a great deal," says Mr. Wilson, the Columbia, S.C., planner.  MONEY MARKET FUNDS: That's right, money market mutual funds.  The conventional wisdom is to go into money funds when rates are rising and shift out at times such as the present, when rates seem headed down.  With average maturities of a month or so, money funds offer fixed share prices and floating returns that track market interest rates, with a slight lag.  Still, today's highest-yielding money funds may beat CDs over the next year even if rates fall, says Guy Witman, an editor of the Bond Market Advisor newsletter in Atlanta.  That's because top-yielding funds currently offer yields almost 1 1/2 percentage points above the average CD yield.  Mr. Witman likes the Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Money Market Fund, with a seven-day compound yield just under 9.5%.  A new fund, its operating expenses are being temporarily subsidized by the sponsor.  Try combining a money fund and an intermediate-term bond fund as a low-risk bet on falling rates, suggests Back Bay Advisors Inc., a mutual fund unit of New England Insurance Co.  If rates unexpectedly rise, the increasing return on the money fund will partly offset the lower-than-expected return from the bond fund.  Federal drug regulators, concerned over British reports that diabetics have died after shifting from animal to human-based insulin, say they are considering a study to see if similar deaths have occurred here.  The United Kingdom reports came from Dr. Patrick Toseland, head of clinical chemistry at Guy's Hospital in London.  In a telephone interview Friday, Dr. Toseland said the number of sudden, unexplained deaths of diabetics he had seen this year was 17 compared with just two in 1985.  At least six of the deaths occurred among relatively young diabetics who had switched from animal to human insulin within the past year, he said.  Dr. Solomon Sobel, director of metabolism and endrocrine drug products for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, said FDA officials have discussed Dr. Toseland's findings "fairly intensively."  While there have been no reports of similar sudden unexplained deaths among diabetics in the U.S., Dr. Sobel said the FDA plans to examine Dr. Toseland's evidence and is considering its own study here.  Dr. Toseland, a toxicologist, said he was preparing an article for a British forensic medical journal raising the possibility that the deaths may have occurred after human insulin blunted critical warning signs indicating hypoglycemia, or low blood sugar, which can kill diabetics.  The usual warning signs of hypoglycemia include sweating, anxiety and cramps.  With proper warning, diabetics can easily raise their blood sugar to safe levels by eating sugar or sugary food.  "The anecdotal data certainly shows that some of the people were not aware of the rapid onset of hypoglycemia," Dr. Toseland said.  At the U.S. National Institutes of Health, Dr. Robert E. Silverman, chief of the diabetes program branch, said no evidence of unexpected deaths from hypoglycemia had shown up in a study of 1,500 diabetics that has been under way at NIH for five years.  However, he said officials conducting the study hadn't been looking for signs of problems related to hypoglycemia unawareness.  "We are now monitoring for it much more closely," he said.  "We do know there are slight differences in the way human and animal insulins drive down blood sugar," Dr. Sobel said.  The human-based drug starts the blood sugar dropping sooner and drives it down faster, he said.  "But we don't believe there is enough of a difference to be clinically significant," Dr. Sobel said.  Reports of Dr. Toseland's findings in the British press have triggered widespread concern among diabetics there.  Both the British Diabetic Association and the Committee on Safety in Medicines -- Britain's equivalent of the U.S. FDA -- recently issued statements noting the lack of hard scientific evidence to support Dr. Toseland's findings.  On Friday, the American Diabetes Association issued a similar statement urging the six million U.S. diabetics not to overreact to the British report.  "A loss of the warning symptoms of hypoglycemia is a complex problem that is very unlikely to be due simply to the type of insulin used," the American association said.  The FDA already requires drug manufacturers to include warnings with insulin products that symptoms of hypoglycemia are less pronounced with human insulin than with animal-based products.  Eli Lilly & Co., the Indianapolis-based drug manufacturer, dominates the U.S. human insulin market with its product known as Humulin.  Lilly is building plants to make the insulin in Indianapolis and Fagershein, France.  In its latest annual report, Lilly said Humulin sales have shown "excellent growth."  Lilly officials said they had seen reports of hypoglycemic unawareness among some patients making the shift from animal to human insulin, but didn't know if the problem had caused any deaths.  Dr. Leigh Thompson, a Lilly group vice president, said the company's clinical trials of both its animal and human-based insulins indicated no difference in the level of hypoglycemia between users of either product.  Dr. Toseland said most of the British diabetics who died had been taking a human-based insulin made by Novo/Nordisk, a Danish manufacturer.  None of the diabetics were using Lilly's insulin.  SharesBase Corp. said it will reduce its 221-person work force by about 25%, effective tomorrow, in an effort to stem continuing losses.  The company, which makes data base systems and software, said it expects to report a loss for the third quarter ended Sept. 30.  Defense intellectuals have complained for years that the Pentagon cannot determine priorities because it has no strategy.  Last April, the new defense secretary, Richard Cheney, acknowledged that, "given an ideal world, we'd have a nice, neat, orderly process.  We'd do the strategy and then we'd come around and do the budget.  This city doesn't work that way."  With a five-year defense plan costing more than $1.6 trillion, it's about time we put together a defense strategy that works in Washington.  This won't happen until strategists come down from their ivory tower and learn to work in the real world of limited budgets and uncertain futures.  As it is, we identify national goals and the threats to these goals, we shape a strategy to counter these threats, we determine the forces needed to execute the strategy, before finally forging the budgets needed to build and maintain the forces.  These procedures consume millions of man-hours of labor and produce tons of paper, and each year, their end product -- the Five Year Defense Plan -- promptly melts away.  The graph on the left shows how this happens (see accompanying illustration -- WSJ Oct. 30, 1989).  Compare the past eight five-year plans with actual appropriations.  The Pentagon's strategists produce budgets that simply cannot be executed because they assume a defense strategy depends only on goals and threats.  Strategy, however, is about possibilities, not hopes and dreams.  By ignoring costs, U.S. strategists abdicate their responsibility for hard decisions.  That puts the real strategic decisions in the hands of others: bean counters, budgeteers, and pork-barrelers.  These people have different agendas.  And as a result -- as the recent vote by the House to undo Mr. Cheney's program terminations suggests -- the preservation of jobs is becoming the real goal of defense "strategy."  How can we turn this situation around?  Reform starts in the Pentagon.  Strategists should consider the impact of budget uncertainties at the beginning of the planning process.  They ought to examine how a range of optimistic to pessimistic budget scenarios would change the defense program.  They would then develop priorities by identifying the least painful program cuts as they moved from higher to lower budgets.  They would also identify the best way to add programs, should the budget come in at higher levels.  This kind of contingency analysis is common in war planning and business planning.  There is no reason that it can not be done for defense planning.  Two steps are necessary to translate this idea into action.  Step 1 cleans up our books.  Our five-year plan contains three accounting devices -- negative money, an above guidance management reserve and optimistic inflation estimates -- which understate the spending the Pentagon has committed itself to by almost $100 billion.  Negative money was invented in 1988 to make the 1990-94 Five Year Defense Plan conform to the numbers in President Reagan's final budget submission to Congress.  That plan exceeded the numbers contained in his budget message by $45 billion.  To make the books balance, as is required by law, somebody invented a new budget line item that simply subtracted $45 billion.  It is known in the Pentagon as the "negative wedge."  The Pentagon argues that the negative wedge is the net effect of $22 billion in the as-yet unidentified procurement reductions that it intends to find in future years and $23 billion in an "above guidance" management reserve that accounts for undefined programs that will materialize in the future.  The 1990 plan also assumes inflation will decline to 1.7% by 1994.  Most forecasters, including those in the Congressional Budget Office, assume inflation will be in excess of 4% in each of those five years.  At that rate, the defense plan is underfunded by $48 billion.  By adding the negative wedge and recalculating the remaining program using a more probable inflation estimate, we arrive at a baseline program costing $1.7 trillion between 1990 and 1994.  Step 2 examines how four progressively lower budget scenarios would change the baseline and how these changes would affect our national security.  The graph on the right (which assumes a 4% rate of inflation), places these scenarios in the context of recent appropriations (see accompanying illustration -- WSJ Oct. 30, 1989).  Note how the baseline program assumes a sharp increase in future appropriations.  Step 2 will answer the question: What happens if these increases do not materialize?  Scenario 1, known as the "Constant Dollar Freeze," reimburses the Pentagon for inflation only -- it slopes upward at 4% per year.  This scenario has been the rough position of the U.S. Senate since 1985, and it reduces the baseline by $106 billion between 1990 and 1994.  Scenario 3, the "Current Dollar Freeze," has been the approximate position of the House of Representatives for about four years.  It freezes the budget at its current level, and forces the Pentagon to eat the effects of inflation until 1994.  This reduces the baseline by $229 billion.  Scenario 2 extends the recent compromises between the House and the Senate; it splits the difference between Scenarios 1 and 3, by increasing the budget at 2% per year.  It reduces the baseline by $169 billion.  Finally, Scenario 4 reduces the budget by 2% per year for the next five years -- a total reduction of $287 billion.  This can be thought of as a pessimistic prediction, perhaps driven by the sequestering effects of the Gramm-Rudman deficit reduction law or possibly a relaxation of tensions with the Soviet Union.  The strategic planners in the Joint Chiefs of Staff would construct the most effective defense program for each scenario, maximizing strengths and minimizing weaknesses.  They would conclude their efforts by producing a comprehensive net assessment for each plan -- including the assumptions made, an analysis of its deficiencies and limitations, the impact on national security, and the best strategy for working around these limitations.  This exercise would reveal the true cost of a particular program by forcing the strategists to make hard decisions.  If, for example, they choose to keep the B-2 Stealth bomber, they would have to sacrifice more and more other programs -- such as carrier battlegroups or army divisions -- as they moved toward lower budget levels.  These trade-offs would evolve priorities by revealing when the cost of the B-2 became prohibitive.  Some may be tempted to argue that the idea of a strategic review merely resurrects the infamous Zero-Based Budgeting (ZBB) concept of the Carter administration.  But ZBB did not involve the strategic planners in the Joint Chiefs of Staff, and therefore degenerated into a bean-counting drill driven by budget politics.  Anyway, ZBB's procedures were so cumbersome that everyone involved was crushed under a burden of marginalia.  A strategic review is fundamentally different.  It would be run by the joint chiefs under simple directions: Produce the best possible force for each budget scenario and provide the Secretary of Defense with a comprehensive net assessment of how that force could be used to achieve U.S. goals.  It might be feared that even thinking about lower budgets will hurt national security because the door will be opened to opportunistic budget cutting by an irresponsible Congress.  This argument plays well in the atmosphere of gaming and mistrust permeating the Pentagon and Congress, and unfortunately, there is some truth to it.  But in the end, it must be rejected for logical as well as moral reasons.  To say that the Pentagon should act irresponsibly because acting responsibly will provoke Congress into acting irresponsibly leads to the conclusion that the Pentagon should deliberately exaggerate its needs in the national interest; in other words, that it is justified in committing a crime -- lying to Congress -- because it is morally superior.  Strategy is not a game between the Pentagon and Congress; it is the art of the possible in a world where constraints force us to choose between unpleasant or imperfect alternatives.  If we want meaningful priorities, we must understand the trade-offs they imply before we make commitments.  Strategy is not a separate event in an idealized sequence of discrete events; it is a way of thinking that neutralizes threats to our interests in a manner consistent with our financial, cultural and physical limitations.  ---  Mr. Spinney is a permanent Pentagon official.  This is a condensed version of an essay that will appear in the January issue of the Naval Institute Proceedings.  The views expressed do not reflect the official policy of the Department of Defense.  Although bullish dollar sentiment has fizzled, many currency analysts say a massive sell-off probably won't occur in the near future.  While Wall Street's tough times and lower U.S. interest rates continue to undermine the dollar, weakness in the pound and the yen is expected to offset those factors.  "By default," the dollar probably will be able to hold up pretty well in coming days, says Francoise Soares-Kemp, a foreign-exchange adviser at Credit Suisse.  "We're close to the bottom" of the near-term ranges, she contends.  In late Friday afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.8300 marks and 141.65 yen, off from late Thursday's 1.8400 marks and 142.10 yen.  The pound strengthened to $1.5795 from $1.5765.  In Tokyo Monday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 141.70 yen, down from Friday's Tokyo close of 142.75 yen.  The dollar began Friday on a firm note, gaining against all major currencies in Tokyo dealings and early European trading despite reports that the Bank of Japan was seen unloading dollars around 142.70 yen.  The rise came as traders continued to dump the pound after the sudden resignation Thursday of British Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson.  But once the pound steadied with help from purchases by the Bank of England and the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, the dollar was dragged down, traders say, by the stock-market slump that left the Dow Jones Industrial Average with a loss of 17.01 points.  With the stock market wobbly and dollar buyers discouraged by signs of U.S. economic weakness and the recent decline in U.S. interest rates that has diminished the attractiveness of dollar-denominated investments, traders say the dollar is still in a precarious position.  "They'll be looking at levels to sell the dollar," says James Scalfaro, a foreign-exchange marketing representative at Bank of Montreal.  While some analysts say the dollar eventually could test support at 1.75 marks and 135 yen, Mr. Scalfaro and others don't see the currency decisively sliding under support at 1.80 marks and 140 yen soon.  Predictions for limited dollar losses are based largely on the pound's weak state after Mr. Lawson's resignation and the yen's inability to strengthen substantially when there are dollar retreats.  With the pound and the yen lagging behind other major currencies, "you don't have a confirmation" that a sharp dollar downturn is in the works, says Mike Malpede, senior currency analyst at Refco Inc. in Chicago.  As far as the pound goes, some traders say a slide toward support at $1.5500 may be a favorable development for the dollar this week.  While the pound has attempted to stabilize, currency analysts say it is in critical condition.  Sterling plunged about four cents Thursday and hit the week's low of $1.5765 when Mr. Lawson resigned from his six-year post because of a policy squabble with other cabinet members.  He was succeeded by John Major, who Friday expressed a desire for a firm pound and supported the relatively high British interest rates that he said "are working exactly as intended" in reducing inflation.  But the market remains uneasy about Mr. Major's policy strategy and the prospects for the pound, currency analysts contend.  Although the Bank of England's tight monetary policy has fueled worries that Britain's slowing economy is headed for a recession, it is widely believed that Mr. Lawson's willingness to prop up the pound with interest-rate increases helped stem pound selling in recent weeks.  If there are any signs that Mr. Major will be less inclined to use interest-rate boosts to rescue the pound from another plunge, that currency is expected to fall sharply.  "It's fair to say there are more risks for the pound under Major than there were under Lawson," says Malcolm Roberts, a director of international bond market research at Salomon Brothers in London.  "There's very little upside to sterling," Mr. Roberts says, but he adds that near-term losses may be small because the selling wave that followed Mr. Major's appointment apparently has run its course.  But some other analysts have a stormier forecast for the pound, particularly because Britain's inflation is hovering at a relatively lofty annual rate of about 7.6% and the nation is burdened with a struggling government and large current account and trade deficits.  The pound likely will fall in coming days and may trade as low as 2.60 marks within the next year, says Nigel Rendell, an international economist at James Capel & Co. in London.  The pound was at 2.8896 marks late Friday, off sharply from 2.9511 in New York trading a week earlier.  If the pound falls closer to 2.80 marks, the Bank of England may raise Britain's base lending rate by one percentage point to 16%, says Mr. Rendell.  But such an increase, he says, could be viewed by the market as "too little too late."  The Bank of England indicated its desire to leave its monetary policy unchanged Friday by declining to raise the official 15% discount-borrowing rate that it charges discount houses, analysts say.  Pound concerns aside, the lack of strong buying interest in the yen is another boon for the dollar, many traders say.  The dollar has a "natural base of support" around 140 yen because the Japanese currency hasn't been purchased heavily in recent weeks, says Ms. Soares-Kemp of Credit Suisse.  The yen's softness, she says, apparently stems from Japanese investors' interest in buying dollars against the yen to purchase U.S. bond issues and persistent worries about this year's upheaval in the Japanese government.  On New York's Commodity Exchange Friday, gold for current delivery jumped $5.80, to $378.30 an ounce, the highest settlement since July 12.  Estimated volume was a heavy seven million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $378.87 an ounce.  We are deeply disturbed that a recent editorial stated that the "Americans With Disabilities Act of 1989" was "crafted primarily by Democratic Senators Kennedy and Harkin" with a premise "based on the presumption that most Americans are hostile to the disabled. . . ."  Perhaps even more offensive is the statement, "It is surprising that George Bush and the White House inner circle would ally themselves with this crabby philosophy."  This legislation was not drafted by a handful of Democratic "do-gooders."  Quite the contrary -- it results from years of work by members of the National Council on the Handicapped, all appointed by President Reagan.  You depict the bill as something Democratic leaders "hoodwinked" the administration into endorsing.  The opposite is true: It's the product of many meetings with administration officials, Senate staffers, advocates, and business and transportation officials.  Many congressmen are citing the compromise on the "Americans With Disabilities Act of 1989" as a model for bipartisan deliberations.  Most National Council members are themselves disabled or are parents of children with disabilities.  We know firsthand the discrimination addressed by the act: to be told there's no place for your child in school; to spend lonely hours at home because there is no transportation for someone in a wheelchair; to be denied employment because you are disabled.  Your editorial mockingly entitles this legislation the "Lawyers' Employment Act."  For the 43 million people with disabilities and their families, this legislation is the "Emancipation Proclamation."  Sandra Swift Parrino  Chairperson  National Council on the Handicapped  Washington  A group of investors led by Giant Group Ltd. and its chairman, Burt Sugarman, said it filed with federal antitrust regulators for clearance to buy more than 50% of the stock of Rally's Inc., a fast-food company based in Louisville, Ky.  Rally's operates and franchises about 160 fast-food restaurants throughout the U.S.  The company went public earlier this month, offering 1,745,000 shares of common stock at $15 a share.  Giant has interests in cement making and newsprint.  The investor group includes Restaurant Investment Partnership, a California general partnership, and three Rally's directors: Mr. Sugarman, James M. Trotter III and William E. Trotter II.  The group currently holds 3,027,330 Rally's shares, or 45.2% of its commmon shares outstanding.  Giant Group owned 22% of Rally's shares before the initial public offering.  A second group of three company directors, aligned with Rally's founder James Patterson, also is seeking control of the fast-food chain.  It is estimated that the Patterson group controls more than 40% of Rally's stock.  Rally officials weren't available to comment late yesterday.  For the year ended July 2, Rally had net income of $2.4 million, or 34 cents a share, on revenue of $52.9 million.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL --------------- %  @ COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @ Gen'l Motors $.72 $.45 (3) $.77 (15) 60.00  @ Tandem Computers .38 0.37 (4) ... 5.56  @ Sonat Inc .38 ... .26 (8) 46.15  @ Avon Prods Inc .46 ... .42 (5) 9.52  @ CMS Energy .83 ... .79 (6) 5.06  @ NEGATIVE  @ Kay Jewelers $(.19) ... ($.05) (3) 280.00  @ Raychem Corp .14 ... .33 (4) 57.58  @ Pennzoil Co .87 ... 1.21 (8) 28.10  @ Ryland Group .80 ... 1.10 (4) 27.27  @ Dravo Corp .31 ... .40 (3) 22.50  @ TGI Friday's .21 ... .24 (3) 12.50  @ Buffets Inc .17 ... .19 (6) 10.53  @ Ford Motor Co 1.03 ... 1.15 (12) 10.43  @ Int'l Tech .10 ... .11 (5) 9.09  @ Surgical Care Af. .15 ... .16 (3) 6.25  Source: Zacks Investment Research  DPC Acquisition Partners, a hostile suitor for Dataproducts Corp., filed a petition in federal district court in Los Angeles seeking to have its standstill agreement with the computer printer maker declared void, and it proceeded with a $10-a-share tender offer for the company.  The offer would give the transaction an indicated value of $189 million, based on the 18.9 million shares the group doesn't already own.  DPC holds about 7.8% of Dataproducts' shares.  Lawyers representing DPC declined to elaborate, saying they didn't have a final copy of the filing.  Jack Davis, Dataproducts' chairman, said he hadn't yet seen the filing and couldn't comment.  DPC made a $15-a-share bid for the company in May, but Dataproducts management considered the $283.7 million proposal unacceptable.  Dataproducts had sought a buyer for several months, but it is now in the midst of a restructuring plan and management says the company is no longer for sale.  Appalachian Power Co., a subsidiary of American Electric Power Co., said it will redeem on Dec. 1 the entire $44.2 million of its 12 7/8% first mortgage bonds due 2013.  The redemption price will be 109.66% of the principal amount of the bonds, plus accrued interest to the date of redemption.  The European Community's consumer price index rose a provisional 0.6% in September from August and was up 5.3% from September 1988, according to Eurostat, the EC's statistical agency.  The month-to-month rise in the index was the largest since April, Eurostat said.  Efforts by the Hong Kong Futures Exchange to introduce a new interest-rate futures contract continue to hit snags, despite the support the proposed instrument enjoys in the colony's financial community.  Hong Kong financial institutions have been waiting for interest-rate futures for a long time.  The contract was first proposed more than two years ago, but shortly afterward, the colony's markets were hit hard by the October 1987 global stock crash.  The subsequent drive to reform Hong Kong's markets also has embroiled the interest-rate futures contract.  The Securities and Futures Commission, a government watchdog set up after the 1987 crash to try to restore confidence and order to Hong Kong's markets, had been expected to give the contract conditional approval last week.  But regulators this week said futures-exchange officials still have a way to go before they answer all the remaining detailed questions about the contract.  The exchange had forecast that the contract would begin trading by December.  But securities regulators now say privately that it isn't likely to start until the first quarter of next year.  Analysts and financial officials in the British colony consider the new contract essential to the revival of the Hong Kong Futures Exchange, which has never fully recovered from the October 1987 crash.  Many believe that without a healthy futures exchange, Hong Kong's aspirations to be recognized as an international financial center will suffer.  In addition, local banks say the new contract is important in helping them offset their Hong Kong-dollar exposure.  The contract will be based on the three-month Hong Kong interbank offered rate, or Hibor.  It is almost a carbon copy of the Chicago Mercantile Exchange's Eurodollar contract, which is based on the three-month Eurodollar rate, the rate paid on U.S.-dollar deposits in London banks.  If the contract is as successful as some expect, it may do much to restore confidence in futures trading in Hong Kong.  "The contract is definitely important to the exchange," says Robert Gilmore, executive director of the Securities and Futures Commission.  Two years ago, the futures exchange was the envy of other would-be futures centers.  After only 17 months, its main contract, based on the Hang Seng index, had grown to be the second-largest stock-index-futures contract in the world.  {A futures contract is an agreement to buy or sell a commodity or financial instrument at a set price on a specified date.  In the case of stock-index and interest-rate futures, the instruments are given an underlying cash value and are settled in cash.}  But in the week following the 1987 stock crash, the exchange verged on collapse, and the stock and futures markets in Hong Kong were closed for four days.  Only a government-sponsored bailout kept the crisis from swallowing the exchange.  Trading in Hang Seng index futures remains crippled by the experience.  Volume for the entire month of September totaled only 21,687 contracts, compared with a daily average of 27,000 in the month before the 1987 crash.  Despite the thin trading, and after two painful years of restructuring, the futures market has shown itself to be resilient in two recent tests.  While Asian markets struggled to cope with the uncertainty caused by the Oct. 13 plunge in New York stock prices, futures trading in Hong Kong was relatively heavy and went smoothly.  That was also the case in the days following the June 4 massacre in Beijing, which caused a sharp drop in Hong Kong stock prices.  "There was no problem at all," says Douglas Ford, chief executive officer of the futures exchange.  Most important to the contract's success is the commitment of Hong Kong's big financial institutions, especially the two leaders, Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. and the local subsidiary of Britain's Standard Chartered Bank PLC.  The two big banks were instrumental in designing the new contract.  "If those two banks are there, then the balance of the banking institutions will be there," says Mr. Gilmore, the Securities and Futures Commission official.  Colony banks have a major stake in how interest rates move because of their enormous Hong Kong-dollar exposure.  Even though the currency is pegged to the U.S. dollar, with a fixed exchange rate of HK$7.8 to the American currency, the U.S. and Hong Kong economies don't always move in lock step, making it difficult to predict where interest rates in the colony will go.  In early 1988, when the three-month Eurodollar rate was between 7% and 8%, the three-month Hibor rate was as low as 1%.  Just a few months ago, the three-month Eurodollar rate was around 9.5%, while three-month Hibor hit highs above 11%.  The Hibor contract "solves quite a bit of the problem of interest-rate risk in the interbank market," says Eric Cheng, a director of James Capel (Far East) Ltd., the Hong Kong arm of the British brokerage firm.  Despite the initial support expected, trading in the contract is likely to start slowly.  The wounds from the 1987 crash haven't yet healed, and not all claims against the exchange clearinghouse -- by those who bet the Hang Seng index would fall -- have been settled.  Companies and financial institutions familiar with Hong Kong remain wary of trading in its futures market.  And Mr. Gilmore cautions that there may be limits on how much the contract can grow because the Hong Kong dollar isn't a widely traded currency.  He says the contract will be considered a success if it starts trading 500 to 1,000 lots a day.  Exchange officials also point out that Hibor futures were designed for institutions and corporations, not for the type of small individual investors who were very active in Hang Seng index futures and defaulted in the 1987 crash.  Mr. Cheng says the low margin required for trading futures attracted a lot of small investors before the 1987 crash who didn't realize that their risk was virtually unlimited.  "You're not going to get your taxi drivers and amahs and all that," says Rory Nicholas, a director for securities company Elders Bullion & Futures Ltd.  That should help to inspire confidence, Mr. Gilmore says.  But many bankers remain nervous, especially as the start-up of the contract continues to be delayed.  Two of Japan's largest paper manufacturers, Oji Paper Co. and Jujo Paper Co., posted unconsolidated pretax profit gains from a year earlier for the first half ended Sept. 30, on continuing robust domestic demand for paper products.  Oji Paper, the nation's largest in terms of sales, said its pretax profit rose 1.5% to 23.11 billion yen (US$163.3 million) from 22.76 billion yen.  Sales jumped 12.2% to 232.12 billion yen from 206.87 billion yen.  Net income increased 6.7% to 12.43 billion yen from 11.66 billion yen.  Per-share net rose to 20.48 yen from 19.51 yen.  Oji Paper's sales strength was evident in overall paper products sales, including newsprints, printing and wrapping papers, which rose to 221.61 billion yen in the first half from 200.70 billion yen a year earlier.  Pulp, processed and miscellaneous paper sales also surged.  For the full fiscal year ending next March, Oji predicted that total sales of 477.00 billion yen, up from 420.68 billion yen in the previous fiscal year.  Pretax profit is seen at 45.00 billion yen, down from 47.17 billion yen, while net income is estimated at 23.500 billion yen, up from 23.031 billion yen.  The company didn't provide an explanation for the softer pretax profit performance and officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Jujo Paper said its pretax profit rose 0.3% to 13.05 billion yen from 13.02 billion yen.  Sales rose 8.5% to 195.19 billion yen from 179.916 billion yen.  Net income surged 10% to 7.12 billion yen from 6.47 billion yen.  Per-share net rose to 14.95 yen from 14.44 yen.  General paper product sales, including newsprints and other papers, accounting for the bulk of sales, rose to 157.78 billion yen from 143.88 billion yen.  Jujo Paper predicted that for the full fiscal year ending next March 31, sales will total 400.0 billion yen, up from 366.89 billion yen.  Pretax profit was estimated at 23.0 billion yen, down from 25.51 billion yen, while net income was estimated at 12 billion yen, up from 11.95 billion yen.  Unocal Corp.'s decision to put its Norwegian oil and gas interests up for sale earlier this week is another step in the company's strategic review of its properties, and shows that few of them are sacred cows.  The company declined to estimate the value of the Norwegian holding.  But Eugene L. Nowak, an analyst at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., forecast that the sale will bring in "$200 million or substantially more."  The proposed transaction is the latest in a redeployment of assets by the Los Angeles-based oil company that has included the $200 million sale of its headquarters property and the pending sale of half of its Chicago refinery and related marketing operations to Petroleos de Venezuela S.A.  Mr. Nowak said he attaches particular importance to the proposed sale because it suggests that the company is willing to sell oil and gas assets that aren't part of its major strategic strengths.  Unocal said it expects to complete the sale of its Unocal Norge A/S unit by next March or April.  In addition to an 18% stake in the Veslefrikk offshore field, the Norwegian unit has interests ranging from 10% to 25% in three other Norwegian oil and gas production licenses.  In 1986, Unocal sold a 7.5% stake in the Veslefrikk field to Deutsche Erdolversorgungs G.m.b.H., a West German oil company, for an undisclosed amount.  In 1987, it sold a 2.5% stake in the Veslefrikk field to the Swedish national oil company, resulting in a $7 million after-tax gain.  However, those sales were early in the field's history, before production equipment was installed.  The field is currently being developed and is slated to start production by the end of the year.  It's expected to produce about 62,000 barrels per day.  A company spokesman said the Veslefrikk field's gross reserves were estimated in 1987 at 229 million barrels.  However, he added that that estimate, made before extensive development drilling, currently is being reappraised.  The spokesman said Unocal has had "considerable interest" from prospective buyers.  The company has retained J. Henry Schroder Wagg & Co. as financial adviser and agent for the sale.  France's unemployment rate was steady at a seasonally adjusted 9.5% in September, the Social Affairs Ministry said.  In September, the number of jobless rose 0.1% from the previous month to 2.5 million on a seasonally adjusted basis.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Tenneco Credit Corp. -- $150 million of 9 1/4% senior notes due Nov. 1, 1996, priced at 99.625 to yield 9.324%.  The noncallable issue was priced at a spread of 144 basis points above the Treasury's seven-year note.  Rated Baa-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Tenneco Credit is a unit of Tenneco Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Allegany Health System -- three-part issue of $156.7 million of revenue bonds, tentatively priced through a Morgan Stanley & Co. group.  The offering includes a new issue of $53 million of Tampa, Fla., Series 1989 revenue bonds for St. Joseph's Hospital Inc., due 1996-2000, 2005 and 2023.  The bonds are tentatively priced to yield from 6.90% in 1996 to 7.55% in 2023.  The other two portions of the deal are remarketings of outstanding debt rather than new issues.  The bonds are rated single-A by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, according to the lead underwriter.  City and County of Honolulu -- $75 million of general obligation bonds, 1989 Series B, due 1993-2009, through a Bear, Stearns & Co. group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 6.20% in 1993 to 7.10% in 2008 and 2009.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 12 classes by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The offering, Series 1989-89, backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $33.2 billion and its total Remic volume to $45.3 billion since the program began in April 1987.  Pricing terms weren't available.  @ EUROBONDS  Kyushu Electric Power Co. (Japan) -- $200 million of 8 7/8% bonds due Nov. 28, 1996, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 8 7/8% less full fees, via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Toshiba Corp. (Japan) -- $1.2 billion of bonds due Nov. 16, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 3 3/4% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries a warrant exercisable Dec. 1, 1989, through Nov. 9, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Nov. 2.  Credit Lyonnais Australia Ltd. (French parent) -- 50 million Australian dollars of 16 1/4% bonds due Nov. 30, 1992, priced at 102 to yield 16.03% less full fees, via Hambros Bank Ltd. Guarantee by Credit Lyonnais.  Fees 1 1/2.  World Bank (agency) -- #100 million of 10 7/8% bonds due Aug. 15, 1994, offered at 96.95 to yield 11.71%, via Baring Brothers & Co. Tap on outstanding #100 million issue.  Also issued were 10 billion yen of bonds due Dec. 5, 1994, priced at 101 1/2, with coupon paid in Australian dollars, via LTCB International Ltd. Interest during first year paid semiannually at 7.51%.  Thereafter, interest paid annually at 7.65%.  The World Bank also offered 100 million Swiss francs of 6% bonds due Nov. 16, 1999, priced at 101 1/4 to yield 5.83% via Credit Suisse.  Option by borrower to increase issue amount to 150 million francs.  Mandom Corp. (Japan) -- 80 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with fixed 0.25% coupon at par, via Nomura Bank Switzerland.  Put March 31, 1992, at a fixed 107 3/4 to yield 3.43%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible Dec. 4, 1989, through March 17, 1994, at a 5% premium over closing share price Nov. 1, when terms are fixed.  Nippon Air Brake Co. (Japan) -- 140 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with fixed 0.25% coupon at par, via Yamaichi Bank (Switzerland).  Put March 31, 1992, at fixed 107 13/16 to yield 3.43%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible Nov. 27, 1989, through March 17, 1994, at a 5% premium over closing share price Nov. 1, when terms are fixed.  Credit Suisse Finance Gibraltar Ltd. (Swiss parent) -- 100 billion lire of 12 5/8% bonds due June 30, 1993, priced at 101.45 to yield 12.75% less full fees, via Banca Nazionale del Lavaro.  Guarantee by Credit Suisse.  Fees 1 5/8.  @ OTHER Maryland National Bank -- $267 million of securities backed by home-equity lines of credit through Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The bank is a subsidiary of Baltimore-based MNC Financial Inc.  The securities were priced to float monthly at 20 basis points above the 30-day commercial paper rate.  The issue, formally titled MNB Home Equity Loan Asset Backed Certificates, Series 1989, will represent interest in a trust fund of home equity revolving credit line loans originated by the retail finance division of Maryland National Bank and secured primarily by second deeds of trust or second mortgages on single to four-family residential properties.  The securities are rated triple-A by Moody's and Duff & Phelps Inc.  They are expected to have an average life of 3.16 years.  Maryland National Bank's retail finance division will continue to service the loans.  First National Bank of Chicago will act as trustee, and the transaction will be supported by an 8% letter of credit issued by Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd., Chicago branch.  Province of Nova Scotia -- $250 million of 8 1/4% debentures due Nov. 15, 2019, priced at 99.775 to yield 8.28%.  The noncallable issue, which can be put back to the province in 2001, was priced at a spread of 41 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Bausch & Lomb Inc. said it plans to introduce next year a new line of sunglasses containing melanin, the pigment that protects against damage from ultraviolet rays.  The optical products company has signed a licensing agreement with Photoprotective Technologies Inc., a closely held firm in San Antonio, Texas, which has developed a method to incorporate the synthetic melanin into plastic lenses.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Security Pacific Corp. has set its sights on buying its second bank holding company this year.  Security said it signed a letter of intent to purchase La Jolla Bancorp, agreeing to pay $15 of its own stock for each share of La Jolla.  Based on the current number of La Jolla shares, that gives the transaction a value of $104 million.  La Jolla is the parent company of La Jolla Bank & Trust Co., which has 12 branches in San Diego County.  As of Sept. 30, the bank had assets of $511 million and deposits of $469 million, Security Pacific said.  Earlier this month, Security Pacific, which is among the 10 largest bank holding companies in the U.S., completed the acquisition of San Diego-based Southwest Bancorp.  South Africa's current account surplus swelled to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of between five billion and six billion rand ($1.9 billion and $2.28 billion) in the third quarter, Reserve Bank Governor Chris Stals said.  The surplus was two billion rand in the second quarter and 2.7 billion rand in the first quarter.  He said this improvement means it is still possible to reach the targeted current account surplus of four billion rand for 1989.  Moscom Corp. said its board approved the repurchase of as many as 300,000 common shares when market conditions are suitable.  The maker of telecommunications management systems had 6,420,268 shares outstanding as of Sept. 30.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Moscom closed at $4.375, up 37.5 cents.  Service Corp. International said it expects to report net income of 15 cents a share for the third quarter.  The company said it expects to release third-quarter results in mid-November.  The funeral home and cemetery operator changed from a fiscal year to a calendar year in December.  In the comparable year-ago quarter, the second quarter ended Oct. 31, Service Corp. had a loss of about $12.5 million, or 26 cents a share, on revenue of $175.4 million.  Results for that quarter included a $30 million, or 40 cents a share, write-down associated with the consolidation of a facility.  Your Sept. 25 criticism of credit-card foreign-exchange charges is unwarranted.  I have just returned from France, and the net exchange rate charged on my Visa account was more favorable than I obtained for traveler's checks in any of the several banks where I converted them.  Vincent Jolivet  Kenmore, Wash.  The state-controlled French metals group Pechiney S.A. said it has signed a preliminary accord to sell its Paris headquarters to Groupement Foncier Francais and Nouveaux Constructeurs for 2.76 billion francs ($443 million).  The sale, which Pechiney had been eager to make for several months, is still subject to certain unspecified conditions and is expected to be completed during the first quarter of 1990, the group.  Hong Kong's main measure of consumer prices rose 10% in September from a year earlier, the government said.  The Consumer Price Index "A", which measures price changes for the 50% of urban households that spend between 2,000 Hong Kong dollars (US$256.18) and HK$6,499 a month, edged up 1.5% in September from August.  Index "B", which monitors price changes for the 30% of urban households that spend between HK$6,500 and HK$9,999 a month, rose 9.9% last month from a year earlier and was up 1.3% from the preceding month.  September's Hang Seng Consumer Price Index, which measures price changes for the 10% of urban households spending HK$10,000 and HK$24,999 a month, was up 11% from a year ago and up 1.3% from August.  The main factors for the September increase from the previous month were higher prices for services, food and housing.  Prices fell marginally for fuel and electricity.  West German and French authorities have cleared Dresdner Bank AG's takeover of a majority stake in Banque Internationale de Placement (BIP), Dresdner Bank said.  The approval, which had been expected, permits West Germany's second-largest bank to acquire shares of the French investment bank.  In a first step, Dresdner Bank will buy 32.99% of BIP for 1,015 French francs ($162) a share, or 528 million francs ($84.7 million).  Dresdner Bank said it will also buy all shares tendered by shareholders on the Paris Stock Exchange at the same price from today through Nov. 17.  In addition, the bank has an option to buy a 30.84% stake in BIP from Societe Generale after Jan. 1, 1990 at 1,015 francs a share.  Furukawa Electric Co., one of Japan's leading electric wire and cable manufacturers, said unconsolidated pretax profit in the fiscal first half ended Sept. 30 fell 5.3% to 6.11 billion yen ($43.1 million) from 6.45 billion yen a year earlier.  Sales increased 11.9% to 279.39 billion yen from 249.68 billion yen.  Net fell 1% to 3.23 billion yen from 3.26 billion yen.  Pershare net fell to 4.97 yen from 5.40 yen.  The growing sales sustained by domestic demand failed to counter rising material metal costs and declining profitability in overseas construction, Furukawa said.  Rolled copper product sales were major contributors to overall sales growth.  Sales by category rose 24% to 35.23 billion yen, reflecting increased production in automobile, airconditioner and electric machine industries, which are major users of wire and cable products.  Sales for electric wires and cables rose 13.2% to 153.93 billion yen.  West Germany's cost-of-living index rose a preliminary 0.3% in October from September and was up 3.3% from a year earlier, the Federal Statistics Office in Wiesbaden said.  The increase follows a monthly rise of 0.2% in September from August.  Preliminary cost-of-living data for the current month are calculated based on inflation data from the four largest West German states -- Baden-Wuerttemberg, North Rhine-Westphalia, Bavaria and Hesse.  The Philippine government awarded Finland's Outokumpu Oy the contract to upgrade the facilities of Philippine Associated Smelting & Refining Corp., according to documents from National Development Corp., one of Philippine company's owners.  The project costs $46.8 million, and is intended to boost the company's production capacity by 25% to 34,500 metric tons of copper cathode a year.  Outokumpu is a mining, trading and construction concern.  September sales at major Japanese retail stores rose 9.4% from a year earlier to 1.388 trillion yen ($9.81 billion), marking the fifth-consecutive monthly increase, the Ministry of International Trade and Industry announced.  According to the ministry, retail sales at major department stores were up 12% to 745.7 billion yen, while sales at supermarkets rose 6.7% to 642 billion yen.  September's growth followed a 8.7% rise in July and an 8% increase in August, showing continued expansion at high year-on-year levels.  A ministry official said the growth leads to the conclusion the adverse effects of a consumption tax introduced in April have diminished.  Shell Canada Ltd. said it plans to build a lubricants blending and packaging plant at Brockville, Ontario, with start-up scheduled for 1992.  A spokesman said the plant, which will replace older lubricant and grease manufacturing plants in Montreal and Toronto, will cost about 50 million Canadian dollars (US$42.5 million) to build.  Brockville is about 100 miles east of Toronto.  Shell Canada, an oil and gas producer and marketer, is a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group, an Anglo-Dutch concern.  When the going gets tough, it's tough to trade stocks in continental Europe.  That's the troubling conclusion reached by many international investors and money managers angry at the malfunctions on Continental stock exchanges during last week's global market turbulence.  They say the recent market volatility has underscored the shortcomings of the way many European exchanges trade stocks.  The weaknesses of Continental exchanges are driving some fund managers to switch business to stocks traded on London's stock exchange, which quotes firm trading prices for about 350 blue-chip issues from 12 major countries.  "I'm not saying London covered itself in glory, but the events of the past week have certainly exposed Europe's weaknesses," says Stewart Gilchrist, a director of Scottish Amicable Investment Managers in Glasgow, Scotland, which manages about #6 billion ($9.63 billion) in institutional money.  He says the problems on European exchanges included market-system breakdowns, delayed execution of buy and sell orders and trading suspensions.  "The events strengthen London's hand in becoming the center for trading European stocks," Mr. Gilchrist says.  Unable to unload a large block of a French blue-chip company's shares in Paris for two days last week, a frustrated Scottish Amicable fund manager finally tossed down her phone in disgust and called James Capel & Co., a London brokerage firm.  The firm did the trade in seconds on the London stock exchange's SEAQ automated-quotation system.  On so-called Manic Monday, Oct. 16, stock prices plunged across Europe and trading problems erupted.  London had some problems, too.  The London exchange's electronic price-reporting system provided only indicative, or non-firm, prices for about 40 minutes on Manic Monday.  Some dealers say other traders weren't picking up their phones.  But London's problems were nothing compared with the Continent's.  In Brussels, which recently spent millions of dollars on a computer-assisted trading system, disgusted traders watched helplessly as a software failure before opening on Manic Monday prevented trading for two days.  For 48 hours, no one had any idea precisely how much his securities were worth.  By Wednesday, frustrated Belgian brokers reopened the market by using the time-honored method of quoting stocks with chalk on a blackboard.  The Belgian computer system finally was repaired and restarted on Tuesday of this week, with the aid of Toronto Stock Exchange officials who developed the system.  In Frankfurt, which only has a two-hour daily stock-trading session even in the best of times, stocks didn't open for the first 45 minutes because of order imbalances that brokers blame on a wave of sell orders from small investors.  As banks processed six-foot telexes of sell orders, the crush led to Manic Monday's worst decline: German stocks ended down 13%.  Exchange officials extended trading hours, 75 minutes on Monday and 65 minutes on Tuesday, to clear up order backlogs.  In France, more than half the top 25 blue-chip stocks -- including such giants as BSN and Elf Aquitaine -- didn't open until Wall Street rallied late in the European trading day, traders say.  The rally transformed some big sell orders into big buy orders, solving an order-imbalance problem.  But by that time, many big institutions had switched business to London.  "Belgium was closed for two days, France closed for a couple of hours, Germany was stuck.  It was a nightmare," says Susan Noble, an investment manager at Robert Fleming Holdings Ltd.'s International Investment Management unit in London.  "It's very worrying that these markets can't cope."  On Manic Monday, the volume of German shares traded in London more than tripled to 2.2 million, and the volume of French shares rose 48%. (By comparison, German domestic stock volume in Frankfurt only doubled that day.)  The switch to the London market during such turbulent times is significant.  For one thing, the size of the affected market is enormous -- the European stock markets account for some 22.5% of global stock market capitalization, with an estimated value of $2.175 trillion, according to Morgan Stanley Capital International.  The Continental markets alone contribute about 14.3% of estimated world market capitalization of $9.671 trillion.  Though the widely traded shares that are quoted in London account for only a small portion of those totals, they still are the most closely watched stocks and are often viewed as a barometer for the local markets generally.  The switch to London underscores the fact that despite the economic restructuring associated with European Community efforts to develop a single market by 1992, European stock trading remains a highly fragmented and very localized activity.  Against this backdrop, one thing that doesn't seem likely to result from 1992 is a single European stock market.  Rather, there increasingly is a group of international brokerage and trading firms that operate in most European financial centers -- including European giants such as Barclays Bank PLC and Deutsche Bank, as well as Merrill Lynch & Co. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. of the U.S. and Japan's Nomura Securities Co.  These firms, which often have acquired a local brokerage firm, are calling the shots when it comes to deciding in which market to transact a trade.  And senior officials of two U.S. securities houses say they switched trades in European stocks to the London market last week when they couldn't unwind positions on the Continent.  Meantime, brokers on the Continent are worried, too, mostly by the potential loss of business.  "I would be much happier if this volume {in German stocks} were in Frankfurt rather than London," says Dieter Bauernfeind, head of international equity sales at Dresdner Bank in Frankfurt.  He acknowledges that spreads "were too wide and volumes too light" in the extreme conditions on Manic Monday.  Already the Germans appear to be acting; at a special meeting on the day of the decline, directors of the Frankfurt Stock Exchange voted to extend their trading hours, although they haven't decided when or by how much.  A Frankfurt exchange official, acknowledging the brokers' anxieties, says the market still feels it "functioned OK during this crash."  The Dutch, who had some trading problems because of insufficient computer capacity, say new equipment to solve the problems ought to be installed within a month.  Says a spokeswoman for the Brussels Bourse: "Nobody around here will tell you they are happy the system didn't work.  But it's just one of those things that happened.  Investors can be assured now that this kind of problem can never occur again."  But for others, the pledges echo the promises made after the 1987 stock crash, when similar problems led many markets to develop the new systems that performed so badly last week.  "They all said they invested huge amounts of money.  But they either didn't buy the right machines or they wasted it," says Fleming's Ms. Noble.  Canadian steel production totaled 290,541 metric tons in the week ended Oct. 21, a 5.1% increase from 276,334 tons the previous week but a 7.2% decline from 313,125 tons a year earlier, Statistics Canada said.  The federal agency said that in the year through Oct. 21 production totaled 12,573,758 tons, up 7.1% from 11,742,368 tons.  Trinova Corp. said it will resume buying back as many as three million of its common shares under a program announced two years ago.  Trinova, which had 34.2 million common shares outstanding Sept. 30, had repurchased 29,700 shares since October 1987 before this latest announcement.  The company said it isn't making a commitment to purchase a specific number of shares.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Trinova closed at $32.125, up 12.5 cents.  Calgene Inc. and Gustafson Inc. said they plan a joint project to develop biological products to control such plant diseases as aflatoxin, a potent cancer-causing agent.  Under the plan, the companies will use Calgene's patented technology to encapsulate microbes such as Bacillus subtilis, a bacterium, to enhance their biological activity against plant diseases.  Calgene, an agricultural biotechnology concern, said initial work will concentrate on a proprietary strain of Bacillus subtilis which has shown promise for controlling aflatoxin.  The strain was discovered by Morinaga & Co. and licensed to Gustafson, a unit of Uniroyal Chemical Co.  Aflatoxin is released by molds during grain and seed storage.  The recent appearance of aflatoxin in such foods as corn and peanut butter has sparked public concern and consumer scrutiny of food handling and storage procedures.  European Community employers fear that the EC Commission's plans for a "charter of fundamental social rights" is a danger to industrial competitiveness.  "We don't want Brussels deciding conditions for workers unless they are necessary and useful," said Zygmunt Tyszkiewicz, secretary general of the employers' confederation Unice.  Unice -- an acronym for the Union of Industrial and Employers' Confederations of Europe -- fears that the charter will force EC countries to adopt a single pattern in labor relations.  Workers and management, Mr. Tyszkiewicz said, would lose the "flexibility and diversity" that has so far allowed them to adapt to local conditions and traditions.  The British government also strongly opposes the charter in its current form.  It argues, as does Unice, that labor relations are best left to be regulated at the national level.  France will propose a slightly watered-down version of the charter to be discussed by EC social-affairs ministers on Monday, officials said.  But the cosmetic changes aren't expected to win over Britain.  "We still have serious differences with the text," a British official said, because it provides for a "regulation of the labor market."  Mr. Tyszkiewicz said the charter would put poorer EC countries such as Spain, Greece and Portugal at a disadvantage.  It would force these countries to introduce minimum standards for pay and working hours, and provide for collective bargaining and worker "participation" in major corporate decisions.  This, he warned, would prevent these countries from bridging the difference with their richer EC brethren.  Indeed, lower wages -- in Greece, they are a third of the EC average -- aren't enough to offset higher transport costs and lower productivity in the southern countries.  Increasing labor costs, Mr. Tyszkiewicz argued, would only put the countries at a further disadvantage in competing in the barrier-free EC market planned for after 1992.  But the Unice official said that producing a charter acceptable to both Britain and European industry isn't an unattainable goal.  The charter would just have to be restricted to a list of workers' fundamental rights, without seeking to impose any norms.  A key provision in the current version of the charter would give the commission a mandate to produce an "action program" detailing on what points EC member states would be required to comply with the goals set out in the charter.  This provision lies at the heart of the British and Unice fears of "social engineering" by the commission.  One possible political solution, an EC official said, would be for the commission to present the action program in late November, before the adoption of the charter at a summit of EC governments on Dec. 8 and 9.  This would leave Britain free to adopt the charter after having rebutted the action program.  The charter was approved by the EC Commission on Sept. 21.  France's Socialist government, which currently holds the council's rotating presidency, is committed to having the charter adopted by all 12 EC states before the end of 1989 -- the bicentennial of the French revolution and its "Universal Declaration of Human Rights."  Bruno DeGol, chairman of DeGol Brothers Lumber, Gallitzin, Pa., was named a director of this bank-holding company, expanding the board to 11 members.  Sam Ramirez and his men are late.  They pile out of their truck and furiously begin twisting together steel pipes linking a giant storage tank to the Sharpshooter, a freshly drilled oil well two miles deep.  If they finish today, the Sharpshooter can pump tomorrow.  One roustabout, hanging by his hands from a ladder, bounces his weight on a three-foot wrench to loosen a stuck fitting.  "We've been putting in long hours," Mr. Ramirez says -- six-day weeks and 13-hour days for the last two months.  A year ago, when almost nothing was happening amid these desolate dunes, "you'd spend two days working and two days in the yard," he recalls.  After a three-year nightmare of uncertain oil prices, draconian budget cuts and sweeping layoffs, fear is finally leaving the oil patch.  Independent drillers are gingerly sinking bits into the Earth's crust again.  Some in Big Oil are easing the grip on their wallets.  Investment capital is creeping back, and oil properties are fetching more.  Oil-tool prices are even edging up.  What happened?  In broadest terms, stability has quietly settled into international oil markets.  Mideast politics have calmed down and the squabbling within the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries seems under control for now.  "The fundamentals of supply and demand once again are setting oil prices," says Victor Burk, an Arthur Andersen & Co. oil expert.  After years of wild swings, oil prices over the last 12 months have settled at around $15 to $20 a barrel.  That isn't the $40 that delighted producers a decade ago or the $10 that pleased users a year ago.  But it is high enough to prod the search for future supplies, low enough to promote consumption and, most important, steady enough for both producers and users to believe in.  Not that oil suddenly is a sure thing again.  The current equilibrium is fragile and depends on steady, strong demand and continued relative harmony within OPEC, producer of more than 40% of the non-Communist world's crude.  A recession or new OPEC blowup could put oil markets right back in the soup.  Also, the new stirrings are faint, and some question their extent.  Drilling activity is still far below eight years ago, there's no hiring surge and some companies continue to shrink.  With all this, even the most wary oil men agree something has changed.  "It doesn't appear to be getting worse.  That in itself has got to cause people to feel a little more optimistic," says Glenn Cox, the president of Phillips Petroleum Co.  Though modest, the change reaches beyond the oil patch, too.  The same roller-coaster prices that halted U.S. oil exploration and drove many veteran oil men and companies out of the business also played havoc with the nation's inflation rate, the trade deficit and oil users' corporate and personal budgets.  Now, at least some predictability has returned, for everyone from economists to motorists.  Corporate planners can plan again.  "Management doesn't want surprises," notes Jack Zaves, who, as fuel-services director at American Airlines, buys some 2.4 billion gallons of jet fuel a year.  Prices had been so unstable that two years ago Mr. Zaves gave up on long-term forecasts.  And consumers "should be comfortable," adds W. Henson Moore, U.S. deputy secretary of energy.  "I don't see anything on the horizon that could lead to a precipitous rise in the price."  The catalyst for all this has been OPEC.  About a year ago, it ended an on-again, off-again internal production war that had put prices on a roller coaster and pitched oil towns from Houston to Caracas into recession.  Saudi Arabia, OPEC's kingpin, abandoned a policy of flooding the market to punish quota-cheaters.  About the same time, the Iran-Iraq war, which was roiling oil markets, ended.  In addition, global petroleum demand has been climbing.  It is projected to keep growing by a million barrels a day, or up to 2% annually, for years to come.  For OPEC, that's ideal.  The resulting firm prices and stability "will allow both producers and consumers to plan confidently," says Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer.  OPEC Secretary-General Subroto explains: Consumers offer security of markets, while OPEC provides security of supply.  "This is an opportune time to find mutual ways {to prevent} price shocks from happening again," he says.  To promote this balance, OPEC now is finally confronting a long-simmering internal problem.  At its November meeting, it will try to revise its quotas to satisfy Persian Gulf members that can produce far more oil than their allotments.  Being held well below capacity greatly irritates them, and has led to widespread cheating.  OPEC has repeatedly raised its self-imposed production ceiling to legitimize some of that unauthorized output.  Oil ministers now hope to solve the issue for good through an Iranian proposal that gives a larger share of output to countries with surplus capacity and reduces the shares of those that can't produce more anyway.  But "if they walk out without any effort to resolve their problem, production could increase to 23 million or 24 million barrels a day, making for a very troublesome first quarter," warns Nordine Ait-Laoussine, a consultant and former Algerian OPEC delegate.  That would send prices plummeting from what some gun-shy U.S. oil executives still regard as too low a level.  Patrick J. Early, president of Amoco Corp.'s oil-production unit, says that despite recent stability, he plans continued tightening of costs and exploration spending.  The view of some others in Big Oil, he maintains, "is very much {similar to} Amoco's outlook."  Just this week Mobil Corp. disclosed new cutbacks in its domestic exploration and production operations.  Out here on the Querecho Plains of New Mexico, however, the mood is more upbeat; trucks rumble along the dusty roads and burly men in hard hats sweat and swear through the afternoon sun.  Santa Fe Energy Co., a unit of Santa Fe Southern Pacific Co., bought from Amoco the rights that allowed it to drill the Sharpshooter.  A mile and a half away looms the 150-foot-tall rig of the Sniper, due to be pumping by December.  "Talk is that everybody is going to drill more wells," says foreman Tommy Folsom.  Santa Fe aims to drill about 30 wells in this area in 1989 and double that next year.  It is more aggressive than most, but it isn't the only company with a new attitude, as it found when it went looking for a partner for the Sharpshooter.  "We went to six companies over two days pitching the prospect," says Tim Parker, a Santa Fe exploration manager.  "Five were interested."  Mitchell Energy & Development Corp. became the partner, ponying up more than half of the $600,000 in drilling and start-up costs.  Mitchell will get a half-interest in the oil.  "A kind of no-mistakes mentality" had been stifling activity, says Don Covey, Mitchell's oil exploration chief.  Now "everybody is a lot more optimistic."  One attraction for oil operators here and in other fields is the bargain-basement cost of drilling and equipment, reflecting service companies' hunger for work.  Kadane Oil Co., a small Texas independent, is currently drilling two wells itself and putting money into three others.  One of its wells, in southwestern Oklahoma, is a "rank wildcat," a risky well where oil previously hasn't been found.  "At this price, $18 plus or minus, and with costs being significantly less than they were several years ago, the economics are pretty good," says George Kadane, head of the company.  "If you know you've got stability in price, you can do things you wouldn't do with the volatility of the past few years."  The activity is enough to move some oil-service prices back up a little.  Some drill-bit prices have risen 5% in the past month.  In the Gulf of Mexico, a boat to deliver supplies to offshore rigs now costs around $3,000 a day, up nearly 60% since June.  Some service boats recently were auctioned for about $1.7 million each, up from less than $1 million two years ago.  At the bottom of the slump, Schlumberger Inc. was discounting 75% on an electronic evaluation of a well; now it discounts about 50%, drillers say.  Still, there is money to be made.  Most oil companies, when they set exploration and production budgets for this year, forecast revenue of $15 for each barrel of crude produced.  Prices have averaged more than $2 a barrel higher than that -- not a windfall, but at least a pleasant bonus for them.  So, according to a Dun & Bradstreet Corp. survey, companies that had been refusing to spend even their very conservative budgets may loosen up before year end.  It says 40% of those surveyed report that 1989 exploration spending will exceed 1988's.  Funds for drilling may inch up more next year if oil prices stay stable.  Texaco, thinking in terms of $18-to-$19 oil for 1990, may raise spending, especially for low-risk prospects, an official says.  Outside investors, scarce since '86, are edging back.  Although "it's still difficult to raise money for a pure wildcat program," says William Thomas, a Texas Commerce Bank official in Houston, "institutions are starting to see there are cycles to these things, and this one is beginning to turn."  Wall Street generally likes the industry again.  The appetite for oil-service stocks has been especially strong, although some got hit yesterday when Shearson Lehman Hutton cut its short-term investment ratings on them.  Contractors such as Parker Drilling Co. are raising cash again through stock offerings, and for the first time in years, two oil-service companies recently went public. (They are Grace Energy Corp. of Dallas and Marine Drilling Co. of Houston.)  Most oil companies are still reluctant to add to the office and professional staffs they slashed so deeply.  But a few new spots are opening.  Arthur Andersen, the accounting firm, has increased its energy staff 10% in a year.  Out in the oil fields, if activity picks up much more, shortages could appear because so many roughnecks, roustabouts and others left after the crash.  Already "it's hard to get people.  They're so busy," says one Santa Fe drilling foreman here.  For most field workers, it's about time.  Mr. Ramirez, who arrived late at the Sharpshooter with his crew because he had started early in the morning setting up tanks at another site, just got the first raise he can remember in eight years, to $8.50 an hour from $8.  Norman Young, a "mud-logger" at the Sniper well, has worked all but about nine days of this year.  Last year, "I was off a straight month, then one time for two to three weeks and another two to three weeks," he says.  Butch McCarty, who sells oil-field equipment for Davis Tool Co., is also busy.  A native of the area, he is back now after riding the oil-field boom to the top, then surviving the bust running an Oklahoma City convenience store.  "First year I came back there wasn't any work," he says.  "I think it's on the way back now.  But it won't be a boom again.  No major booms, no major setbacks," he predicts.  Business has been good enough that he just took a spur-of-the-moment weekend trip to the mountain area of Cloudcroft, something "I haven't done in years."  The figures confirm that there certainly isn't any drilling boom.  Only 14,505 wells, including 4,900 dry holes, were drilled for oil and natural gas in the U.S. in the first nine months of the year, down 22.4% from the like 1988 period.  But that was off less than at midyear, when completions lagged by 27.1%.  And the number of rigs active in the U.S. is inching up.  According to Baker Hughes Inc., 992 rotary rigs were at work in the U.S. last week, up from the year-ago count of 933. (In 1981, before the bust, the rig count was above 4,000.) Global offshore-rig use shows a similar upward trend.  Some equipment going to work is almost new.  Grace Energy just two weeks ago hauled a rig here 500 miles from Caspar, Wyo., to drill the Bilbrey well, a 15,000-foot, $1-million-plus natural gas well.  The rig was built around 1980, but has drilled only two wells, the last in 1982.  Until now it had sat idle.  For Zel Herring, owner and a cook at the Sandhills Luncheon Cafe, a tin building in midtown, all this has made for a very good year.  After 11:30 a.m. or so "we have them standing and waiting," she says, as she whips out orders for hamburgers and the daily special (grilled roast beef, cheese and jalapeno pepper sandwich on whole wheat, potato salad, baked beans and pudding, plus coffee or iced tea.  Price: $4.50).  Mike Huber, a roustabout, is even making it in his new career as an entrepreneur.  He started Arrow Roustabouts Inc. a year ago with a loan from a friend, since repaid, and now employs 15.  He got three trucks and a backhoe cheap.  "I want to add one more truck," Mr. Huber says.  I sense that it's going to continue to grow.  That's the word.  The word is out."  Eight people, including a supervisor of Security Pacific National Bank's central vault, were arrested in an investigation of an alleged drug money-laundering operation.  The U.S. Attorney's office filed a criminal complaint against six bank employees charging them with conspiracy in the scheme, which apparently was capable of handling millions of dollars a week by funneling cash through fictitious bank accounts.  Two other men also were charged with participating in the operation.  The arrests capped a four-month investigation by the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Attorney's office and a Security Pacific internal investigation team.  Walter S. Fisher, executive vice president and general auditor of the bank's parent, Security Pacific Corp., said no bank funds were at risk during the investigation.  Arrested were Jose O. Lopez, 27 years old, of Whittier, Calif., the vault supervisor; Carlos O. Huerta, 29, of La Puente; Luis A. Arroyo, 36, of Los Angeles; Ignacio Rojas Jr., 32, of Baldwin Park; Doris Moreno, 37, of Bell Gardens; and Ana L. Azucena, 27, of Huntington Park.  Geno M. Apicella, 27, of Los Angeles, and Terrell N. Madison, 27, of Hawthorne, were also charged with participating in the conspiracy.  Each defendant faces a possible sentence of 20 years in prison and $250,000 in fines.  The defendants couldn't immediately be reached for comment.  S.A. Brewing Holdings Ltd. began laying the groundwork to launch a rival offer for Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd.'s Australian brewing operations.  Such an offer could torpedo a plan by Lion Nathan Ltd. of New Zealand to acquire half the brewing interests.  But it would probably increase the amount of cash that debt-ridden Bond Corp. would earn from the transaction.  Australia's National Companies and Securities Commission said it will allow S.A. Brewing to acquire an option on as much as 20% of Bell Resources Ltd., a unit of Bond Corp. that is in the process of acquiring Bond Corp.'s brewing businesses for 2.5 billion Australian dollars (US$1.93 billion).  S.A. Brewing, which is 20%-owned by Elders IXL Ltd., Australia's largest brewer, will make a takeover offer for all of Bell Resources if it exercises the option, the corporate regulators said in a statement.  Bond Corp., a brewing, property, media and resources concern controlled by financier Alan Bond, is selling many of its assets to reduce an A$6.9 billion debt.  Contrary to what might be expected based on the headline on John R. Dorfman's recent Money Matters article ("Pros Hit Theorists Right Where It Hurts" Oct. 3), I was able to stand proudly before my undergraduate finance students and proclaim that the findings of your yearlong experiment on stock picking is completely consistent with what they have been taught in the classroom.  In particular, I do not find the fact that your group of pros' monthly selections of four stocks outperforms the market in general to be inconsistent with market efficiency.  Mr. Dorfman states that an investor who invested $100,000 a year ago in the first four stocks selected by your pros and then sold those one month later, purchasing the four new pro picks, and repeated this process for the year would have accumulated $166,537, excluding account dividends, taxes and commissions.  In contrast, an investor holding the Dow Jones portfolio over the year would have accumulated only $127,446.  Accepted theories of asset pricing offer a perfectly legitimate explanation.  Accepted theories state that investors require higher returns on riskier investments.  Thus, rather than seeing the excess returns to the pro-selected portfolio as being abnormal, I see those returns as simply compensations for taking on added risk.  I believe the risk for each individual stock selected by your pros is very large.  If you asked me to select a stock with the highest expected return, I would select a stock with the greatest amount of undiversifiable risk, as I am sure your pros do.  Your hypothetical investor is simply being compensated for taking on this added risk.  Moreover, your hypothetical investor has forsaken the gains to be had in reducing risk by diversifying his portfolio.  A four-stock portfolio is still exposed to a great deal of unnecessary risk.  This means the returns can vary a great deal.  Mr. Dorfman provides confirming evidence of this phenomenon when he reports that your staff of dart throwers would have accumulated only $112,383 by randomly selecting four new stocks to be held in a portfolio each month.  Scott E. Hein  Texas Tech University  Lubbock, Texas ---  Your Investment Dartboard article misses the target.  The fact that stock pickers have bested a randomly selected portfolio in eight of 12 months has no bearing on the efficient-market theory.  What matters is that the stocks recommended by your pros tend to be substantially riskier than a diversified portfolio.  For example, your pickers' recommendations for the coming month are, on average, 22.5% riskier than holding the market portfolio according to Value Line's Beta estimates.  James Morgan's pick for October -- Dynascan -- is a substantial 35% riskier than the market portfolio; his lauded Thermo Electron pick is 40% riskier.  Eric C. Meltzer  New York  Peter W. Likins, president of Lehigh University, Bethlehem, Pa., was elected a director of this maker of industrial motion-control parts and systems.  His appointment expands the board to 13 members.  California Thefts Make  Travel Agents Jittery  BEING A TRAVEL agent used to be pretty glamorous.  Now it's getting downright dangerous.  In recent months, more than 25 agencies have been robbed, compared with only a handful all last year, according to police and travel-agency groups.  Most of the cases have been in California, where one agent was stabbed and another was shot and killed.  Los Angeles police say the thieves seem to be part of a crime network that knows how to convert blank tickets into real ones.  Already, the stolen tickets have been used for flights all over the world.  So far, the thieves have stolen 3,632 blank tickets, according to Airline Reporting Corp., a ticket processing center.  Police say the robberies are usually pulled off by two to five men, who walk into the agencies near closing or lunch time, when few employees are there.  "They looked like ordinary vacationers at first," says Willy LLerena, owner of Travel Air Service in Monte Bello, Calif., describing five men who entered his agency last June.  But then, he says, they put two loaded pistols to his temple and demanded he open the safe.  When he initially refused, he says, they stabbed him in the back and made off with $2,000 and 280 blank tickets.  "They said they wanted to show me how serious they were," he says.  As word of the crime spree has spread, many agents have started changing their open-door policies.  At El Monte Travel Center in El Monte, Calif., customers now can get in only through a buzzer and lock system.  "It's hard to deal with clients this way in a service business," says Ralph "Bud" Conner, owner of the agency, which was robbed of 180 blank tickets and $850 last month.  "But we're just too nervous."  The robberies also have set off a controversy involving the airlines.  Agents say airlines, which track ticket numbers of all stolen tickets, should be doing more to catch the thieves by confiscating the tickets when they're used.  "They have the most sophisticated computers in the world," says Mr. LLerena.  "They ought to be able to do this."  But airlines say it would be too expensive and cause too many delays if they started using computerized scanners to check tickets at the gate.  Texans Get Reasonable  Car Rental Insurance  CONSUMER advocates have long claimed that car rental companies charge too much for car rental insurance.  Now, a new law in Texas seems to be providing the proof.  The law -- the first of its kind -- requires car rental companies in Texas to charge only "reasonable" rates for collision-damage waiver insurance.  Specifically, the law says the rates must closely reflect what the company's actual expenses have been to replace damaged cars.  Before the law went into effect last month, car rental companies were charging as much as $12 a day for the waiver in Texas.  Now, they're charging as little $3 a day.  "If they're telling the truth now, then they've been charging 300% more than what is reasonable," says Steve Gardner, an assistant state attorney general in Texas.  A spokesman for Hertz Corp. acknowledges, "The waiver isn't a source of protection for consumers, but a source of revenue."  But Hertz points out that at least it's now charging only $3.95 a day in Texas, while some competitors are charging $6.99.  The state attorney general's office is investigating rental car agencies charging noticeably higher prices.  Flight Attendants Lag  Before Jets Even Land  IF YOUR FLIGHT attendant seems a little weary, it may be because he or she has been working 20 straight hours.  A recent study for the Federal Aviation Administration found that major airlines sometimes make flight attendants work 16 hours or more straight -- despite union contracts at some airlines limiting duty time to 14 hours.  Some flight attendants on charter planes are putting in 20-hour work days, the study found.  This happens because the FAA doesn't have any rules on duty time for flight attendants; by contrast, it strictly restricts duty time for pilots and air traffic controllers, usually to a maximum of 10 consecutive hours.  "As far as the FAA is concerned," says Matt Finucane, air safety director at the Association of Flight Attendants, "flight attendants can work an unlimited number of hours."  Experts say such long hours for attendants pose a safety risk.  For instance, tired flight attendants might not react quickly enough during an emergency evacuation.  "At the end of their day, they are zombies," says John Galipault, president of the Aviation Safety Institute, a public-interest group in Worthington, Ohio.  "They have to work such long hours and then we expect them to be heroes if there's an evacuation."  In response to the study, the FAA says it is considering changing its policy -- or lack of it -- on flight attendants.  The agency may not have much choice: A congressional bill has been introduced that would force the agency to limit flight attendant duty time to 14 hours on U.S. flights and 16 hours on international trips.  Odds and Ends  GOLF HAS BECOME the latest diversion for travelers stuck at some airports.  Simulated golf games, in which players hit golf balls into nets, have been installed at airports in Denver and Pittsburgh. . . .  The average cost for breakfast at a "decent" hotel restaurant in New York is $17.12, according to Corporate Travel magazine.  The cheapest, among 100 cities surveyed, was $5.11 in El Paso, Texas.  Mark Q. Huggins was named executive vice president and chief financial officer.  Mr. Huggins, 39 years old, formerly was controller and chief accounting officer at Harte-Hanks Communications Inc. Management Co. manages entertainers and produces, markets and finances entertainment.  Why do you continually ignore the salubrious effects of indexing the basis of capital gains for inflation?  Why do you maintain the House-passed capital-gains plan is a "temporary" reduction when it is not?  I think the reason is that you are confusing tax "rates" with tax "payments."  Your Sept. 29 page-one story on the House-passed capital-gains plan is a good example.  You lead readers to believe that the House reduced the capital-gains tax for two years only.  You virtually ignore the tax-reducing power of indexation, which in many cases is more substantial than a lower rate.  The monetary tax benefit of indexation for all gains in excess of inflation can be measured using the following equation: tax rate, times inflation rate, times basis for the gain.  Depending on the size of the gain and the rate of inflation, indexation can mean a lower tax payment than using the 19.6% rate without indexation.  But in any event -- and this is the important point -- tax "payments" on capital gains will be lower with indexation than under current law, even though the tax "rate" is the same under both systems.  As you can see, the capital-gains reduction plan adopted by the House would not be temporary, but permanent.  I hope that you begin talking about the plan's permanent and, in my view, most beneficial feature -- indexation.  Rep. Robert K. Dornan (R., Calif.)  Washington  ---  That the motivation for the two-year reduction to 19.6% is budgetary does not mean it is not in the public interest.  The reduction eases the burden on portfolio changes and frees capital to seek more productive or more appropriate uses.  But what is really significant is the indexation of capital gains after 1991.  To argue that this is "not likely" to affect the economy in positive ways is contrary both to recent experience with capital-gains tax cuts and to common sense.  A large part of the long-term appreciation of assets reflects inflation, and the taxation of inflation-created capital gains is confiscation.  Does the Journal really believe that people ignore the prospect of having a substantial part of their capital confiscated when they decide whether to save or how to invest?  Under current law, it is not financially rational to forgo consumption.  Real, aftertax returns from financial assets are on the order of 1% or 2% a year.  The capital-gains tax reform is a step toward correcting one of the gravest structural weaknesses of the U.S. economy, the closely connected phenomena of low savings rates, weak capital formation and high capital costs.  J. Sigurd Nielsen  Richmond, Va.  Isaac Hersly, 41 years old, was elected president and chief operating officer of this designer and marketer of graphics, video, cable and other television-related equipment.  He succeeds Alfred O.P. Leubert, 66, who continues as chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Hersly formerly was group vice president of marketing and product planning for Chyron and president of the telesystems and video products division.  W.R. Grace & Co. said it formed a new horticultural-products company by combining its soil-nutrients and fertilizers business with Sierra Chemical Co., Milpitas, Calif.  Grace, a maker of specialty chemicals that already owned about 30% of closely held Sierra, said it owns a 49% stake in the new company.  Grace said it didn't invest any additional capital in the venture, which will be known as Grace-Sierra Horticultural Products Co.  The business is expected to have sales of about $100 million in 1990, Grace said.  The new company's product lines will be aimed at nurseries, greenhouses and the lawn and garden industry.  The Financial Accounting Standards Board said it will soon issue a rule requiring disclosure about the financial risk of certain financial instruments.  But the chief rule-making body for accountants backed off one part of its original proposal made earlier this year that would have required a breakdown of certain balance-sheet items related to off-balance sheet instruments.  The balance-sheet detail was opposed by many banks and thrifts that felt the cost of supplying such data wasn't worth the value of the disclosures.  Under the initial proposal, for example, banks would have been required to disclose that portion of allowances for loan losses that reflects specific letters of credit for which customers had defaulted.  The final rule won't require such a breakdown of the allowances for loan losses, which appears on the balance sheet.  The FASB rule will cover such financial instruments as interest rate swaps, financial guarantees, foward interest rate contracts, loan contracts, loan commitments and options written on securites held.  It will require companies to spell out in more detail collateral polices and concentrations of credit risk for all financial instruments.  The rule will require companies with financial instruments that have off-balance sheet risks to disclose data about the value and terms of the instruments, any accounting loss that would occur if the outside party involved in the instrument failed to perform, and the company's policy for requiring collateral or other security for the instrument.  Scott Miller, an FASB project manager, said that a final rule will be issued before year end.  But he noted that the initial effective date of the earlier proposal had been delayed by six months.  The new rule will be effective for financial statements with fiscal years ending after June 15, 1989.  Poughkeepsie Savings Bank said a plan to sell its South Carolina branch offices to First Citizens Bank, of Columbia, S.C., fell through.  Poughkeepsie also expects to post a one-time charge of $8.3 million, resulting in a net loss for the third quarter.  The charge represents a write-down of the goodwill associated with Poughkeepsie's investment in the banks it is trying to sell and its North Carolina branches as well.  The thrift announced the plan Aug. 21.  Among other reasons, high fees regulators imposed on certain transfers of thrift deposits to commercial banks "substantially altered the economics of the transaction for both parties," Poughkeepsie said.  Additionally, the bank is increasing its loan-loss reserves for the third quarter by $8.5 million before taxes.  In the year-earlier third quarter, Poughkeepsie Savings had net income of $2.8 million, or 77 cents a share.  Poughkeepsie said it is continuing to try to sell itself, under a June agreement with a dissident-shareholder group.  The bank also said its effort would continue past the Nov. 1 deadline set in that agreement and that the litigation between the two sides might resume as a result.  The thrift and the holders had suspended their lawsuits as part of the agreement.  Joe Frank Sanderson Jr. was elected president and chief executive officer of this poultry producer.  Joe Frank Sanderson, who is currently chairman, chief executive and treasurer, will remain chairman.  The current president and chief operating officer, J. Odell Johnson, was elected to the new position of vice chairman of the board.  Kinder-Care Inc. was dropped from the consumer services industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market index because the company split itself in a restructuring.  It was succeeded in the group by Fuqua Industries Inc.  Both moves are effective today.  A potentially safer whooping cough vaccine made by novel genetic engineering techniques was described by a team of Italian, U.S. and Japanese scientists.  The team reported they managed to induce bacteria to produce a non-toxic version of the poisons produced by the bacterium that causes whooping cough.  Laboratory tests showed that non-toxic versions of the poisons are capable of inducing an immunity to whooping cough, the researchers reported in this week's issue of the journal Science.  The current vaccine for whooping cough, or pertussis, is part of the "DPT" (for diphtheria, pertussis, tetanus) shot given most infants and young children.  The vaccine is effective in preventing a disease that still afflicts about 60 million children a year world-wide, causing an estimated one million deaths.  The vaccine, however, causes allergic reactions that can be fatal.  The reactions stem from the fact that the vaccine contains multiple copies of the whole Bordetella pertussis bacterium, which causes whooping cough.  This bacterium produces a toxin that, if used as a vaccine, can induce immunity to whooping cough.  Unfortunately, the toxin is also poisonous.  The Italian-led scientific team said they had succeeded in getting bacteria to produce a non-toxic version of the pertussis toxin, which could be used as a safe vaccine.  The researchers reported they have been able to pluck the five genes that produced the toxin out of the pertussis bacterium.  It turned out that although it took all five genes to produce the toxin, only one was responsible for the toxin's virulence.  Ordinarily in genetic engineering each of these genes, minus the one that caused the virulence, would have been transferred to another bacterium, called E. coli, which would then produce a nonvirulent version of the toxin.  The researchers said they did this, but the toxin didn't induce immunity to whooping cough.  The scientists then took the five toxin genes and triggered a mutation in the one gene that caused virulence.  Then, using a new technique (called homologous recombination) for introducing genes into cells, they transferred all five genes to bacteria closely related to the pertussis organism.  These bacterial "cousins" ordinarily don't make the toxin.  But the genes were accompanied by a piece of DNA, called a promoter, that turns the genes on.  The new bacteria recipients of the genes began producing pertussis toxin which, because of the mutant virulence gene, was no longer toxic.  Experiments showed that the new, non-virulent toxin is capable of inducing immunity, according to the researchers from the Selavo Research Center in Siena, Italy, the Medical College of Wisconsin in Milwaukee and the Japanese National Institutes of Health.  Carl E. Pissocra, president and chief executive officer of Bank One, Dover, has been named regional president, a new post at the bank-holding company.  Mr. Pissocra, 56 years old, will be responsible for the company's 10 banks in the Eastern region.  Dan J. Hartwell, 41, executive vice president of Bank One, Dover, was named president and chief executive of the Dover bank, succeeding Mr. Pissocra.  No one was named to succeed Mr. Hartwell.  At a time when foreign banks are pouring vast resources and personnel into West Germany's financial center, the opening of a three-man office on a Frankfurt side street shouldn't attract much attention.  Unless, of course, it happens to be run by the Rothschilds.  After an 88-year absence from the birthplace of the family banking empire, the return of the Rothschild group to Frankfurt was greeted by the glare of television lights, curious reporters and a mayoral reception in Town Hall.  Like other foreign banks establishing a presence here, the family describes its move as a calculated decision to set up a financial services outlet in Europe's largest economy ahead of the integration of European Community markets after 1992.  Yet the Rothschilds don't deny an emotional element to the decision.  In 1796, Mayer Amschel Rothschild founded Bankhaus M.A. Rothschild & Sons and later sent his four sons to London, Paris, Vienna and Naples to begin the bank's expansion during the early 19th century.  The original bank in Frankfurt closed in 1901 after the death of Wilhelm Carl von Rothschild, and the family's banking activities focused on London and Paris.  Baron Elie de Rothschild, the family's elder spokesman, explains that by the end of the 19th century, Berlin had replaced Frankfurt as Germany's financial center.  Yet the chief reason for the closure, he says, was rooted in a family tradition that wouldn't allow a bank to bear the Rothschild name without a Rothschild in its management.  "At the time we had only daughters," explains the 72-year-old patriarch, "so we had to close the bank."  Much of the family's mystique remained.  Although its palatial residence was destroyed by bombs during World War II, the Rothschilds' place in Frankfurt's history is still recalled by the city park and a street bearing the Rothschild name.  The family's long absence is understandable.  The family was in Allied countries during both World War I and the long period of economic strife of the 1920s.  During the Third Reich, the Rothschilds were a target of Nazi propaganda against Jewish financiers.  The persecution pursued the Rothschilds across Europe as the Nazis grabbed countries, confiscating the family's property in the process.  American journalist William L. Shirer, in his book "The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich," wrote of how in Vienna he had witnessed "squads of {Nazi} SS men carting off silver, tapestries, paintings and other loot from the Rothschild palace."  In the immediate postwar years, the Rothschilds concentrated on rebuilding their other European operations, delaying their return to Frankfurt.  "For a member of the Rothschild family, the return to Frankfurt is a very meaningful event, although it might not mean as much to German banking as it means to us," says Baron David de Rothschild, Elie's younger cousin and a partner in Rothschild & Cie.  Banque in Paris.  Indeed, the competition isn't greatly concerned.  "It would be surprising if they didn't come to Frankfurt in time for 1992, and they bring an interesting tradition.  But the market really isn't going to be stood on its head," said a banker at one of Frankfurt's Big Three banks.  The return of the Rothschilds is modest.  The new representative office, with one manager and two assistants -- none a member of the Rothschild family -- will carry out no banking operations of its own.  Instead, it is to seek out corporate financing business and sell investment products on behalf of the family's mainstay banking units: N M Rothschild & Sons Ltd. in London, Rothschild & Cie. in Paris and Rothschild Bank AG in Zurich.  The constraints don't bother the office's 54-year-old manager, Erich Stromeyer.  He left his job as general manager of Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings Inc.'s Frankfurt office because, he says, "When the Rothschilds called, I couldn't resist."  Each Rothschild bank is linked by family ties and cross-ownership.  In March, N M Rothschild in London and Rothschild Bank in Zurich showed assets of #4.1 billion ($6.51 billion) and 1.26 billion Swiss francs ($774 million), respectively.  The Paris bank doesn't publish that figure.  In Europe, the Rothschilds banks are focusing on mergers and acquisitions as European industry restructures ahead of 1992.  Yet the group's limited resources makes it a niche player.  "Obviously, there are quantitative limitations on the assistance we can provide," concedes Baron David de Rothschild, "but we feel we have some cards to play."  Among them, he says, is the family's traditional ties to old wealth and decision-makers in banking and industry throughout Europe and beyond.  The Rothschilds hope to use a long history in private banking and an aura of exclusivity to attract private and institutional investors.  As at the Zurich bank, the minimum investment for individuals will be high: about a million German marks ($538,000), three times what many other West German investment banks require.  "But we do make exceptions," says a smiling Baron Elie de Rothschild, "especially if they are very young and have very rich parents."  As program trading comes under renewed attack for causing stock market gyrations, a few people on Wall Street say it is time to consider extreme measures.  The real answer to curbing wild swings in stock prices, they say, might be to curb or even abolish stock-index futures.  A stock-index future is a contract to buy or sell the market value of a basket of stocks, such as the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index.  Since stock futures were created in 1982, trading on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and other exchanges has boomed to the point where trading in stock-index futures rivals that in the stocks themselves.  The conventional view, as voiced by Goldman, Sachs & Co. partner Fischer Black, is that stocks and "derivatives" such as futures and options "form a single market, and that derivatives make it a more liquid market."  But increasingly, people are questioning that view, and the critics include some of the country's most successful investors.  Warren Buffett has been on record as opposing stock-index futures since their inception in 1982.  And Mario Gabelli, another star in the investing world, says, "My gut says the negatives of futures and synthetics far outweigh the benefits."  Like others, Mr. Gabelli says that if futures cause investors to lose confidence in stocks, they will move away from stocks -- as many have already done.  And those who remain, he says "will demand a higher return and over time raise the cost of capital to companies."  Essentially, the critics of stock-index futures fall into two camps.  One group says the futures contribute to stock market volatility; the other contends that futures are a sideshow of speculation that detracts from the stock market's basic function of raising capital.  "Before futures," says New York investor Michael Harkins, "you actually had to pay attention to whether the thing you were buying had any intrinsic value."  While it was once expected that futures would mimic stock prices, traders now routinely check the futures markets in Chicago before they buy or sell stocks.  When Chicago futures prices jump up or down, the New York Stock Exchange follows.  On Tuesday, for instance, the Dow Jones Industrial Average plunged 80 points in little more than an hour.  Then, in the space of a 20-minute coffee break, the average rallied almost all of the way back.  Paul Lesutis, who manages more than $3 billion of investments at Provident Capital Management Inc., blames futures markets for leading the way.  "The fundamentals don't change in an hour," he says.  "I think they should close down the futures exchange and then we could get back to investing."  Index arbitrage -- the rapid-fire buying and selling of stocks offset with opposite trades in futures -- is frequently blamed for adding to stock market volatility.  Although index arbitrage is said to add liquidity to markets, John Bachmann, managing partner of Edward D. Jones, says too much liquidity isn't a good thing  "The kind of instant liquidity that is implied by index futures is that you can buy a portfolio over two years and get out in one day.  It's too disruptive," he says.  "It isn't investing."  But stock-index futures have plenty of support.  Defenders say futures make markets more efficient and provide ways for investors to reduce risks.  They note that stocks experienced volatile swings long before futures.  And, defenders say, few people complain about futures when stock prices are rising.  Louis Margolis, managing director in charge of equity options and futures at Salomon Inc., says that trading baskets of stocks began in the 1970s, a decade before the advent of futures.  Futures, he says, merely cut down on trading costs.  He says "blaming futures is like blaming the messenger."  Since stock-index arbitrage merely narrows the gap between prices in the futures and stock markets, it can't add to volatility, he says.  Futures "don't need defending," says Andrew Yemma, a spokesman for the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, which trades the S&P 500, by far the largest stock-index futures contract.  Despite the current outcry over stock market volatility, few people expect stock futures to disappear.  For one thing, the Chicago futures exchanges have political and financial clout -- including many friends in Congress.  And traders say that futures have become an accepted part of the financial landscape.  "All life is about change -- either you adapt or die," says one Chicago futures trader.  "If futures aren't permitted here, we'll take it to Australia or Tokyo."  Average daily volume in S&P 500 futures last year was 44,877 contracts.  Based on yesterday's closing price of the S&P, the average value of one day's trading amounts to $7.6 billion.  By contrast, average dollar volume on the Big Board last year was $5.3 billion.  Many investment managers say futures are useful as a way to hedge portfolios.  If managers fear that the overall stock market will fall, but want to continue owning stocks, they can hold on to specific stocks and sell a corresponding amount of futures contracts.  Average daily volume in S&P 500 futures last year was 44,877 contracts.  Based on yesterday's closing price of the S&P, the average value of one day's trading amounts to $7.6 billion.  By contrast, average dollar volume on the Big Board last year was $5.3 billion.  Many investment managers say futures are useful as a way to hedge portfolios.  If managers fear that the overall stock market will fall, but want to continue owning stocks, they can hold on to specific stocks and sell a corresponding amount of futures contracts.  And although criticism of futures generally comes from Wall Street, one Chicago futures trader notes that brokerage firms rely on futures as hedging tools when they buy and sell big blocks of stocks from institutions.  One reason futures are said to add volatility is that -- unlike in stocks -- people can speculate in futures with little money down.  Margin requirements for speculators on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange are currently about 7%.  "For $10 million, you can move $100 million of stocks," a specialist on the Big Board gripes.  "That gives futures traders a lot more power."  By contrast, an investor in stocks must put up 50% in cash.  Some critics say futures encourage people to think of stocks as a single commodity, rather than as investments in individual businesses.  Thus, they say, futures inhibit the basic purpose of the stock market: to accurately price securities so that capital and investment flows where it's needed most.  The S&P 500 index futures "transferred the identity of 500 stocks into one unit-making them a simple commodity to trade," says George Kegler, senior vice president at A. Webster Dougherty in Philadelphia.  "It took away the need to know the bad third-quarter report of IBM, for example," Mr. Kegler says.  Of course, portfolio trading -- the increasingly common practice of buying or selling baskets of actual stocks -- also treats stocks as homogenous commodities.  "There is a class of investor that wants to be exposed" to the whole market, says Sandip Bhagat, assistant vice president at Travelers Investment Management Co.  The S&P futures are merely a "cheaper and quicker" way to get access to all 500 stocks, he says.  The Big Board yesterday began trading in its own basket trading vehicle representing the S&P 500 stocks.  But owning index futures isn't the same as owning the underlying stocks.  Stockholders, as a group, can win, because they own a share of corporate earnings, which can grow and boost stock prices.  Futures, on the other hand, are a zero sum game -- a market for making side bets about the direction of stock prices.  "You don't own anything," says Stephen Boesel, a money manager for T. Rowe Price in Baltimore.  "You're making a pure bet on the market."  The European Community Commission challenged an agreement on routes and fares between France's two largest airlines on antitrust grounds.  Meeting in Strasbourg Wednesday, the commission voted, as expected, to formally object to the accord between Air France, the state-owned airline, and state-controlled domestic carrier Air Inter.  An EC spokesman said the two companies will be notified so they can begin negotiations with Brussels on how to modify the pact.  At issue is an accord dating back to March in which Air France gained access to five domestic French routes under Air Inter's flight numbers and the domestic airline got to fly to five cities outside of France under the flag of Air France.  The two shared results from this route swap, and followed rules on ticket pricing.  The EC Commission decided that such an accord doesn't benefit consumers enough to merit an exemption from antitrust law.  The airlines presented it as offering consumers more choice and better flight connections.  An Air France spokeswoman said, "we're absolutely ready to study all solutions."  An Air Inter spokesman said, "Because they {the EC} have doubts, we will work again on the text and the contents of the accord."  A state appellate court reinstated the 1987 convictions of Pymm Thermometer Corp. and two of its executives on charges of assault for exposing workers to toxic mercury vapors.  The indictment charged that Pymm operated a machine to crush broken thermometers and recover the mercury in an illegal workroom.  The charges said that one worker suffered permanent brain damage from mercury exposure.  The judge handling the case in state Supreme Court, a trial court, had tossed out the jury verdicts, ruling that the matter should have been handled under federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration rules.  But the Appellate Division of State Supreme Court held that federal law didn't pre-empt the states from such a prosecution.  Elizabeth Holtzman, district attorney for Brooklyn, N.Y., said, "The appellate division has agreed with our view that despite federal worker-safety laws, state prosecutors have the power to protect working people."  Lawyers for the company and executives couldn't be reached for comment.  The executives face five to 15 years in prison and fines of $5,000 or double the profit made by failing to comply with the rules.  The company could be fined a maximum of $10,000, or double the profit.  General Motors Corp. wants to buy as much as 15% of Jaguar PLC, marking its first salvo in a possible full-scale battle against Ford Motor Co. for control of the British car maker.  GM sought U.S. antitrust clearance last week to purchase more than $15 million worth of Jaguar shares but doesn't own any yet, according to GM officials here and at the company's Detroit headquarters.  The No. 1 U.S. auto maker then wrote Jaguar that it intends "to go to that 15%" level once it wins the U.S. clearance to go beyond $15 million, a Jaguar spokesman said yesterday.  The GM move follows Tuesday's declaration by Ford, which holds an unwelcome 12.45% stake in Jaguar, that it is prepared to bid for the entire company.  GM is close to completing a friendly deal with Jaguar that is likely to involve an eventual 30% stake and joint manufacturing ventures.  Speculative investors, betting on an imminent clash between Ford and GM, pushed up Jaguar's share price five pence (eight U.S. cents) to a near-record 720 pence ($11.60) in late trading on London's stock exchange yesterday.  Since Tuesday, the shares have gained nearly 4%.  But an all-out bidding war between the world's top auto giants for Britain's leading luxury-car maker seems unlikely.  "We will not go over a certain level," said David N. McCammon, Ford's vice president for finance, at a news conference yesterday in Dearborn, Mich.  "There's some price at which we'd stop bidding."  He wouldn't specify what it was.  And powerful political pressures may convince the Conservative government to keep its so-called golden share, which limits any individual holding to 15%, until the restriction expires on Dec. 31, 1990.  "I really don't see the government doing something that Jaguar doesn't want over the next 14 months," said Kenneth Warren, a Conservative member of Parliament and chairman of the Select Committee on Trade and Industry in Britain's House of Commons.  "The golden share is a single share, but it is the magic share."  The government retained the single share after selling its stake in Jaguar in 1984 -- part of a nationalistic practice of protecting former government-owned enterprises to deflect criticism of privatization.  The 15% restriction covers any would-be suitor, British or foreign.  Ford is willing to bid for 100% of Jaguar's shares if both the government and Jaguar shareholders agree to relax the anti-takeover barrier prematurely.  As Jaguar's biggest holder and Britain's biggest car maker, Ford could turn up the heat by convening a special shareholders' meeting and urging holders to drop the limits early.  Ford might succeed because many shareholders are speculators keen for a full bid or institutional investors unhappy over Jaguar management's handling of its current financial difficulties.  The government probably wouldn't give in readily to a hostile foray by Ford, however.  It has relinquished a golden share only once before -- during British Petroleum Co.'s #2.5 billion ($4 billion) takeover of Britoil PLC in 1988.  In wooing British lawmakers, GM has pointed out that its willingness to settle for a minority stake would keep Jaguar British-owned and independent.  This week, the U.S. auto giant paid for 10 House of Commons members and two House of Lords members to fly to Detroit and tour its operations there.  While the visit was unrelated to Jaguar, GM Chairman Roger Smith answered the legislators' questions about it over lunch Tuesday.  He said Jaguar "shouldn't be smothered by anyone else," recalled one participant.  Politics also influences the government's thinking on the anti-takeover restriction.  The Conservatives don't dare jeopardize marginal Tory seats in Coventry, where Jaguar has headquarters, nor can the government easily back down on promised protection for a privatized company while it proceeds with controversial plans to privatize most of Britain's water and electricity industries.  Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher might, however, be receptive to any request by Jaguar Chairman Sir John Egan for the restriction's early removal to let GM amass more than 15% or mount a friendly suitor bid against Ford.  In the end, Sir John -- rather than the government or Jaguar shareholders -- may hold the key that unlocks the golden share.  Swedish rolling-steel and ball-bearing group AB SKF said its pretax profit rose 78% to 1.78 billion kronor ($278 million) in the first nine months from one billion kronor ($156 million) in the corresponding period a year earlier.  SKF said sales increased 17% to 18.46 billion kronor from 15.72 billion.  Earnings per share were 10.35 kronor compared with 5.80 kronor.  SKF said demand for the group's main product, rolling bearings, remained favorable in Europe, which accounts for slightly more than two-thirds of group sales.  Latin American markets continued their recovery after a weak start to the year, SKF said.  The company said the situation in the U.S. is still uncertain as reduced production in the country's automotive industry has resulted in weakened demand for rolling bearings.  Analysts said SKF's results for the first nine months lived up to market expectations as brokerage firms had predicted a pretax profit of 1.74 billion to 1.86 billion kronor.  The three business areas engaged in rolling bearing operations continued to show favorable sales development.  Sales of rolling bearings increased 19% to 15.7 billion kronor from 13.2 billion kronor in the corresponding period the previous year.  We read with interest Robert Tomsho's Sept. 28 page-one article on Robert Redford ("The Sundance Kid Gets Little Respect Around Sundance").  Misunderstanding conversations with us, Mr. Tomsho argued that Mr. Redford's environmental views are at odds with Utah residents.  This may have been true 10 years ago, but times have changed, even in Utah.  Mr. Redford no longer stands out as an extremist.  He has not changed, but those around him have.  Many of his views on the protection of wilderness areas, rivers and canyons are now embraced by mainstream, conservative Utahans.  Recently, some 60 environmental and outdoor groups representing such divergent points of view as the Sierra Club, the League of Women Voters and the National Rifle Association joined together to request a reassessment of the environmentally unsound Central Utah Project.  While Utah is not yet a haven for environmentalism, public views toward the environment have significantly improved.  In one of the most conservative, Republican states in the entire nation, the greening of Robert Redford's neighbors is the real story that Mr. Tomsho missed.  Sammye Meadows  Sam Rushforth  Gary Bryner  Heber City, Utah  ---  If Mr. Redford wanted to be accepted by the people of Utah, he should have taken an advisory role instead of one of forcing his personal preferences.  Furthermore, his actions imply that it is too damaging or costly for society to provide jobs through power-plant construction, coal mining or to build roads for public safety because of the adverse impact on the environment, but it is just fine and dandy for him to transform a mountain high in the Wasatch Range into a ski resort.  It astounds me he can rationalize his self-righteous and greedy actions in Utah.  An excellent environmental actor he is.  David Vranian  M.B.A. Student  University of Colorado  Boulder, Colo.  --- Mr. Redford, like it or not, is like a braking system on a runaway truck, kind of slowing it down into control.  He's rich, famous and intelligent, and has the time to do something that not even the federal government will do.  Mr. Redford is slowing down a mindless, speeding maniac known as the progress of mankind.  Personally, I'm glad there are people like him around to slow down the profit takers, and those who are in such a blind hurry for something that may appear to benefit them in the immediate future, not caring about the long-range implications.  Ron Dyer  Atlanta  When President Bush travels to Costa Rica today, he'll go with little of the fanfare that accompanies many of his foreign travels.  But the two-day trip still has managed to fuel controversy over his administration's policies in Central America.  Some conservatives say Mr. Bush shouldn't make the trip, during which he will participate in Costa Rica's celebration of 100 years of democracy.  These critics object to Mr. Bush's participation in a meeting that includes Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega among the guests.  In addition, they argue he won't help Washington's standing in the region by trumpeting the U.S. commitment to democracy less than a month after his administration played an ineffectual role in the failed coup attempt in Panama.  "I believe it will do more damage than good because it will legitimize people like Daniel Ortega," says Curtin Windsor, who served as U.S. ambassador to Costa Rica during the Reagan administration.  Mr. Windsor, among other analysts connected to the conservative Heritage Foundation, fears the gathering of 18 leaders, mostly from Central American nations, will force Mr. Bush "to explain and redeem himself" in the wake of charges that the U.S. failed to do enough to aid the removal of Panamanian dictator Manuel Noriega.  At the same time, liberal and moderate Democrats note the irony of Mr. Bush's joining a celebration of Costa Rican democracy at a time his administration has sought sharp cuts in U.S. aid to the tiny country.  The administration proposed only $57 million in so-called economic support funds for Costa Rica this year, down from the $90 million the U.S. provided last year.  The administration said improvements in Costa Rica's economic condition warrant the cut in aid, which the country uses mainly to make payments on its $4.5 billion foreign debt.  But Costa Rican officials argue that the recent drop in coffee prices, combined with the country's continuing struggle to reinvigorate its economy, make the support as necessary as ever.  "We are crossing the river and we need a little more help to get to the other side," said Rodrigo Sotela, an economic affairs specialist at the Costa Rican Embassy in Washington.  Democrats argue that Costa Rica deserves more assistance for the same reason that Mr. Bush is attending the celebration this weekend: to reward the country for its stability in a region wracked with turmoil and for its efforts to promote peace in Nicaragua.  However, peace efforts by Costa Rican President Oscar Arias haven't always helped the country's cause in Washington.  Mr. Arias's long-time refusal to support the U.S.'s campaign against leftist Nicaragua earned him the ire of the Reagan White House.  And more recently, he insisted on signing a five-nation agreement intended to disarm Nicaragua's U.S.-backed Contra rebels faster than the Bush administration would prefer.  "I think Bush's going there is a helpful sign," said Sen. Terry Sanford (D., N.C.) a member of the Foreign Relations Committee who pushed to provide Costa Rica about the same amount of aid as it received last year.  Lawmakers in both houses support the higher level.  Administration officials defend Mr. Bush's decision to make the trip.  While they acknowledge the president will attend several meals and a working session also attended by Mr. Ortega, they insist that Mr. Bush won't be extending the Nicaraguan leader any special courtesies.  The administration also made clear its continuing distate for the leftist Nicaraguan government in recent days, endorsing a package of electoral aid to the Nicaraguan opposition, renewing the U.S. trade embargo against the country and continuing to complain that the country supports rebel groups in the region.  Officials also insist Mr. Bush will use the trip to highlight his own initiatives for pushing democracy in the region, fighting illegal drugs and assisting the less developed countries.  "Let me say there is a symbolic component to this trip," Secretary of State James Baker told reporters Wednesday.  "There won't be any formal resolutions or communiques, I don't think.  But we still see this as an opportunity to discuss many, many very important issues."  In 1987, the Presidents Commission of the NCAA, which oversees most U.S. intercollegiate sports, contracted with the Washington-based American Institutes for Research to do a survey on the college experiences of what the body chooses to call student-athletes.  A brief "executive summary" was issued last April, and attracted some, but not much, attention.  More-detailed reports followed, and attracted even less notice.  I suspect I may be one of the few people to have read them all.  The sixth and last report now is out, and it puts the effort in perspective.  Titled "Comments From Students," it focuses on the real shame of college sports: what happens to young athletes once they enter academe.  It's little less than a cry for help from those who make the costly show possible.  The previous five reports were mainly statistical, but clear enough in outline.  They showed that participants in Division I football and men's basketball, the big-time "revenue sports," entered school with poorer high-school grades and test scores than "minor-sport" jocks and students who participated in other extracurricular activities, and they got lower grades once they got there, at least partly because of the athletic demands placed on them.  The football and basketball players spent more time on their sports in season than they did on class attendance and homework combined (30 hours a week versus 25.3).  Almost half (49.8%) reported suffering "mental abuse" from coaches, and almost one-quarter (24.8%) said they had been pressured to ignore injuries.  But even those numbers don't describe the situation as well as the athletes do in their own words.  The composite portrait that emerges isn't of a pampered jock marking time until he can land a seven-figure pro contract -- he's part of a tiny minority.  Rather, it's of a kid (we're talking about 17 to 22 year olds here) having a tough time making the best of what will probably be his one shot at college.  The pertinent question, coming at the end of a lengthy, confidential questionnaire, was this: "Are there things about your college life you would like to tell us that we didn't ask about?"  Of the almost 3,000 athletes surveyed, 1,240 took the time to respond.  Here are a few of their answers:  -- "They say that I am a student-athlete, but really I'm an athlete-student.  They lied to me on the recruiting trip.  Football is the No. 1 thing here." -- Junior football player.  -- "Being a student-athlete at college is a lot different from high school.  First, the sport you play is no longer a game -- it becomes a job.  Your coaches demand a lot more out of you even though some of them are not willing to take the time to watch you progress.  You become expendable.  Your interest is not taken to heart because people only care about your performance." -- Freshman basketball player.  -- "The coaches should have a more personal and sympathetic attitude toward the athletes -- not treat us like pieces of meat.  They always say to get a degree first, but they don't allow us time or to skip practice to study for a test.  They just want to get their job done at any cost to the athlete." -- Freshman football player.  -- "The pressure put on us to win at all times has resulted in physical violence, such as punching and slapping by coaches.  Some days the coaches make you feel as though you are part of a large herd of animals.  In other words, they treat you like a piece of meat." -- Sophomore football player.  -- "Playing intercollegiate sports doesn't give you a lot of time to spend with others.  We are almost left out of {campus} social activities.  This mostly happens because we go from football in the fall to lifting in the winter to football again in the spring." -- Freshman football player.  -- "You talk about free time -- .what free time?  Time to relax and enjoy ourselves is always taken up by something to do with football (meetings, lifting weights, conditioning or films).  There is no recovery period -- it's go, go, go.  ABUSE to our bodies is overwhelming.  With our schedule, it's hard to sleep well knowing what is going to happen the next day." -- Junior football player.  -- "Physical exhaustion and depression are common in my life and in some of my teammates' lives." -- Football player, class unspecified.  -- "More often than not, college athletes go through college never really experiencing collegiate life to the fullest.  One has to establish one's own identity away from athletics and make athletics only a part, not a whole, of the student-athlete's life." -- Sophomore basketball player.  -- "Somehow, and I don't know how, the game needs to be played for fun again, and not for the big bowl revenues or lucrative TV contracts." -- Graduate-student football player.  There have been rumblings that, at long last, changes may be in the works.  The Knight Foundation, of Akron, Ohio, has established a national commission to look into college-sports reform, and the NCAA Presidents Commission earlier this month recommended cutting spring football practice in half, moving the start of basketball practice back by a month and reducing maximum schedules in that sport to 25 games from 28.  The key word in that paragraph, though, is "may."  NCAA Executive Director Richard Schultz, in accepting a place on the Knight Commission, urged that the panel take a "balanced" view, which looks for all the world like a plea not to rock the boat too much, and the presidents' recommendations could face considerable opposition at the NCAA's full convention in January, which will vote on them.  I read that one unnamed athletics director predicted that the basketball-cutback proposal could fail because of "real world" (i.e., economic) considerations.  But the "real world" also includes the unpleasant truth that colleges are cheating the athletes they have wooed and won.  If they won't change their ways voluntarily, maybe somebody bigger -- Congress -- should make them.  They want late-night shuttles to the biology labs.  They want a 24-hour library.  And like college radicals everywhere, they are talking about a demonstration -- where protesters would gather quietly near the science building and raise their hands, classroom style.  Such is the fiber of the wool that woolly intellectuals let fly at gatherings of Harvard University's new Society of Nerds and Geeks, or SONG. SONGsters are mad as heck about campus anti-intellectualism and they aren't going to take it anymore, at least not without trying a few really neat ideas first.  "We could have called ourselves the Academic Intellectual Society, but then everyone would have said, `Oh, you mean the nerd-and-geek club,'" Leonid Fridman, SONG's graduate-student adviser, told 19 attendees at the club's inaugural meeting earlier this month.  Membership has since swelled to between 20 and 25.  Some people may think of nerds as calculator-toting, socially awkward individuals with shirt-pocket liners for their pencils and a preoccupation with computers and matters numerical.  Geeks, by at least one definition, are chicken-mutilating circus freaks.  But SONG founder Jeremy Kahn, a Harvard junior, thinks of nerds and geeks more as "nonconformists," albeit with a studious bent.  One of the group's first projects is a "procrastination hot line" that students could call when they have an urge to delay studying.  The club plans to show nerdy movies, such as "Real Genius," in which physics whizzes pop corn with lasers; and naturally, the "Revenge of the Nerds," a tale of college males with runny noses and ill-fitting pants.  One of its "more ambitious goals" is to get Jaime Escalante, the Los Angeles high-school mathematics teacher featured in the film "Stand and Deliver," to come to Harvard for a guest lecture.  Nerds and geeks sometimes find themselves a bit isolated at Harvard.  So Mr. Kahn says high priority is being given to creating a computerized matchmaking service "where instead of being matched for eye color, you could be matched for similar intellectual interests."  For instance?  "I'm a math major, but I want to know about psychobiology.  Hopefully, I'd find someone in psychobiology who wanted to know more about mathematics."  It could work.  Meanwhile, finding a volunteer to write the computer program isn't a problem.  Dime Savings Bank of New York was cleared by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. to acquire Starpointe Savings Bank of Somerset, N.J., the banks said.  Starpointe holders, who approved the plan last April, will receive $21 in cash a share, or a total $63 million.  The FDIC cleared the move yesterday, and the banks must wait at least 30 days before closing the purchase.  A closing date hasn't been set.  The thrifts agreed to the transaction in August 1988.  AEP INDUSTRIES Inc. directors authorized a 3-for-2 split of the common, payable Dec. 7 to stock of record Nov. 22.  The split was aimed at boosting the stock's liquidity, said Brendan Barba, chairman of the Moonachie, N.J., maker of plastic film products.  After the split, the company will have more than 4.7 million shares outstanding.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, AEP shares closed at $21.25, down 50 cents.  CRESTMONT FEDERAL SAVINGS & LOAN ASSOCIATION (Edison, N.J.) -- Lawrence B. Seidman, 41 years old, was named chairman of this savings and loan institution.  He will succeed Charles L. Harrington, chairman and chief executive officer, who retired last month.  Crestmont is conducting a search for a chief executive.  Mr. Seidman, a director of Crestmont since July, is general partner of Seidman Financial Associates, which owns 9.89% of Crestmont.  William J. Russo was named senior vice president, public affairs and advertising, for this financial and travel services concern's American Express Bank Ltd. subsidiary.  Mr. Russo, 38 years old, previously was first vice president, public affairs and advertising, at the banking unit.  Environmental concerns are beginning to have as much influence in oil-industry spending plans as the price of crude does.  In the wake of the Exxon Valdez spill in March, new governmental drilling bans are sharply curtailing exploration in promising locations offshore and in Alaska.  At the same time, moves toward tighter air-quality standards are spurring interest in lighter or alternative fuels that don't pollute as much as fuel refined from "heavy" crudes, generally high in sulfur.  Over the years, the world's stream of oil has been growing heavier.  So the scramble is on for lighter crudes globally, and for natural gas in the U.S.  Recently Saudi Arabia and Venezuela, traditional heavy-crude producers, have boasted of new finds of light, low-sulfur oil by their national oil companies.  Venezuela has also earmarked $200 million in new money for light-crude exploration.  And some oil companies are trying to lock in future supplies.  Typical is Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi, Italy's state-owned energy company, which not long ago acquired through its AGIP oil subsidiary a 5% share in the consortium accounting for half of Nigeria's oil output.  AGIP already has an oil stake in Libya.  Both countries produce high-quality, low-sulfur crudes especially suited to making high-octane motor fuel at minimum refining cost.  Franco Reviglio, ENI chairman, looks for sweeping structural change in the oil industry -- he calls it a "revolution" requiring huge investments -- as a result of environmental issues.  He made a special trip to examine U.S. environmental trends because they are often followed in Europe.  ENI needs to know what's coming as it prepares to spend some $1.3 billion on upgrading its refineries, he says.  Oil companies world-wide will have "to spend a lot of money for the cleaner fuels that will be required," says John H. Lichtblau, the president of the Petroleum Industry Research Foundation.  It will go for work ranging from refinery modification to changes in the distribution system, including the way service stations pump fuel into cars.  In the U.S., the search for oil had been headed toward environmentally sensitive areas believed to have vast reserves.  Alaska's Arctic National Wildlife Refuge alone is thought to hide more than three billion barrels of oil.  Until the tanker spill, Big Oil was slowly convincing authorities it could safely produce from such places.  Now the wildlife refuge has been closed to the industry, possibly for years.  Similarly, a group of companies led by Chevron Corp. has been unable to pump oil found off the California coast in the early 1980s.  A huge production system built in the sea off Santa Barbara and ashore is sitting idle.  But the push for cleaner fuels is increasing the attractiveness of natural gas.  More than half the domestic drilling now under way is for gas, partly on the assumption that demand will rise for a fuel that is cleaner to burn than either oil or coal.  Activity has revived in the largest U.S. gas-producing regions, such as the Gulf of Mexico.  Santa Fe International Corp., which is owned by Kuwait (and isn't related to Santa Fe Southern Pacific's unit), is stepping up development of a well off Texas' Matagorda Island where it found gas in 1987.  "We could have sat on it longer, but the impetus is to get the gas to the marketplace," says Richard Poole, senior scout for Santa Fe International.  "We're trying to get it on line as soon as possible now."  This month, Exxon Corp. announced plans for a 400-day project drilling for gas about five miles underground in the Anadarko Basin of western Oklahoma -- the deepest drilling project in the U.S. Exxon will use a Parker Drilling Co. rig built in 1981 that can go down 9 1/2 miles.  As the Soviet Union grapples with its worsening economy, leading reformers have drawn up a blueprint for change designed to push the nation much closer to a free-market system.  The proposals go far beyond the current and rather confused policies of perestroika, Mikhail Gorbachev's restructuring of the economy.  They lay out a clear timetable and methodology for liberalizing the system of setting prices, breaking up huge industrial monopolies and putting unprofitable state-owned companies out of business.  They also address such taboo subjects as the likelihood of unemployment and high inflation, and recommend ways to soften the social consequences.  While many solutions to the nation's economic troubles are being discussed, the blueprint is attracting widespread attention here because of its comprehensiveness and presumed high-level authorship.  Although it was published unsigned in the latest edition of the weekly Ekonomicheskaya Gazeta, Soviet sources say the article was written by Leonid Abalkin and a small group of colleagues.  Mr. Abalkin, head of the Academy of Science's Institute of Economics, was recently appointed deputy chairman of the Soviet government and head of a state commission on economic reform.  "It's clearly a manifesto for the next stage of perestroika," said one analyst.  The economic ideas in the document are much bolder than current policies.  For example, the proposed overhaul of prices -- an extremely sensitive political topic -- is far more precise than the vague plans announced by Mr. Gorbachev in 1987 and later dropped.  But the proposals also display political savvy, couching some of the most controversial ideas in cautious language so as not to alienate powerful conservatives in the government who stand to lose out if they are implemented.  Seeking a middle path between opponents of change and radicals who demand overnight solutions, the article advocates what it calls a "radical-moderate approach."  The document is to be discussed at a conference of leading economists late this month, and will probably be presented to the Soviet Parliament for consideration this year.  As policy-makers draw up proposals for the next five-year plan, which starts in 1991, the blueprint represents a powerful first shot in what is likely to be a fierce battle over economic reform.  The authors make a gloomy assessment of the economy and concede that "quick and easy paths to success simply don't exist."  Instead, they map out a strategy in several phases from now until 1995.  Most of the measures would probably only start to have an effect on beleaguered Soviet consumers in two to three years at the earliest.  The key steps advocated include:  -- PROPERTY. Rigid ideological restrictions on property ownership should be abandoned.  The document proposes breaking up the monolithic system of state-owned enterprises and farms and allowing a big private sector to flourish, helped by tough anti-monopoly legislation.  The economy would be thrown open to numerous types of ownership between now and 1992, including factories leased by workers or owned by shareholders, cooperatives and joint ventures.  Some forms of private property would be sanctioned.  Such moves would greatly reduce the power of government ministries, who now jealously guard their turf and are seen as one of the major obstacles blocking economic reform.  -- FINANCES. Emergency measures would be introduced to ease the country's financial crisis, notably its $200 billion budget deficit.  By the end of next year, all loss-making state enterprises would be put out of business or handed over to workers who would buy or lease them or turn them into cooperatives.  Similar steps would be taken to liquidate unprofitable state and collective farms by the end of 1991.  A unified system of taxation should be introduced rapidly.  To mop up some of the 300 billion rubles in circulation, the government should encourage home ownership, including issuing bonds that guarantee holders the right to purchase an apartment.  -- LABOR.  A genuine market for labor and wages would replace the present rigid, centralized system.  Departing from decades of Soviet dogma, the new system would lead to big differences in pay between workers and almost certainly to unemployment.  To cushion the blows, the government would introduce a minimum wage and unemployment benefits.  -- PRICES.  The entire system of centrally set prices would be overhauled, and free-market prices introduced for most wholesale trade and some retail trade.  Consumers would still be able to buy some food and household goods at subsidized prices, but luxury and imported items, including food, would be sold at market prices.  Wholesale prices would be divided into three categories: raw materials sold at fixed prices close to world levels; government-set procurement prices for a small number of key products; and free prices for everything else to be determined by contracts between suppliers and purchasers.  Inflation-adjusted social benefits would ensure that the poor and elderly don't suffer unduly.  -- FOREIGN TRADE.  The current liberalization and decentralization of foreign trade would be taken much further.  Soviet companies would face fewer obstacles for exports and could even invest their hard currency abroad.  Foreigners would receive greater incentives to invest in the U.S.S.R. Alongside the current non-convertible ruble, a second currency would be introduced that could be freely exchanged for dollars and other Western currencies.  A domestic foreign exchange market would be set up as part of an overhaul of the nation's banking system.  The blueprint is at its vaguest when referring to the fate of the two powerful economic institutions that seem likely to oppose such sweeping plans: the State Planning Committee, known as Gosplan, and the State Committee for Material Supply, or Gossnab.  But it hints strongly that both organizations would increasingly lose their clout as the changes, particularly the introduction of wholesale trade and the breakup of state monopolies, take effect.  Ready, Willing and Unable  I always lift the hood  When my car doesn't start;  If gadgets at home don't work  I coolly take them apart.  I'll admit there's nothing wrong  That I ever do find,  But it's nice when people say  I appear mechanically inclined.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Flick Shock  At the movies today  In detail you see  What the prof wouldn't show  In Physiology Three.  -- Robert Gordon.  ---  Candid Comment  Don't worry; people will learn to read as long as there are TV program listings.  -- John Drybred.  Albert Engelken and Robert Thomson had never met, though for 38 years their lives had been intertwined in a way peculiar to the sports world.  Mr. Engelken, now a transit-association executive in Washington, D.C., and Mr. Thomson, a paper-products salesman in Montvale, N.J., hadn't even talked to each other.  But one recent day, they became much closer.  Mr. Engelken, a rabid baseball fan, pores over the sports pages to chart the exploits of "my favorite and not-so-favorite teams and players."  He often groans, he says, at the "clutter" of sports stories about drugs, alcohol, gambling and some player's lament "about the miserly millions he is offered to play the game."  His morning paper, the Washington Post, even carries a sports column called "Jurisprudence" that recounts the latest arrests and convictions of players and team managers.  Like many sports buffs, Mr. Engelken has turned cynic.  But his is a story about a hero in an era of sports anti-heroes, and about what Babe Ruth, Mr. Engelken reminds us, once called "the only real game in the world."  To Mr. Engelken, it is also a story "about love, because I'm blessed to have a wife who still thinks her slightly eccentric husband's 50th birthday deserves the ultimate present."  To understand what Mr. Engelken means, one must go back to a sunny October afternoon in 1951 at New York's Polo Grounds stadium, where, it can be argued, the most dramatic moment in baseball history was played out.  It was the ninth inning of the third game of a three-game playoff between the Brooklyn Dodgers and the New York Giants (the predecessor to the San Francisco Giants scheduled to play in tonight's world series).  Baseball fans throughout New York had sweated out a long summer with their teams, and now it had come to this: a battle between the two for the National League pennant -- down to the last inning of the last game, no less.  Some 34,320 fans jammed the stands, and shouted at the top of their lungs.  Mr. Engelken was doing the same across the Hudson River in New Jersey, where, with his nose pressed against the front window of the Passaic-Clifton National Bank, he watched the duel on a television set the bank set up for the event.  The playoff series had riveted the 12-year-old Giants fan.  "The Giants struck first, winning the opener, 3-1, on a two-run homer off Dodger right-hander Ralph Branca," Mr. Engelken recalls with precision today.  "The Giants got swamped in the second game, 100, and trailed 4-1 going into the bottom of the ninth of the third and deciding game.  The Giants scored once and had runners on second {Whitey Lockman} and third {Clint Hartung} as Bobby Thomson advanced to the plate."  The rest, as they say, is history.  Mr. Thomson, a tall, Scottish-born, right-hand hitter, stepped into the batter's box.  "Thomson took a called strike," Mr. Engelken recounts.  The tension mounted as Ralph Branca, again on the mound, stared down the batter.  He wound up and let loose a fastball.  The pitch sailed toward Bobby Thomson high and inside and then, with a crack of the bat, was sent rocketing back into the lower leftfield stands.  "Giants fans went into euphoria," says Mr. Engelken.  And Bobby Thomson was made a legend.  The same Bobby Thomson, it turns out, who sells those paper-goods today.  There can't be an older baseball fan alive who doesn't clearly remember that Bobby Thomson homer, who can't tell you where he was when he heard the famous Russ Hodges radio broadcast -- the one that concluded with Mr. Hodges shouting, over and over, "The Giants win the pennant, the Giants win the pennant]"  Mr. Engelken and Mr. Thomson drifted in different directions in the subsequent years, and the Polo Grounds, located under Coogan's Bluff in upper Manhattan, was replaced by a public-housing project.  Mr. Thomson played outfield and third base until 1960, posting a lifetime .270 batting average and chalking up 264 home runs before retiring and going into paper-goods sales.  Mr. Engelken moved south to Washington, but he took with him enduring memories of the homer of 1951.  When his wife, Betsy, came down the aisle on their wedding day in 1966, Mr. Engelken -- no slouch on the romantic front -- gave her the ultimate compliment: "You look prettier than Bobby Thomson's home run."  The couple's first dog, Homer, was named after the Great Event, though unwitting friends assumed he was the namesake of the poet.  And when Mr. Engelken's sister, Martha, who was born two days before the home run, reached her 25th birthday, Mr. Engelken wrote his sports hero to tell him of the coincidence of events.  Mr. Thomson sent off a card to Martha: "It doesn't seem like 25 years since I hit that home run to celebrate your birth," it read.  Martha was pleased, but nowhere near as much as Mr. Engelken.  The family license plate reads "ENG 23," the first three letters of the family name and -- no surprise here -- Bobby Thomson's uniform number.  And on Mr. Engelken's 40th birthday, his wife bought a book detailing the big homer and sent it off to Mr. Thomson to be autographed.  "What could have been better?" asks Mr. Engelken.  Betsy Engelken asked the same question earlier this year, when her husband was about to turn 50.  She had an idea.  On her husband's 50th birthday (after an auspicious 23 years of marriage, it should be noted), Betsy, Al and their college-bound son set out for New York to visit Fordham University.  Mrs. Engelken had scheduled a stop on the New Jersey Turnpike to, she told her husband, pick up some papers for a neighbor.  The papers would be handed over at a bank of telephone booths just off Exit 10.  "It sounded like something out of Ian Fleming," Mr. Engelken recalls.  At the appointed exit, the family pulled over, and Mrs. Engelken went to get her papers.  Mr. Engelken turned off the motor and rolled down the window.  In a matter of minutes, she was back, with a tall, silver-haired man in tow.  She crouched down by the car window and addressed her husband with her favorite nickname: "Bertie," she said, "Happy 50th Birthday.  This is Bobby Thomson."  "And there he was," recalls Mr. Engelken.  "The hero of my youth, the one person in history I'd most like to meet.  Keep your Thomas Jeffersons, or St. Augustines or Michelangelos; I'd take baseball's Flying Scot without hesitation."  They talked of the home run.  "I thought it was in the upper deck," said Bobby Thomson, now 66 years old.  They talked of the aftermath.  "I never thought it would become so momentous," Bobby remarked.  Mr. Engelken, says his wife, "was overwhelmed by the whole thing.  It was worth it, just for the look on Albert's face."  The two men spent an hour at Exit 10, rehashing the event, "fulfilling the lifelong dream of a young boy now turned 50," Mr. Engelken says.  His hero signed photographs of the homer and diplomatically called Ralph Branca "a very fine pitcher."  And when Mr. Engelken asked him why he took time off from work for somebody he didn't even know, Bobby Thomson replied: "You know, Albert, if you have the chance in life to make somebody this happy, you have an obligation to do it."  In an interview, Mr. Thomson, who is married and has three grown children, says he has few ties to baseball these days, other than playing old-timers games now and again.  But his fans, to his constant amazement, never let him forget the famous four-bagger.  His mail regularly recalls "my one event," and has been growing in recent years.  In response to the letters, Mr. Thomson usually sends an autographed photo with a polite note, and rarely arranges a rendezvous.  But when Betsy Engelken wrote him, saying she could stop near his New Jersey home, it seemed different.  "What a good feeling it would be for me to do that," he says he thought.  When the Engelken family got back from its trip up north, Mr. Engelken wrote it all down, just to make sure no detail was missed.  "On the way home," his notes recall, "it took concentrated effort to keep that car pointed south.  My mind was miles north at a place called Coogan's Bluff, where a real sports hero had captured the imagination of a kid who never fully grew up and is all the richer for it.  "Take heart, sports fans," he wrote.  "Real heroes exist.  You might not find one in the `Jurisprudence' column.  But who knows?  You might meet up with him at that bank of telephone booths just off Exit 10 of the New Jersey Turnpike."  Southam Inc. said its unprofitable weekly newspaper, The Financial Times of Canada, is up for sale.  Analysts said the announcement, the latest in a series of divestitures and restructuring moves, is aimed at improving Southam's earnings before the expiration in June of a standstill pact with Torstar Corp.  When that agreement expires, Torstar will be free to increase its 22.4% stake in Southam, or to make an offer for the whole company.  Descendants of the Southam family hold an additional 22.6% stake in the Toronto-based company, Canada's largest newspaper publisher.  The newspaper could fetch between 15 million and 20 million Canadian dollars (US$12.8 million to $17.1 million), said one analyst, who asked not to be identified.  A spokesman for Southam declined to comment on the price the company is seeking or on estimates of the paper's annual losses, which most analysts place at between C$4 million and C$7 million.  Yesterday, Southam reported third-quarter earnings of C$10.8 million on revenue of C$395.4 million, down from C$14.6 million on revenue of C$389.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  "To be profitable, the paper requires more circulation and building circulation is an expensive undertaking," said John Macfarlane, the paper's publisher.  Southam said the level of future investment required by the paper would have restricted its options in other areas.  The acquisition of the Financial Times of Canada is "well within reach for any number of media companies, both public and private," said James Cole, an analyst with Toronto-based BBN James Capel Inc.  Possible bidders include Christopher Ondaatje, a Toronto financier and vice chairman of Hees International Bancorp Inc., a holding company controlled by Toronto's Bronfman family.  Mr. Ondaatje sold his stake in Pagurian Corp. to Hees earlier this year and is said to be seeking a media acquisition.  Mr. Ondaatje couldn't be reached for comment, but Roy Mac-Laren, chairman of CB Media, a closely held concern that publishes two business magazines, said his company would take a close look at the newspaper.  Mr. Cole said the sale of the 77-year Financial Times, which Southam has owned since 1961, is consistent with Southam's strategy of cutting costs to obtain maximum profits from its operations while disposing of "chronically under-performing" assets.  Southam agreed to sell its 47% stake in Selkirk Communications Ltd., a broadcasting concern, to Maclean Hunter Ltd. for about C$285 million last year.  This year, it has moved to cut costs in its newspaper division through layoffs and asset sales, while reaching joint venture and acquisition agreements in other areas.  The Financial Times of Canada has no links to the British daily newspaper, The Financial Times.  Norton Co. said net income for the third quarter fell 6% to $20.6 million, or 98 cents a share, from $22 million, or $1.03 a share.  Operating profit for the abrasives, engineering materials and petroleum services concern was $19.2 million, or 91 cents a share, up 3% from $18.7 million, or 87 cents a share.  The company had a tax credit of $1.4 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, the tax credit was $3.3 million.  Sales rose 8% to $368.5 million from $340.7 million.  Operating profit in the company's abrasives segment rose 16% while operating profit in the engineering materials segment rose 2%.  However, the company's petroleum services segment, while profitable, was hurt by high financing costs associated with the company's buy-out of a 50% stake in Eastman Christensen Co. from Texas Eastern Corp. last June.  Norton and Texas Eastern had each held a 50% stake in Eastman in a joint venture.  Norton announced earlier this month that it was exploring the possible sale of all or part of Eastman Christensen.  For the nine months, Norton had net of $81.2 million, or $3.87 a share, and a tax credit of $4.4 million.  In the year-earlier period, the company had net of $77.2 million, or $3.68 a share, and a tax credit of $7.7 million.  Norton had operating profit of $76.8 million, or $3.66 a share, up 11% from $69.5 million, or $3.31 a share.  Sales rose 8% to $1.15 billion from $1.06 billion.  Y.J. Park and her family scrimped for four years to buy a tiny apartment here, but found that the closer they got to saving the $40,000 they originally needed, the more the price rose.  By this month, it had more than doubled.  Now the 33-year-old housewife, whose husband earns a modest salary as an assistant professor of economics, is saving harder than ever.  "I am determined to get an apartment in three years," she says.  "It's all I think about or talk about."  For the Parks and millions of other young Koreans, the long-cherished dream of home ownership has become a cruel illusion.  For the government, it has become a highly volatile political issue.  Last May, a government panel released a report on the extent and causes of the problem.  During the past 15 years, the report showed, housing prices increased nearly fivefold.  The report laid the blame on speculators, who it said had pushed land prices up ninefold.  The panel found that since 1987, real-estate prices rose nearly 50% in a speculative fever fueled by economic prosperity, the 1988 Seoul Olympics and the government's pledge to rapidly develop Korea's southwest.  The result is that those rich enough to own any real estate at all have boosted their holdings substantially.  For those with no holdings, the prospects of buying a home are ever slimmer.  In 1987, a quarter of the population owned 91% of the nation's 71,895 square kilometers of private land, the report said, and 10% of the population owned 65% of the land devoted to housing.  Meanwhile, the government's Land Bureau reports that only about a third of Korean families own their own homes.  Rents have soared along with house prices.  Former National Assemblyman Hong Sa-Duk, now a radio commentator, says the problem is intolerable for many people.  "I'm afraid of a popular revolt if this situation isn't corrected," he adds.  In fact, during the past three months there have been several demonstrations at the office complex where the Land Bureau is housed, and at the National Assembly, demanding the government put a stop to real-estate speculation.  President Roh Tae Woo's administration has been studying the real-estate crisis for the past year with an eye to partial land redistribution.  Last week, the government took three bills to the National Assembly.  The proposed legislation is aimed at rectifying some of the inequities in the current land-ownership system.  Highlights of the bills, as currently framed, are:  -- A restriction on the amount of real estate one family can own, to 660 square meters in the nation's six largest cities, but more in smaller cities and rural areas.  The government will penalize offenders, but won't confiscate property.  -- A tax of between 3% and 6% on property holdings that exceed the governmentset ceiling.  -- Taxes of between 15% and 50% a year on "excessive" profits from the resale of property, or the sale of idle land to the government.  The government defines excessive profits as those above the average realized for other similar-sized properties in an area.  -- Grace periods ranging from two to five years before the full scope of the penalties takes effect.  The administration says the measures would stem rampant property speculation, free more land for the government's ambitious housing-construction program, designed to build two million apartments by 1992 -- and, perhaps, boost the popular standing of President Roh.  But opposition legislators and others calling for help for South Korea's renters say the proposed changes don't go far enough to make it possible for ordinary people to buy a home.  Some want lower limits on house sizes; others insist on progressively higher taxation for larger homes and lots.  The Citizens Coalition for Economic Justice, a public-interest group leading the charge for radical reform, wants restrictions on landholdings, high taxation of capital gains, and drastic revamping of the value-assessment system on which property taxes are based.  But others, large landowners, real-estate developers and business leaders, say the government's proposals are intolerable.  Led by the Federation of Korean Industries, the critics are lobbying for the government to weaken its proposed restrictions and penalties.  Government officials who are urging real-estate reforms balk at the arguments of business leaders and chafe at their pressure.  "There is no violation of the capitalistic principle of private property in what we are doing," says Lee Kyu Hwang, director of the government's Land Bureau, which drafted the bills.  But, he adds, the constitution empowers the government to impose some controls, to mitigate the shortage of land.  The land available for housing construction stands at about 46.2 square meters a person -- 18% lower than in Taiwan and only about half that of Japan.  Mr. Lee estimates that about 10,000 property speculators are operating in South Korea.  The chief culprits, he says, are big companies and business groups that buy huge amounts of land "not for their corporate use, but for resale at huge profit."  One research institute calculated that as much as 67% of corporate-owned land is held by 403 companies -- and that as little as 1.5% of that is used for business.  The government's Office of Bank Supervision and Examination told the National Assembly this month that in the first half of 1989, the nation's 30 largest business groups bought real estate valued at $1.5 billion.  The Ministry of Finance, as a result, has proposed a series of measures that would restrict business investment in real estate even more tightly than restrictions aimed at individuals.  Under those measures, financial institutions would be restricted from owning any more real estate than they need for their business operations.  Banks, investment and credit firms would be permitted to own land equivalent in value to 50% of their capital -- currently the proportion is 75%.  The maximum allowable property holdings for insurance companies would be reduced to 10% of their total asset value, down from 15% currently.  But Mrs. Park acknowledges that even if the policies work to slow or stop speculation, apartment prices are unlikely to go down.  At best, she realizes, they will rise more slowly -- more slowly, she hopes, than her family's income.  CAMBREX Corp., Bayonne, N.J., declared its initial quarterly of five cents a share, payable Dec. 1 to stock of record Nov. 10.  The maker of specialty chemicals has about 5.9 million shares outstanding.  The company said the move recognizes its strong financial position.  Although profits were "squeezed" in 1989, mainly as a result of higher raw-material costs, the company said it is confident about future earnings and cash flow for 1990 and beyond.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Cambrex shares rose 50 cents to close at $13 a share.  The Justice Department said it is seeking to join a private lawsuit challenging a Pittsburgh suburb's zoning ordinance that sharply restricts the locations available to group homes for the handicapped.  This would be the department's first suit challenging a local zoning ordinance under 1988 amendments to the Fair Housing Act.  Under those amendments, which took effect in March of this year, the federal government can intervene in private housing-discrimination lawsuits.  The ordinance, in Moon Township, prohibits locating a group home for the handicapped within a mile of another such facility.  In papers filed with the federal district court in Pittsburgh, the Justice Department alleged that the ordinance, by limiting the number of group homes that can be established in the township, makes housing unavailable on account of handicap.  The private suit was brought by three mentally retarded people who live in a group home in Moon.  Greg Smith, Moon Township manager, said the ordinance is intended to prevent the concentration of group homes for the mentally retarded from changing "the character and flavor of the neighborhood."  He said the ordinance also will benefit the mentally retarded.  "Our intent is to spread them out" to insure they are well integrated into the community, he said.  Energetic and concrete action has been taken in Colombia during the past 60 days against the mafiosi of the drug trade, but it has not been sufficiently effective, because, unfortunately, it came too late.  Ten years ago, the newspaper El Espectador, of which my brother Guillermo was editor, began warning of the rise of the drug mafias and of their leaders' aspirations to control Colombian politics, especially the Congress.  Then, when it would have been easier to resist them, nothing was done and my brother was murdered by the drug mafias three years ago.  The most ruthless dictatorships have not censored their press more brutally than the drug mafias censor Colombia's.  The censorship is enforced through terrorism and assassination.  In the past 10 years about 50 journalists have been silenced forever, murdered.  Within the past two months a bomb exploded in the offices of the El Espectador in Bogota, destroying a major part of its installations and equipment.  And only last week the newspaper Vanguardia Liberal in the city of Bucaramanga was bombed, and its installations destroyed.  Journalists and their families are constantly threatened as are the newspaper distribution outlets.  Distribution centers are bombed, and advertisers are intimidated.  Censorship is imposed by terrorism.  If the Colombian media accept this new and hideous censorship there is little doubt that the drug mafia's terrorism someday will extend to all the newspapers published in the free world.  The solidarity of the uncensored media world-wide against drug terrorism is the only way press freedom can survive.  The American people and their government also woke up too late to the menace drugs posed to the moral structure of their country.  Even now, the American attack upon this tremendous problem is timid in relation to the magnitude of the threat.  I can attest that a recent Colombian visitor to the U.S. was offered drugs three times in the few blocks' walk between Grand Central Terminal and the Waldorf Astoria Hotel in midtown Manhattan.  Colombia alone -- its government, its people, its newspapers -- does not have the capacity to fight this battle successfully.  All drug-consuming countries must jointly decide to combat and punish the consumers and distributors of drugs.  The U.S., as the major drug consumer, should lead this joint effort.  Reduction, if not the total cessation, of drug consumption is the requirement for victory.  Much is being done in Colombia to fight the drug cartel mafia.  Luxurious homes and ranches have been raided by the military authorities, and sophisticated and powerful communications equipment have been seized.  More than 300 planes and helicopters have been impounded at airports, and a large number of vehicles and launches has been confiscated.  The military has also captured enormous arsenals of powerful and sophisticated weapons, explosives and other war-like materiel.  Much has been accomplished and public opinion decisively supports the government and the army -- but, on the other hand, none of the key drug barons have been captured.  There has been a lot of talk that a large portion of the Colombian economy is sustained by the laundering of drug money.  In my opinion, this is not true.  Laundered drug money has served only to increase, unrealistically, the price of real estate, creating serious problems for low-income people who aspire to own their own homes.  Drug money has also gone to buy expensive cars, airplanes, launches and nightclubs where drugs are consumed.  But most of the drug money is kept in investments and in financial institutions outside Colombia.  In fact, the cooperation of those financial institutions is essential to the success of the drug battle.  What is of much more importance to the Colombian economy than the supposed benefits of laundered drug money is higher prices for Colombia's legitimate products.  The price of coffee has gone down almost 45% since the beginning of the year, to the lowest level (after inflation) since the Great Depression.  Market conditions point to even lower prices next year.  The 27-year-old coffee cartel had to be formally dissolved this summer.  As a result, Colombia will earn $500 million less from its coffee this year than last.  Our coffee growers face reductions in their income, and this tempts them to contemplate substituting coca crops for coffee.  U.S. interests occasionally try to impose barriers to the import of another important Colombian export -- cut flowers -- into the American market.  A just price and an open market for what Colombian produces and exports should be the policy of the U.S.  I take advantage of this opportunity given to me by The Wall Street Journal to make a plea to the millions of readers of this newspaper, to become soldiers dedicated to the fight against the use of drugs.  Each gram of cocaine consumed is a deadly bullet against those in our country and in the rest of the world who fight this terrible scourge.  A crusade of NO to the consumption of drugs is imperative.  ---  Mr. Cano is president of El Espectador, a newspaper founded by his grandfather.  It has more drug users than Boston has people.  Thirty-four thousand of its children live in foster homes, while 50,000 residents have no homes at all.  Its tax base is shrinking, a $1 billion budget deficit looms, and the city faces contract negotiations with all major municipal unions next year.  This is New York City.  When the dust and dirt settle in an extra-nasty mayoral race, the man most likely to gain custody of all this is a career politician named David Dinkins.  Running the nation's largest and most ornery city may be no treat, but at least Mr. Dinkins knows what to expect from it.  As the campaign hits the home stretch, however, voters still have very little idea what they can expect from him.  After 25 years in city politics, David Dinkins remains an enigma.  The soft-spoken, silver-haired Manhattan borough president -- the first black man to win the Democratic nomination for mayor here -- doesn't have a single prominent political enemy.  While he is widely described as a man with deep convictions, he has few major political programs that he can call his own.  Asked about his greatest achievement in public life, he first speaks about the quality of his staff.  Now, as election day nears, even some supporters wonder what he will do if he wins the mayoralty on Nov. 7.  They wonder whether he can be firm with his longtime allies, including union leaders and political cronies who may seek a place at the trough.  They wonder whether he has the economic know-how to steer the city through a possible fiscal crisis, and they wonder who will be advising him.  Will he, if he wins, be in the thrall of the most liberal of his allies, who advocate such policies as rent control for commercial buildings, or will he tilt toward the real-estate interests that have funneled money into his campaign?  After his decisive primary victory over Mayor Edward I. Koch in September, Mr. Dinkins coasted, until recently, on a quite-comfortable lead over his Republican opponent, Rudolph Giuliani, the former crime buster who has proved a something of a bust as a candidate.  But Mr. Dinkins has stumbled in the past two weeks over his campaign's payments to a black activist who is a convicted kidnapper, and over his handling of a stock sale to his son.  Polls also have recorded some slippage in Mr. Dinkins's support among Jewish voters, and citywide projections now put his lead at between four and 20 percentage points.  In an interview with reporters and editors of The Wall Street Journal, Mr. Dinkins appears quite confident of victory and of his ability to handle the mayoralty.  "A lot of people think I will give away the store, but I can assure you I will not," he says.  "I am aware we have real budgetary problems."  The city is full of aging bridges, water mains and roadways that are in need of billions of dollars worth of repair.  Renewed efforts to fight drugs and crime will be costly.  But city officials say tax revenues are lagging.  And after a decade of explosive job growth on Wall Street, a period of contraction is under way.  Mr. Koch already has announced he will drop 3,200 jobs from the city payroll, but that won't be enough.  New York State Comptroller Edward Regan predicts a $1.3 billion budget gap for the city's next fiscal year, a gap that could grow if there is a recession.  If elected, Mr. Dinkins will probably have no choice but to raise taxes on overburdened businesses or cut spending in already under-serviced neighborhoods.  "He is going to face a mess," says City Council President Andrew Stein.  "His supporters are not venal, but their solution to everything will be to spend more money, and he won't have any money."  By and large, Mr. Dinkins has finessed the touchy question of whose ox he would gore.  Instead of focusing on the financial future, Mr. Dinkins has sold himself as a unifier for a city recently touched by racial violence and as a soothing antidote to 12 years of commotion generated by Mayor Koch.  "The thing about the Dinkins candidacy is that it offers hope to a broad range of people," says Meyer Frucher, a real-estate executive and former aide to Gov. Mario Cuomo.  "It is a feel-good candidacy."  No doubt, Mr. Dinkins has been a calming influence.  He is an avuncular figure who remembers the birthdays of colleagues' children, opens doors for women, and almost never has a bad word to say about anybody.  More important, he emerged as a peacemaker last summer after the Central Park rape of a white jogger -- in which a group of Harlem teens was charged -- and the racial murder of a black teen-ager in the white Brooklyn neighborhood of Bensonhurst.  Rather than scaring off white voters, as many predicted he would, Mr. Dinkins attracted many whites precisely because of his reputation for having a cool head. (Keeping cool is a Dinkins priority: On humid days this summer, he was known to change his double-breasted suits as many as four times a day.)  But even in his front-runner campaign, he has shown signs of the indecisiveness and confusion that some say has plagued his tenure as Manhattan borough president -- and might hinder him as mayor.  Over the last few weeks, he has frittered away roughly half of what was once a 33-point lead in the polls over Mr. Giuliani.  A story about how he mishandled the sale to his son of his stock in a media company controlled by his political patron Percy Sutton was allowed to fester a full week before Mr. Dinkins faced the media.  He has canceled numerous campaign appointments and was largely inaccessible to the media until the stock story broke.  His campaign was caught flat-footed amid allegations it paid almost $10,000 for what it said was a "get-out-the-vote" effort by black activist Sonny Carson, a convicted kidnapper who later said publicly that he is "anti-white."  Critics have said the payment looked like an attempt by the Dinkins camp to get Mr. Carson to stop leading confrontational demonstrations protesting the Bensonhurst murder -- protests the campaign may have feared could cause some white voters to turn from a black candidate.  Mr. Dinkins also has failed to allay Jewish voters' fears about his association with the Rev. Jesse Jackson, despite the fact that few local non-Jewish politicians have been as vocal for Jewish causes in the past 20 years as Mr. Dinkins has.  These campaign problems have echoed difficulties Mr. Dinkins has run into before.  A former U.S. Marine, Mr. Dinkins got off to a quick start in politics, joining a local Democratic political club in the 1950s, linking up with black urban leaders such as Charles Rangel, Basil Paterson and Mr. Sutton, and getting himself elected to the state assembly in 1965.  But his chance to become deputy mayor under Mayor Abraham Beame, a plan boosted by Mr. Sutton, was squandered because of Mr. Dinkins's failure -- still largely unexplained -- to file income tax returns for four years running.  "I always thought of this as a thing that could always be done tomorrow," he said at the time.  Later, Mr. Dinkins became more deeply indebted to Mr. Sutton and other city pols, including then-City Council President Paul O'Dwyer, when they helped him get appointed city clerk, a largely ceremonial post responsible for the city's marriage bureau, among other things. (Mr.  O'Dwyer is now one of the lawyers for Mr. Sutton's media company.)  The debt rose further in 1977 when Mr. Sutton resigned his position as Manhattan borough president to run for mayor.  Mr. Sutton recalls: "When I left, I sat down with Charlie {Rangel}, Basil {Paterson} and David, and David said, 'Who will run for borough president?' And I said, 'You will.'"  David Garth, Mayor Koch's longtime media adviser, says of Mr. Dinkins, "He really is the personification of the patronage system.  But the guy is so personally decent, people tend to forget that."  Mr. Dinkins lost twice by wide margins before finally getting elected borough president in 1985.  But by most accounts, he made little of the post and was best known among city politicians for his problems making up his mind on matters before the city's Board of Estimate, the body that votes on crucial budget and land-use matters.  Colleagues today recall with some humor how meetings would crawl into the early morning hours as Mr. Dinkins would march his staff out of board meetings and into his private office to discuss, en masse, certain controversial proposals.  "He taught me how to drink herbal tea instead of coffee at 3 a.m., I'll give him that," says Deputy Mayor Robert Esnard.  Often, Mr. Dinkins's procrastination prevented him from having a say in the way things turned out, critics claim.  On the campaign stump, he often points out that he was the only Board of Estimate member to vote against a controversial real-estate project at Manhattan's Columbus Circle.  But board members say he took so long to decide how to vote that by the time he decided, it was too late to try to draw other members to his position.  Says one city official: "Everybody else had brought in the wagons and made their deal.  He would have got a lot more done if he made up his mind faster."  One Board member, Bronx Borough President Ferdinand Ferrer, was said to be so impatient with Mr. Dinkins's behavior at many meetings that he withheld his support for Mr. Dinkins's mayoral effort until late in the primary campaign.  "I had some problem from time to time on the length of time he would take to make up his mind," Mr. Ferrer admits, but he maintains that he didn't delay his support of Mr. Dinkins and that he backs the Democratic candidate enthusiastically.  Mr. Dinkins's campaign manager and former chief of staff, Bill Lynch, denies that the Manhattan borough president has taken too long to decide important issues.  "We didn't rubber-stamp everything that came to us," Mr. Lynch says.  On some occasions when Mr. Dinkins has discussed the issues during the campaign, he has run into a familiar kind of trouble.  Some supporters were stunned this summer when Mr. Dinkins suggested weakening the law forbidding public employees to go on strike.  He withdrew the remark.  When he later sided with striking hospital workers, some allies cringed a little more, concerned that Mr. Dinkins was setting the wrong tone for coming contract negotiations with city employees.  Then, two days before receiving an endorsement from environmental groups, Mr. Dinkins promised he would issue a three-year moratorium on construction of garbage-incinerator plants.  That announcement was roundly criticized by Mayor Koch -- who has endorsed Mr. Dinkins -- because the city faces a garbage crisis and has already spent $5 million planning for an incinerator that would be scrapped under Mr. Dinkins's proposal.  While his public statements have at times been confusing, Mr. Dinkins's position papers have more consistently reflected anti-development sentiment.  He favors a form of commercial rent control, which the financial community believes would make it more difficult to attract investment in the city.  In the midst of a labor shortage, he proposes linking city subsidies to businesses to their record of hiring New York City residents.  With an untrained local labor pool, many experts believe, that policy could drive businesses from the city.  And he favors a more cooperative approach toward the neighboring states of New Jersey and Connecticut in the battle over companies thinking of moving employees out of New York City.  Many economic-development officials say the Koch administration's aggressive approach helped save 5,000 Chase Manhattan Bank jobs from moving across the Hudson.  But Mr. Dinkins's economic planks don't seem to bother the business community, where he draws significant support.  Steven Spinola, president of the Real Estate Board of New York, an industry organization, says Mr. Dinkins's "economic development program is shortsighted, but when it comes down to it, he can be reasonable."  Mr. Dinkins's inner circle of advisers appears to include both ideologues and pragmatists, leaving voters with little clue as to who will be more influential.  The key man seems to be the campaign manager, Mr. Lynch.  A disheveled, roly-poly son of a Long Island potato farmer, Mr. Lynch is a veteran union organizer who worked on the presidential campaigns of Sen. Edward Kennedy and Mr. Jackson.  But as the Dinkins campaign hit tough times this month, Andrew Cuomo, the politically seasoned son of the New York governor, is also said to have taken a more active role on strategy.  Another close ally is Ruth Messinger, a Manhattan city councilwoman, some of whose programs, such as commercial rent control, have made their way into Mr. Dinkins's position papers.  If she remains influential with Mr. Dinkins, as some suggest she will, his mayoralty may take on a more anti-development flavor.  But Lincoln Center President Nathan Leventhal, who would head a Dinkins transition team, is more mainstream, as is real-estate executive Anthony Gliedman, another insider.  Mr. Dinkins also has said he would receive economic advice from a board that would include American Express Co. chairman James D. Robinson III, investment banker Felix Rohatyn, leveraged-buy-out specialist Reginald Lewis and attorney Joseph Flom.  Some business leaders and others also believe that Mr. Dinkins would place significant responsibility in the hands of a deputy mayor with a strong administrative background.  Names of possible deputies that have surfaced include former mayoral candidate Richard Ravitch, former schools chancellor Frank Macchiarola and Messrs.  Leventhal and Gliedman.  Then there are Mr. Dinkins's old-time Harlem colleagues, such as U.S. Rep. Rangel, former Deputy Mayor Paterson and Mr. Sutton.  Having attained positions of real influence or wealth, these men constitute the Old Guard of New York City black politics; they are less confrontational than the younger, more activist black political community that has been based largely in Brooklyn. (Part of Mr. Dinkins's strength is his ability to win the support of both the Brooklyn and Harlem factions.)  "We know there are potholes for the city out there," says Mr. Paterson, Mr. Dinkins's former law partner.  "If any of us think we're going to sidetrack David's determination to be the best possible mayor because of his obligations to us, we are making a sad mistake."  Adds Ms. Messinger, who is expected to win the borough president's job Mr. Dinkins is vacating, "You have to remember David is a pragmatist."  But Mr. Dinkins's sense of pragmatism often comes across more as an insider's determination not to upset the political apple cart.  He is taken aback in an interview when asked whether, as mayor, he plans on reforming the political "fiefdoms" that perpetuate the monumental ineffectiveness of New York's school system.  "I will sit down and talk some of the problems out, but take on the political system?  Uh-uh," he says with a shake of the head.  Despite many doubts about his candidacy, white New Yorkers -- who gave Mr. Dinkins 30% of their votes in the primary -- aren't expected to desert in sufficient numbers to turn the election to Mr. Giuliani.  The former U.S. attorney, who prosecuted targets ranging from Mafia dons to Wall Street executives, has succeeded in raising questions about Mr. Dinkins's ethical standards, but so far has failed to generate excitement about his own candidacy.  As a Republican in an overwhelmingly Democratic city, Mr. Giuliani has an inherent handicap.  As a first-time candidate, he has been slow to learn the nuances of New York City politicking.  Mr. Giuliani is finding that Mr. Dinkins, in his many years in public life, has built up considerable good will that so far has led many voters to overlook certain failings.  "The bottom line is that he is a very genuine and decent guy," says Malcolm Hoenlein, a Jewish community leader.  "In the end, I think David will be judged for being David."  Toni Johnson pulls a tape measure across the front of what was once a stately Victorian home.  A deep trench now runs along its north wall, exposed when the house lurched two feet off its foundation during last week's earthquake.  A side porch was ripped away.  The chimney is a pile of bricks on the front lawn.  The remainder of the house leans precariously against a sturdy oak tree.  The petite, 29-year-old Ms. Johnson, dressed in jeans and a sweatshirt as she slogs through the steady afternoon rain, is a claims adjuster with Aetna Life & Casualty.  She has been on the move almost incessantly since last Thursday, when an army of adjusters, employed by major insurers, invaded the San Francisco area to help policyholders sift through the rubble and restore some order to their lives.  Equipped with cellular telephones, laptop computers, calculators and a pack of blank checks, they parcel out money so their clients can find temporary living quarters, buy food, replace lost clothing, repair broken water heaters, and replaster walls.  Some of the funds will used to demolish unstable buildings and clear sites for future construction.  Many adjusters are authorized to write checks for amounts up to $100,000 on the spot.  They don't flinch at writing them.  "That's my job -- get {policyholders} what they're entitled to," says Bill Schaeffer, a claims supervisor who flew in from Aetna's Bridgeport, Conn., office.  The Victorian house that Ms. Johnson is inspecting has been deemed unsafe by town officials.  But she asks a workman toting the bricks from the lawn to give her a boost through an open first-floor window.  Once inside, she spends nearly four hours measuring and diagramming each room in the 80-year-old house, gathering enough information to estimate what it would cost to rebuild it.  She snaps photos of the buckled floors and the plaster that has fallen away from the walls.  While she works inside, a tenant returns with several friends to collect furniture and clothing.  One of the friends sweeps broken dishes and shattered glass from a countertop and starts to pack what can be salvaged from the kitchen.  Others grab books, records, photo albums, sofas and chairs, working frantically in the fear that an aftershock will jolt the house again.  The owners, William and Margie Hammack, are luckier than many others.  A few years ago, Mrs. Hammack insisted on buying earthquake insurance for this house, which had been converted into apartments.  Only about 20% of California home and business owners carried earthquake coverage.  The Hammacks' own home, also in Los Gatos, suffered comparatively minor damage.  Ms. Johnson, who works out of Aetna's office in Walnut Creek, an East Bay suburb, is awed by the earthquake's destructive force.  "It really brings you down to a human level," she says.  "It's hard to accept all the suffering people are going through, but you have to.  If you don't, you can't do your job."  For Aetna and other insurers, the San Francisco earthquake hit when resources in the field already were stretched.  Most companies still are trying to sort through the wreckage caused by Hurricane Hugo in the Carolinas last month.  Aetna, which has nearly 3,000 adjusters, had deployed about 750 of them in Charlotte, Columbia, and Charleston.  Adjusters who had been working on the East Coast say the insurer will still be processing claims from that storm through December.  It could take six to nine months to handle the earthquake-related claims.  When the earthquake rocked northern California last week, Aetna senior claims executives from the San Francisco area were at the company's Hartford, Conn., headquarters for additional training on how to handle major catastrophes, including earthquakes.  Since commercial airline flights were disrupted, the company chartered three planes to fly these executives back to the West Coast and bring along portable computers, cellular phones and some claims adjusters.  Because of the difficulty of assessing the damages caused by the earthquake, Aetna pulled together a team of its most experienced claims adjusters from around the country.  Even so, few had ever dealt with an earthquake.  Some adjusters, like Alan Singer of San Diego, had been working in Charleston for nearly four weeks.  He returned home last Thursday, packed a bag with fresh clothes and reported for duty Friday in Walnut Creek.  Offices were set up in San Francisco and San Jose.  In a few instances, Aetna knew it would probably be shelling out big bucks, even before a client called or faxed in a claim.  For example, officials at Walnut Creek office learned that the Amfac Hotel near the San Francisco airport, which is insured by Aetna, was badly damaged when they saw it on network television news.  "The secret to being a good adjuster is counting," says Gerardo Rodriguez, an Aetna adjuster from Santa Ana.  "You have to count everything."  Adjusters must count the number of bathrooms, balconies, fireplaces, chimneys, microwaves and dishwashers.  But they must also assign a price to each of these items as well as to floors, wallcoverings, roofing and siding, to come up with a total value for a house.  To do that, they must think in terms of sheetrock by the square foot, carpeting by the square yard, wallpaper by the roll, molding by the linear foot.  Using a calculator and a unit-price guide for such jobs as painting, plumbing and roofing in each major region of the country, adjusters can figure out the value of a home in today's market and what it would cost to rebuild it.  Sometimes repairs are out of the question.  When Aetna adjuster Bill Schaeffer visited a retired couple in Oakland last Thursday, he found them living in a mobile home parked in front of their yard.  The house itself, located about 50 yards from the collapsed section of double-decker highway Interstate 880, was pushed about four feet off its foundation and then collapsed into its basement.  The next day, Mr. Schaeffer presented the couple with a check for $151,000 to help them build a new home in the same neighborhood.  He also is working with a real-estate agent to help find them an apartment to rent while their home is being built.  Many of the adjusters employed by Aetna and other insurers have some experience with construction work or carpentry.  But such skills were alien to Toni Johnson.  Four years ago, she was managing a film-processing shop and was totally bored.  A friend mentioned that she might want to look into a position at Aetna, if she was interested in a job that would constantly challenge her.  She signed up, starting as an "inside" adjuster, who settles minor claims and does a lot of work by phone.  A year later, she moved to the commercial property claims division.  She spent a month at an Aetna school in Gettysburg, Pa., learning all about the construction trade, including masonry, plumbing and electrical wiring.  That was followed by three months at the Aetna Institute in Hartford, where she was immersed in learning how to read and interpret policies.  Her new line of work has some perils.  Recently, a contractor saved her from falling three stories as she investigated what remained of an old Victorian house torched by an arsonist.  "I owe that contractor.  I really do," she says.  As Ms. Johnson stands outside the Hammack house after winding up her chores there, the house begins to creak and sway.  The ground shakes underneath her.  It is an aftershock, one of about 2,000 since the earthquake, and it makes her uneasy.  The next day, as she prepares a $10,000 check for the Hammacks, which will cover the cost of demolishing the house and clearing away the debris, she jumps at the slightest noise.  On further reflection, she admits that venturing inside the Hammacks' house the previous day wasn't "such a great idea."  During her second meeting with the Hammacks, Ms. Johnson reviews exactly what their policy covers.  They would like to retrieve some appliances on the second floor, but wonder if it's safe to venture inside.  Ms. Johnson tells them that, if the appliances can't be salvaged, their policy covers the replacement cost.  Mr. Hammack is eager to know what Aetna will pay for the house, which has to come down.  "When will I get that check for a million dollars?" he jokes.  The adjuster hadn't completed all the calculations, but says: "We're talking policy limits."  In this case, that's about $250,000.  It suddenly dawns on Mr. Hammack that rebuilding the house in Los Gatos, an affluent community in Santa Clara County, may cost more than Aetna's policy will pay.  "We can lose money on this," he says.  "And you didn't want me to buy earthquake insurance," says Mrs. Hammack, reaching across the table and gently tapping his hand.  Earthquake insurance costs about $2 to $4 annually for every $1,000 of value, and high deductibles mean it generally pays only when there is a catastrophe.  So, many Californians believe they can get by without it.  Even Ms. Johnson herself made that assumption.  "I always knew that the 'Big One' was coming, but not during my lifetime," she says.  Now she says she's thinking of contacting her own insurance agent.  For Ms. Johnson, dealing with the earthquake has been more than just a work experience.  She lives in Oakland, a community hit hard by the earthquake.  She didn't have hot water for five days.  The apartment she shares with a 12-year-old daughter and her sister was rattled, books and crystal hit the floor, but nothing was severely damaged.  Her sister, Cynthia, wishes Toni had a different job.  "We worry about her out there," Cynthia says.  Last Sunday, Ms. Johnson finally got a chance to water her plants, but stopped abruptly.  "I realized I couldn't waste this water when there are people in Watsonville who don't have fresh water to drink."  She hasn't played any music since the earthquake hit, out of respect for those who died on Interstate 880 where the roadway collapsed.  The Federal Communications Commission allowed American Telephone & Telegraph Co. to continue offering discount phone services for large-business customers and said it would soon re-examine its regulation of the long-distance market.  The FCC moves were good news for AT&T, which has been striving since the breakup of the phone system for greater latitude in pricing and reduced regulation.  Alfred Sikes, the new FCC chairman, championed deregulation of AT&T at his last job as head of a Commerce Department telecommunications agency.  But it has been an open question whether Mr. Sikes, an extraordinarily cautious man, would continue pushing deregulation at the FCC in the face of what is likely to be great political pressure.  "It means that Sikes is serious about the deregulation of long distance," said Jack Grubman, a telecommunications analyst at PaineWebber Inc., who attended the FCC meeting.  "All the commissioners were in amazing agreement {to re-examine regulation} for only having been together for a few months."  The FCC took three specific actions regarding AT&T.  By a 4-0 vote, it allowed AT&T to continue offering special discount packages to big customers, called Tariff 12, rejecting appeals by AT&T competitors that the discounts were illegal.  Then by a separate 4-0 vote, it chose the narrowest possible grounds to strike down a different discount plan, called Tariff 15, that AT&T offered to Holiday Corp.  AT&T gave a 5% to 10% discount to the Memphis, Tenn., company that oversees Holiday Inns, in response to a similar discount offered to Holiday Corp. by MCI Communications Corp.  The agency said that because MCI's offer had expired AT&T couldn't continue to offer its discount plan.  But the agency specifically didn't rule whether AT&T had the right to match offers by competitors if that means giving discounts not generally available to other phone users.  Indeed, Joe Nacchio, AT&T's vice president for business-communications services, said AT&T offered a similar Tariff 15 discount to Resort Condominium International, of Indianapolis, to meet another MCI bid.  The FCC "didn't say I couldn't do it again," he said.  Apart from those two actions, Mr. Sikes and the three other commissioners said they expect to re-examine how AT&T is regulated since competition has increased.  Richard Firestone, chief of the FCC's common-carrier bureau, said he expected the agency to propose new rules next year.  AT&T applauded the FCC's actions.  "The time is long overdue to take a look at the fierce competition in the long-distance business and the rules governing it," the New York telecommunications firm said in a statement.  But MCI, of Washington, was displeased with the FCC decision concerning Tariff 12, arguing that "AT&T cannot be allowed to flaunt FCC rules."  United Telecommunications Inc.'s US Sprint unit said it was "obviously disappointed" with the FCC decision on Tariff 12.  US Sprint said was it will petition the FCC decision in federal court.  "We believe that the court will find it unlawful," said a US Sprint spokesman.  Separately, AT&T filed a countersuit against MCI accusing it of misleading consumers through allegedly "false and deceptive" advertising.  The AT&T action was the most recent blow in a nasty fight.  Earlier this month, MCI sued AT&T in federal district court, claiming that AT&T's ads are false.  AT&T assembled three of its top executives in Washington, all visibly angry, to try to refute MCI's charges.  "MCI has made hawks out of the upper echelon of AT&T," said PaineWebber's Mr. Grubman, who said he expected AT&T to become increasingly aggressive in dealing with its longtime nemesis.  ---  Julie Amparano Lopez in Philadelphia also contributed to this article.  Billions of investors' dollars are pouring out of the nation's junk-bond mutual funds, undermining a pillar of support in the already reeling junk market.  Last week alone, an eye-popping $1.6 billion flowed out of the junk funds, or nearly 5% of their total assets, according to estimates by Dalbar Financial Services Inc., a Boston research firm.  In the past two months the nation's 88 junk funds have lost a total of about $6 billion -- more than 15% of assets -- through sales or transfers of junk-fund shares, Dalbar says.  It made the estimates based on data collected from more than a dozen big junk funds.  Interviews with three major fund groups -- Fidelity Investments, Vanguard Group Inc. and T. Rowe Price Associates Inc. -- confirm the trend.  Their junk funds combined have had net outflows totaling nearly $500 million, or about 13% of their junk fund assets, in the past two months.  Some fund managers say negative publicity has exacerbated investors' concern about recent declines in junk-bond prices.  "People have been seeing headline after headline after headline and saying: `I can't take it anymore -- I'm getting out,'" says Kurt Brouwer of Brouwer & Janachowski, a San Francisco investment adviser.  The withdrawals could spell trouble for the $200 billion junk market.  If the heavy outflows continue, fund managers will face increasing pressure to sell off some of their junk to pay departing investors in the weeks ahead.  Such selling could erode prices of high-yield junk bonds, already weakened by a rash of corporate credit problems.  Mutual fund groups haven't lost control of much of the outgoing money, says Louis Harvey, Dalbar's president.  Mutual fund officials say that investors have transferred most of it into their money market accounts, and to a lesser extent, government-bond funds.  So the impact on the $950 billion mutual fund industry as a whole probably will be slight.  But tremors are likely in the junk-bond market, which has helped to finance the takeover boom of recent years.  Mutual funds are the among the largest holders of junk, accounting for more than a quarter of the entire high-yield, high-risk market.  The 88 mutual funds investing solely in junk bonds hold assets of about $32 billion.  Other funds hold a smattering of junk bonds, too.  The $1.5 billion Fidelity High Income Fund has had a net outflow of about $150 million in the past two months.  About $60 million streamed out last week alone, double the level of the week following last month's Campeau Corp. credit squeeze.  About 98% of the outflow was transferred to other Fidelity funds, says Neal Litvack, a Fidelity vice president, marketing, with most going into money market funds.  "You get a news item, it hits, you have strong redemptions that day and for two days following -- then go back to normal," says Mr. Litvack.  The fund, with a cash cushion of more than 10%, has "met all the redemptions without having to sell one thing," Mr. Litvack says.  He adds: "Our fund has had {positive} net sales every month for the last three years -- until this month."  Vanguard's $1 billion High Yield Bond Portfolio has seen $161 million flow out since early September; $14 million of that seeped out Friday Oct. 13 alone.  Still, two-thirds of the outflow has been steered into other Vanguard portfolios, says Brian Mattes, a vice president.  The fund now holds a cash position of about 15%.  At the $932 million T. Rowe Price High Yield Fund, investors yanked out about $182 million in the past two months.  Those withdrawals, most of which were transferred to other T. Rowe Price funds, followed little change in the fund's sales picture this year through August.  "The last two months have been the whole ball game," says Steven Norwitz, a vice president.  Junk-fund holders have barely broken even this year, as fat interest payments barely managed to offset declining prices.  Through Oct. 19, high-yield funds had an average 0.85% total return (the price change plus dividends on fund shares), according to Lipper Analytical Services Inc. That's even less than the 4.35% total return of the Merrill Lynch High-Yield Index.  Fidelity's junk fund has fallen 2.08% this year through Oct. 19, Lipper says; the Vanguard fund rose 1.84%; and the T. Rowe Price fund edged up 0.66%.  People who remain in junk funds now could get hit again, some analysts and fund specialists say.  Many funds in recent weeks and months have been selling their highest-quality junk issues, such as RJR Nabisco, to raise cash to meet expected redemptions.  Funds might be forced to accept lower prices if they expand their selling to the securities of less-creditworthy borrowers.  And then, asset values of the funds could plunge more than they have so far.  Says Michael Hirsch, chief investment officer of Republic National Bank and manager of the FundTrust Group in New York: "It's a time bomb just waiting to go off."  The surprise resignation yesterday of British Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson sent sterling into a tailspin against the dollar by creating uncertainties about the direction of the British economy.  The U.S. unit also firmed against other currencies on the back of sterling's tumble, as market participants switched out of pounds.  The pound also dropped precipitously against the mark, falling below the key 2.90-mark level to 2.8956 marks from 2.9622 marks late Wednesday.  Mr. Lawson's resignation shocked many analysts, despite the recent recurring speculation of a rift between the chancellor and Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher.  Indeed, only hours earlier, Mrs. Thatcher had called Mr. Lawson's economic policies "sound" and said she has "always supported" him.  "There was a general feeling that we'd seen the worst," said Patrick Foley, deputy chief economic adviser for Lloyds Bank in London.  "The resignation came as a great surprise."  Graham Beale, manager of foreign-exchange operations at Hong Kong & Shanghai Banking Corp. in New York, added that Mrs. Thatcher's comments reinforced the market's growing confidence about sterling and compounded the unit's later decline.  "The market was caught totally the wrong way. . . .  Everyone was extremely long on sterling," Mr. Beale said.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar was quoted at 1.8400 marks, up from 1.8353 marks late Wednesday, and at 142.10 yen, up from 141.52 yen late Wednesday.  Sterling was quoted at $1.5765, sharply down from $1.6145 late Wednesday.  In Tokyo Friday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 142.02 yen, up from Thursday's Tokyo close of 141.90 yen.  Few analysts had much good to say about the pound's near-term prospects, despite the fact that most don't anticipate a shift in Mrs. Thatcher's economic policies.  Mr. Foley of Lloyds noted that Mr. Lawson's replacement, John Major, the British foreign minister, will take time to establish his credibility and, in the meantime, sterling could trend downward in volatile trade.  But Mr. Foley predicted few economic policy changes ahead, commenting that Mr. Major shares "a very similar view of the world" with Mr. Lawson.  Bob Chandross, chief economist at Lloyds Bank in New York, also noted that the pound's sharp decline is pegged more to uncertainty in the market than a vision of altered United Kingdom economic policies.  Unless Mr. Lawson's resignation leads to a change in British interest-rate policy -- Mrs. Thatcher's administration firmly supports high interest rates to keep inflation in check -- or posturing toward full inclusion in the European Monetary System's exchange-rate mechanism, Mr. Lawson's withdrawal will have little long-term impact on exchange rates, Mr. Chandross concluded.  Also announcing his resignation Thursday was Alan Walters, Mrs. Thatcher's economic adviser and Mr. Lawson's nemesis.  The pound, which had been trading at about $1.6143 in New York prior to Mr. Lawson's announcement, sank more than two cents to $1.5930, prompting the Federal Reserve Bank to buy pounds for dollars.  The Fed's move, however, only proved a stopgap to the pound's slide and the Fed intervened for a second time at around $1.5825, according to New York traders.  Meanwhile, dollar trading was relatively uninspired throughout the session, according to dealers, who noted that Thursday's release of the preliminary report on the U.S. third-quarter gross national product was something of a nonevent.  U.S. GNP rose at an annual rate of 2.5% in the third quarter.  The implicit price deflator, a measure of inflation, was down to a 2.9% annual rate of increase in the quarter from a 4.6% rate of gain in the second quarter.  In Europe, the dollar ended lower in dull trading.  The market closed prior to Mr. Lawson's announcement.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose $3.40 to $372.50 an ounce in heavy trading.  The close was the highest since August 3.  Estimated volume was five million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Friday, gold was quoted at $370.85 an ounce.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Anheuser-Busch Cos., shelf offering of $575 million of debt securities.  Coca-Cola Bottling Co. Consolidated, shelf offering of $200 million of debt securities, via Salomon Brothers Inc. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  First Brands Corp., proposed offering of 6,475,000 common shares, of which 1,475,000 common shares will be sold by the company and five million shares by holders, via First Boston Corp. and Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd.  Home Nutritional Services Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Healthdyne Inc., proposed initial offering of four million common shares, of which 1.8 million will be sold by Home Nutritional Services and 2.2 million will be sold by Healthdyne, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Parametric Technology Corp., initial public offering of 1.7 million common shares, of which 1,365,226 will be offered by the company and 334,774 will be offered by holders, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc., Hambrecht & Quist Inc. and Wessels, Arnold & Henderson.  SynOptics Communications Inc., proposed public offering of 1.5 million common shares, of which 1,003,884 shares are to be sold by the company and 496,116 shares are to be sold by holders, via Morgan Stanley & Co. and Hambrecht & Quist.  On an office wall of the Senate intelligence committee hangs a quote from Chairman David Boren, "Don't hold your ticket 'til the show's over."  He once used that line in a closed-door meeting on Panama, meaning don't shrink from taking action against Manuel Noriega.  So how did a good senator like this end up approving a policy that required the U.S. to warn Mr. Noriega of any coup plot against him?  "I agree, it's ridiculous," says Mr. Boren, and indeed by now ridiculous may be the only way to describe how the U.S. decides to take -- or rather, not to take -- covert action.  George Bush disclosed the policy last week by reading it to GOP senators, perhaps as a way of shifting blame for the Panama fiasco to Congress.  But the broader truth is more complicated -- and dismaying.  The policy was contained in an exchange of letters last October between the Senate intelligence committee and the CIA and National Security Council.  Staff lawyers for both sides were busy agreeing with one another about what the U.S. could not do to oust the Panamanian thug.  They simply got carried away with interpreting what the executive order banning assassinations really meant.  Mr. Boren himself didn't discover the warn-your-enemy nuance until Mr. Bush told him privately at the White House last week.  It's ironic that David Boren should be in the center of this mire.  A former Oklahoma governor, he's a thoughtful defender of presidential powers in foreign policy.  He's a rare Democratic hawk.  He's the senator most like Arthur Vandenberg, the GOP senator from Michigan who worked to forge a bipartisan foreign policy in the 1940s.  "Vandenberg and Rayburn are heroes of mine," Mr. Boren says, referring as well to Sam Rayburn, the Democratic House speaker who cooperated with President Eisenhower.  "They allowed this country to be credible.  I really want to see that happen again."  If this were 1949, Mr. Boren might even succeed.  But in 1989 most senators have other ideas.  Last July, his committee rejected a Reagan administration plan to support a coup in Panama.  Ohio Democrat Howard Metzenbaum refused to support any plan that might get people hurt, a charming notion for a great power.  Maine Republican William Cohen said the plan might violate the assassination ban.  So the administration dropped it.  By October, when the committee rejected a much more modest covert proposal, even the administration was agreeing little should be done.  Mr. Boren doesn't think all this influenced the failed coup this month, but he does concede that Congress has made mistakes.  "In the aftermath of Vietnam, in the aftermath of Iran-Contra, I can understand some people might think that if they plan a coup, they have to bring their lawyers," he says.  But even Mr. Boren defends congressional oversight.  Writing in the Harvard International Review, he says that his committee approves covert operations only when there's a "consensus."  So what does consensus mean?  "It doesn't mean unanimous," he insists, though he implies it means a bipartisan majority.  "The sustainability of U.S. foreign policy is essential," he explains.  "Why was containment so successful?  Because it had bipartisan support."  Mr. Boren is confusing consensus on general principles with agreement on specific actions.  Elliott Abrams, a veteran of intelligence committee debates, doubts that even Grenada or the Libyan raid would have taken place if "consensus" had been required.  Vandenberg and Rayburn were wise enough to leave specific operations to presidents; modern senators, Mr. Boren notwithstanding, are less modest.  The result is that the Senate committee has what amounts to veto power over every covert action.  "I wouldn't say it's quite a veto," Mr. Boren demurs.  But wouldn't a president who acted despite Senate objections be taking grave political risks?  "He would," agrees the chairman.  "But that is something the president ought to know before he goes ahead."  Mr. Boren even spies a silver lining.  He figures the episode will help "clarify any ambiguities" between the committee and administration.  He points to a letter on his desk, his second in a week from President Bush, saying that they "don't disagree."  More broadly, Mr. Boren hopes that Panama will shock Washington out of its fear of using military power.  "Maybe this will jolt us out of the post-Vietnam syndrome that we never are prepared to use force," he says.  Maybe -- if every senator shared the principles of Mr. Boren.  But it's just as plausible to argue that if even David Boren can get mired in this sort of mess, the problem goes beyond legal interpretation.  Maybe the problem is a political system that won't act without an "exchange of letters," that insists on running foreign policy by committee, that treats a president as just another guy at the table.  The reply of the Metzenbaums and Cohens is that we can't abolish these oversight committees because we've seen too many abuses of executive power.  But Panama illustrates that their substitute is a system that produces an absurd gridlock.  The lawyers are now in charge of our national security.  In Panama, the U.S. interests at stake were happily minor; the only people killed were foreigners hapless enough to trust American will.  Americans may not be so lucky the next time.  I was impressed by the perceptiveness of your Sept. 12 story "Rural Enterprise: Tough Row To Hoe."  We lived in rural areas many years, but now live in St. Louis County, Mo.  This morning as I drove the 13 miles to my law office and endured the routine heavy traffic during that twice-daily journey, I thought of how fortunate it was that we made the decision to be residents of an expanding community with so many opportunities and where so much is happening.  The presence of so many people, cars and competing businesses is evidence of a healthy economy in a place where people want to live.  I thought back to our time in small, sparsely populated communities.  I remembered how hard it was for an outsider to become accepted by long-established, stake-holding residents, and what pitfalls awaited an original thinker in societies that were long accustomed to unchanging, "safe" ways of thought and action.  I remembered being fired at age 44, with five children at home, when my views and actions were deemed unsettling by a timid, small-town employer.  How difficult it is for a thinking person to live among societies rooted in the past.  Now, I revel in the freedom, culture, activity and diversity of this great metropolitan area with its traffic jams and perpetual road-building projects.  Yet when my youngest child died two years ago, I buried him in the church cemetery of a small Missouri town.  So after all, even the bitterest critic of rural exclusivity harbors a continuing yearning for those scarce, rural virtues thought to exist amid fields, forests and country lanes.  Ronald Edwin Parsons  Ballwin, Mo.  Finnish government officials are negotiating with creditors of Waertsilae Marine Oy, a major shipyard that filed for bankruptcy protection this week, amid confusion and mounting doubts that collapse of the nation's entire shipbuilding industry can be averted.  At stake are almost 10,000 jobs in an industry that has been the mainstay of Finland's post-war economic revival.  Shipbuilding became a point of pride as Finnish shipyards remained profitable long after rivals collapsed all over Europe.  But if, as many now fear, Waertsilae Marine joins the ranks of failed shipyards it might turn out to be remembered most as a blemish on Finland's international reputation.  The shipyard's 6.5 billion Finnish markka ($1.54 billion) backlog includes about 20 ships ordered by big international shippers, including three for Carnival Cruise Lines Inc.  Miami-based Carnival said the first of the three ships is scheduled to be delivered next month, just in time for the winter tourist season in the Caribbean.  The second ship is scheduled to be delivered in fall 1990 and the third in fall 1991.  One analyst said the first ship probably will be delivered close to schedule, but that Carnival may have to pay up to 25% more to get the second and third ships.  All the ships are covered by loan guarantees from a state export financing agency, even though it's not clear whether they will actually be built.  Bankers worry that if the government makes good a threat to withdraw its guarantee commitments, shippers will counter with a hail of lawsuits.  State loan guarantees are rarely a source of controversy.  However, some bankers cited possible parallels between the Waertsilae Marine case and the collapse of Norway's state-owned Kongsberg Vappenfabrikk AS two years ago.  In that case, international banks and investors incurred big losses because they incorrectly believed the company's debt carried implicit state guarantees.  Doubts about the quality of state credit guarantees could reduce the competitive strength of Finnish companies in world markets where financing often is the key to winning orders, analysts warn.  Moreover, state-owned Finnish companies lacking formal state guarantees could face greater difficulty raising funds in international financial markets, bankers say.  The decision by a majority of state-appointed Waertsilae Marine directors Monday to file for bankruptcy was an abrupt about-face from previous government policy.  In August, the government played a major part in a sweeping restructuring of the troubled shipyard.  At the time 71%-controlled by Oy Waertsilae, a conglomerate, the shipbuilding unit faced potential losses estimated at one billion markka and was on the brink of liquidation.  Under the rescue plan, Waertsilae sold 51% of its stake to a group of banks and pension funds.  The government, in turn, guaranteed financing to complete the order backlog and took control of the board.  Government officials were expected to combine Waertsilae Marine with two other struggling firms, and thus ensure Finland's survival as a shipbuilding nation.  The government spent most of last year attempting to carry out such a plan but was thwarted when the parent Waertsilae concern pulled out at the last minute.  After the restructuring of Waertsilae Marine and bolstered by state loan guarantees, two big bank creditors, Union Bank of Finland and state-controlled Postipankki, resumed lending the shipyard working capital.  But the bankers got cold feet recently as government officials complained they had been misled about the shipyard's actual financial condition, and hinted the credit guarantees might be withdrawn.  People familiar with Monday's board meeting said it was the state's refusal to explicitly reaffirm the credit guarantees that led Union Bank and Postipankki to halt lending to Waertsilae Marine.  Then, in a boardroom showdown, state-appointed directors voted to file for bankruptcy, apparently under instructions from Finland's Industry Minister Ilkka Suominen.  Analysts say Mr. Suominen had grown increasingly worried about the state's potential financial exposure as Waertsilae Marine's losses ballooned to more than double the figure estimated in August.  Noting that Sweden wound up wasting state subsidies of about 35 billion Swedish kronor ($5.47 billion) during the 1970s in a vain attempt to salvage its shipbuilding industry, one analyst suggested that Mr. Suominen may have decided to cut Finland's losses once and for all.  Senior ministry officials huddled with creditors during the week in an attempt to agree on some form of restructuring that would keep Waertsilae Marine operating.  The talks may drag on for weeks before any concrete result is announced, people familiar with them said.  One solution would be to sell the shipyard to an outsider.  But there appear to be few, if any, suitors.  Indeed, the potential losses make any rescue scheme unlikely unless the politicians once again change tack and agree to pick up the bill, analysts said.  Meantime, shippers with vessels on order from Waertsilae Marine will remain in limbo.  Turner Broadcasting System Inc. said it expects to report an extraordinary loss of about $122 million in the fourth quarter due to early retirement of debt.  The cable programmer said the loss will consist primarily of prepayment penalties, and unamortized issue discount and costs related to its just-completed $1.6 billion refinancing of its long-term debt and some preferred stock in one of its subsidiaries.  A Turner spokesman wouldn't speculate on the extent of the charge's effect on the quarter's earnings, but said the company continues to expect to report a net loss for 1989.  The company said the repayment or redemption of the long-term debt, and the outstanding Class A cumulative exchangeable preferred stock of Cable News Network, was made possible by an offering of about $750 million of debentures and notes and $900 million in bank borrowings.  The offering included $550 million of 12% senior subordinated debentures due 2001 and $200 million of zero coupon liquid yield option notes due 2004.  The notes were priced to yield 8% and are convertible into the company's Class B common stock at a price which represents a 15% premium over the market price on Oct. 10, 1989.  In addition, the company called its 12 7/8% senior subordinated notes due 1994, with an aggregate principal amount of $200 million, for redemption on Dec. 15.  As a result of the refinancing, the company said the interest on the debt will fall to slightly more than 11% from slightly more than 14%.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Turner's Class A stock closed at $50.50, down 37.5 cents.  General Motors Corp. said it will temporarily idle its Arlington, Texas, assembly plant for one week beginning Monday because of slow sales.  The closing will affect about 3,000 workers and eliminate production of 700 cars.  The assembly plant builds the Cadillac DeVille, Chevrolet Caprice and Oldsmobile Cutlass Ciera Wagon.  In addition, GM's Truck & Bus Group said slow sales are forcing it to close its Detroit assembly plant the week beginning Monday.  The plant builds chassis for recreational vehicles and about 450 workers will be affected by the closing.  The No. 1 auto maker scheduled overtime this week at its Janesville, Wis., assembly plant, manufacturer of the Chevrolet Cavalier.  The nine major U.S. auto makers plan to build 147,121 vehicles this week, down 9.6% from the 162,767 a year ago, but 2.5% higher than last week's 143,534.  Ford Motor Co. slated overtime again this week at its Wixom, Mich.; Wayne, Mich.; Kansas City, Mo., and Norfolk, Va., assembly plants.  They build the Lincoln Town Car, Continental and Mark VII, the Ford Escort and full-sized pickup trucks.  Chrysler Corp. scheduled overtime this week at its St. Louis Assembly Plant No. 2, Newark, Del., and Sterling Heights, Mich., assembly plants.  They build extended minivans and the Dodge Spirit, Acclaim, Shadow and Sundance.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 65,730 61,621 85,218 2,627,200 2,834,134 - 7  @Ford 39,417 36,793 36,041 1,443,664 1,501,733 - 4  @Chrysler 16,450 21,498 24,371 781,437 870,190 -10  @Honda 7,460 7,087 7,925 307,306 307,829 - 0  @Nissan 2,100 2,101 2,012 98,109 93,799 + 5  @Nummi-f 3,800 3,220 1,327 164,043 118,774 +38  @Mazda 4,480 4,451 5,429 185,617 123,524 +50  @Diam.Star 3,663 2,713 444 66,701 444 d  @Toyota 4,021 4,050 0 112,831 0 d  @TOTAL-x 147,121 143,534 162,767 5,786,908 5,886,266 - 2  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%. e-Estimated. f-Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla. r-Revised. x-Year-to-date 1988 figure includes Volkswagen domestic-production through July.  The surprise resignations of two top economic government officials heaped more uncertainty on London's financial markets, which already have been laboring under worries about Britain's ailing economy.  "The last thing markets like is uncertainty," said Ian Harwood, chief economist at S.G. Warburg & Co., of the resignations of Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson and chief economic adviser Sir Alan Walters.  "I think you'll see share prices go down, and sterling now is under something of a cloud."  The pound immediately began to take a buffetting after the resignations were announced.  In late New York trading, sterling stood at $1.5765, down from $1.6145 late Wednesday.  The British economy is hardly the picture of health these days.  At 15%, base interest rates are the highest in eight years, and the 7.6% annual inflation rate is by far the highest in the European Community.  Unions are pressing demands for wage increases of more than 10% despite general belief that economic growth next year will be less than 2%.  Increasingly, the financial markets are reflecting the gloom.  The Financial Times 100-share index has dropped about 12% from its 1989 high of 2423.9 on Sept. 8.  Yesterday, even before the resignations were announced, the index dove 32.5 points to close at 2129.4.  "We are expecting a recession," says Donald Franklin, chief economist at Schroders investment bank.  "The only question is, how deep is it going to be?  The outlook for corporate earnings is fairly bleak.  It's quite likely we're going to get repeats" of the mid-October market shocks.  Red ink already has begun to flow in the wake of the U.S.-U.K. market breaks of Oct. 13 and Oct. 16.  London-based LIT Holdings, the largest financer of traders in the Chicago options and futures markets, said yesterday it will incur a second-half loss as a result of the market plunge.  The company, which also will omit its second-half dividend, didn't specify the size.  But company insiders estimated that the loss could approach the equivalent of $10 million.  Christopher Castleman, LIT chief executive, said in an interview that the loss stemmed from the default of three options traders who had bet on a price rise in UAL Corp. shares before Oct. 13.  The price plummeted after a proposed leveraged buy-out of the airline fell through.  LIT Holdings shares plummeted 36 pence to close at 54 pence (85 cents), a 40% drop, on London's stock exchange.  Denizens of London's financial district are cushioning themselves for heavy blows.  "A lot more of our customers are staying until our 10 p.m. closing time," says Christopher Brown, managing director of Corney & Barrow Restaurants Ltd., which runs five tony wine bars in the district.  "There's a strong sense among the martini set that there's more {bad news} to come," asserts Roger Yates, chief investment officer at Morgan Grenfell Asset Management.  "People in the stock market were very much Thatcher's children -- very young and wealthy optimists.  Now it's dawning on them that they can be non-wealthy."  The malaise has created a nostalgic longing for the uncomplicated days of the mid-1980s, before a rash of securities-firm mergers on the eve of the industry's deregulation in 1986.  "People come to us saying they'd like to be back where they were a few years ago, in a more collegial atmosphere, with less tension," says Stephen Waterhouse, managing director of Hanover Partners Ltd., a financial district head-hunting firm.  But after trading losses in the mid-October market jolts here, many people will be lucky to have jobs at all, executives predict.  The industry, which currently employs about 25,000 people in London, has shed about 2,500 jobs over the past two years.  "I can see cuts of at least 20% more," says the head of the London office of a major U.S. firm.  The mergers and acquisitions market has been a saving grace for the industry, but uncertainties are beginning to mount even there.  Intra-European takeovers are expected to continue at their brisk pace.  But investment bankers say that stock market uncertainties in the U.S. may cause many European companies to mark time before bidding for American companies, in the hope that share prices will come down.  "If prices in the States go down, industrial buyers in Europe have the opportunity of getting reasonable prices in the U.S.," says Francois von Hurter, chief of Continential M&A at Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd.  But he adds: "Everybody and his sister have opened up M&A shops.  It's difficult to see that there's going to be enough business to go around.  About eight firms will get the lion's share.  At the others, there are going to be a lot of disappointments, after all those promises and all that big money that's been paid to people."  It all adds up to a cold winter here.  Says Allen D. Wheat, head of trading at Bankers Trust Co.: "People are just plain scared."  One person who is past worrying about London's blues is Christopher Hartley.  Last summer, he chucked his 10-year career as a London stockbroker and headed for the mountains.  He didn't stop until he got to Jackson Hole, Wyo.  "I'm glad to be out," said the 32-year-old Mr. Hartley in a phone interview.  "The percentage of your day spent twiddling your thumbs got greater, and the work day kept getting longer.  What am I doing in Jackson Hole?  Not a great deal.  My wife and I will stay through the skiing season, or until the money runs out -- whichever comes first.  But unlike London, out here I've never heard anybody blow a car horn in anger."  SYDNEY-Qintex Australia Ltd., under pressure from bank lenders, has called in accounting firm Peat Marwick Hungerfords to help oversee asset sales and restructure the resorts and media company.  Analysts said the move could presage even harsher action by the banks.  But any move by the banks to take over Qintex Australia's management could threaten its ability to operate its national television network under Australian broadcast license rules.  That, in turn, could substantially reduce the value of the television assets.  The appointment of Peat Marwick, which has a unit that specializes in advising troubled companies, came about as a result of a round of meetings held by Qintex Australia Chairman Christopher Skase with bank creditors.  Yesterday, Mr. Skase said the company is "solvent and with the continued support of its bankers is able to meet its financial commitments."  Qintex Australia is a unit of Qintex Ltd.  The Qintex group's problems began in earnest in March, when Mr. Skase agreed to buy MGM/UA Communications Co.  But the transaction faltered in September, when Qintex Australia was forced to increase its offer to US$1.5 billion following a counterbid from Rupert Murdoch; the deal fell apart altogether earlier this month.  Qintex Australia owes creditors around A$1.2 billion.  Last Friday, Qintex Entertainment Inc., its 43%-owned U.S. TV production and distribution affiliate, filed for Chapter 11 protection.  The government is sharpening its newest weapon against white-collar defendants: the power to prevent them from paying their legal bills.  And defense lawyers are warning that they won't stick around if they don't get paid.  The issue has come to a boil in Newark, N.J., where federal prosecutors have warned lawyers for Eddie Antar that if the founder and former chairman of Crazy Eddie Inc. is indicted, the government may move to seize the money that Mr. Antar is using to pay legal fees.  The warning by the U.S. attorney's office follows two decisions by the U.S. Supreme Court last June.  In those cases, the high court ruled that federal law gives prosecutors broad authority to seize assets of people accused of racketeering and drug-related crimes, including fees paid to lawyers before an indictment.  If the government succeeds in seizing Mr. Antar's assets, he could be left without top-flight legal representation, because his attorneys are likely to quit, according to individuals familiar with the case.  A seizure also would make the case the largest -- and one of the first -- in which lawyers' fees have been confiscated in a prosecution unrelated to drugs.  "The people who suffer in the short run are defendants, but the people who suffer in the long run are all of the people, because there won't be a vigorous private bar to defend the Bill of Rights," says Gerald Lefcourt, a criminal defense attorney who says he has turned down a number of cases to avoid possible fee seizures.  Mr. Antar is being investigated by a federal grand jury in Newark, where prosecutors have told him that they may soon seek an indictment on racketeering and securities fraud charges.  Under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO, the government has the authority to seek to freeze or seize a defendant's assets before trial.  According to individuals familiar with Mr. Antar's case, prosecutors issued their warning this week after one of Mr. Antar's attorneys asked whether legal fees might be subject to seizure.  In a letter, prosecutors told Mr. Antar's lawyers that because of the recent Supreme Court rulings, they could expect that any fees collected from Mr. Antar may be seized.  Prosecutors have told Mr. Antar's attorneys that they believe Mr. Antar's allegedly ill-gotten gains are so great that any money he has used to pay attorneys derives from illegal activities.  Therefore, they said, the money can be taken from the lawyers even after they are paid.  Justin Feldman and Jack Arseneault, attorneys for Mr. Antar, both declined to comment on the matter.  In Newark, U.S. Attorney Samuel A. Alito said, "I don't think there's any legal reason to limit forfeiture of attorney's fees to drug cases."  Mr. Alito said his office "just responded to an attorney's question about whether we would go after attorney's fees, and that is different from actually doing it, although we reserve that right."  Mr. Antar was charged last month in a civil suit filed in federal court in Newark by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In that suit, the SEC accused Mr. Antar of engaging in a "massive financial fraud" to overstate the earnings of Crazy Eddie, Edison, N.J., over a three-year period.  Through his lawyers, Mr. Antar has denied allegations in the SEC suit and in civil suits previously filed by shareholders against Mr. Antar and others.  The SEC has alleged that Mr. Antar aimed to pump up the company's stock price through false financial statements in order to sell his stake and reap huge profits.  Mr. Antar, the SEC said, made more than $60 million from the sale of his shares between 1985 and 1987.  The Justice Department has emphasized that the government's fee-forfeiture power is to be used sparingly.  According to department policy, prosecutors must make a strong showing that lawyers' fees came from assets tainted by illegal profits before any attempts at seizure are made.  Still, criminal defense lawyers worry that defendants are being deprived of their Sixth Amendment right to counsel and a fair trial if the government can seize lawyers' fees.  They also worry that if the government applies asset-forfeiture laws broadly, the best defense lawyers will be unwilling to take criminal cases unless they are assured of being paid.  The stock market correction of Oct. 13, 1989, was a grim reminder of the Oct. 19, 1987 market collapse.  Since, like earthquakes, stock market disturbances will always be with us, it is prudent to take all possible precautions against another such market collapse.  In general, markets function well and adjust smoothly to changing economic and financial circumstances.  But there are times when they seize up, and panicky sellers cannot find buyers.  That's just what happened in the October 1987 crash.  As the market tumbled, disorderly market conditions prevailed: The margins between buying bids and selling bids widened; trading in many stocks was suspended; orders took unduly long to be executed; and many specialists stopped trading altogether.  These failures in turn contributed to the fall in the market averages: Uncertainty extracted an extra risk premium and margin-calls triggered additional selling pressures.  The situation was like that of a skier who is thrown slightly off balance by an unexpected bump on the slope.  His skis spread farther and farther apart -- just as buy-sell spreads widen during a financial panic -- and soon he is out of control.  Unable to stop his accelerating descent, he crashes.  After the 1987 crash, and as a result of the recommendations of many studies, "circuit breakers" were devised to allow market participants to regroup and restore orderly market conditions.  It's doubtful, though, whether circuit breakers do any real good.  In the additional time they provide even more order imbalances might pile up, as would-be sellers finally get their broker on the phone.  Instead, an appropriate institution should be charged with the job of preventing chaos in the market: the Federal Reserve.  The availability of timely assistance -- of a backstop -- can help markets retain their resilience.  The Fed already buys and sells foreign exchange to prevent disorderly conditions in foreign-exchange markets.  The Fed has assumed a similar responsibility in the market for government securities.  The stock market is the only major market without a market-maker of unchallenged liquidity or a buyer of last resort.  This does not mean that the Federal Reserve does not already play an important indirect role in the stock market.  In 1987, it pumped billions into the markets through open market operations and the discount window.  It lent money to banks and encouraged them to make funds available to brokerage houses.  They, in turn, lent money to their customers -- who were supposed to recognize the opportunity to make a profit in the turmoil and buy shares.  The Fed also has the power to set margin requirements.  But wouldn't it be more efficient and effective to supply such support to the stock market directly?  Instead of flooding the entire economy with liquidity, and thereby increasing the danger of inflation, the Fed could support the stock market directly by buying market averages in the futures market, thus stabilizing the market as a whole.  The stock market is certainly not too big for the Fed to handle.  The foreign-exchange and government securities markets are vastly larger.  Daily trading volume in the New York foreign exchange market is $130 billion.  The daily volume for Treasury Securities is about $110 billion.  The combined value of daily equity trading on the New York Exchange, the American Stock Exchange and the NASDAQ over-the-counter market ranges between $7 billion and $10 billion.  The $13 billion the Fed injected into the money markets after the 1987 crash is more than enough to buy all the stocks traded on a typical day.  More carefully targeted intervention might actually reduce the need for government action.  And taking more direct action has the advantage of avoiding sharp increases in the money supply, such as happened in October 1987.  The Fed's stock market role ought not to be very ambitious.  It should seek only to maintain the functioning of markets -- not to prop up the Dow Jones or New York Stock Exchange averages at a particular level.  The Fed should guard against systemic risk, but not against the risks inherent in individual stocks.  It would be inappropriate for the government or the central bank to buy or sell IBM or General Motors shares.  Instead, the Fed could buy the broad market composites in the futures market.  The increased demand would normalize trading and stabilize prices.  Stabilizing the derivative markets would tend to stabilize the primary market.  The Fed would eliminate the cause of the potential panic rather than attempting to treat the symptom -- the liquidity of the banks.  Disorderly market conditions could be observed quite frequently in foreign exchange markets in the 1960s and 1970s.  But since the member countries of the International Monetary Fund agreed to the "Guidelines to Floating" in 1974, such difficulties have been avoided.  I cannot recall any disorder in currency markets since the 1974 guidelines were adopted.  Thus, the mere existence of a market-stabilizing agency helps to avoid panic in emergencies.  The old saying advises: "If it ain't broke, don't fix it."  But this could be a case where we all might go broke if it isn't fixed. ---  Mr. Heller, now at VISA International, was a governor of the Federal Reserve Board from 1986 until earlier this year.  This is adapted from a speech to the Commonwealth Club in San Francisco.  Bank of England Governor Robin Leigh-Pemberton urged banks to be cautious in financing leveraged buy-outs.  "Caution should . . . be the rule of the day," said Mr. Leigh-Pemberton in a speech to the Association of Corporate Treasurers' annual dinner.  "It would be damaging to industry and to the financial sector in general, to say nothing of banks, if prudence does not guide the financing of leveraged transactions."  His remarks were distributed to the press before Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson announced his resignation last evening.  Bank of England officials said the central bank had no comment on Mr.Lawson's resignation.  Mr. Leigh-Pemberton reiterated that the exposure of United Kingdom banks to leveraged deals haven't yet reached "worrying levels."  However, in light of the risks involved in such transactions, banks should satisfy themselves that they have the skills to participate in this market and clear policy guidelines on acceptable levels of exposure to such transactions, he said.  In other comments, he said takeovers may not always be the most efficient way of securing a change of corporate direction or strategy.  "A similar result could sometimes be achieved, at less cost, by changing managements," he said.  Intel Corp.'s most powerful computer chip has flaws that could delay several computer makers' marketing efforts, but the "bugs" aren't expected to hurt Intel and most computer makers.  Computer experts familiar with the flaws, found in Intel's 80486 chip, say the defects don't affect the average user and are likely to be cleared up before most computers using the chip as their "brains" appear on the market sometime next year.  Intel said that last week a customer discovered two flaws in its 80486 microprocessor chip's "floating-point unit", a set of circuits that do certain calculations.  On Friday, Intel began notifying customers about the bugs which cause the chip to give wrong answers for some mathematical calculations.  But while International Business Machines Corp. and Compaq Computer Corp. say the bugs will delay products, most big computer makers said the flaws don't affect them.  "Bugs like this are just a normal part of product development," said Richard Archuleta, director of Hewlett-Packard Co.'s advanced systems development.  Hewlett announced last week that it planned to ship a computer based on the 486 chip early next year.  "These bugs don't affect our schedule at all," he said.  Likewise, AST Research Inc. and Sun Microsystems Inc. said the bugs won't delay their development of 486-based machines.  "We haven't modified our schedules in any way," said a Sun spokesman.  To switch to another vendor's chips, "would definitely not be an option," he said.  Nonetheless, concern about the chip may have been responsible for a decline of 87.5 cents in Intel's stock to $32 a share yesterday in over-the-counter trading, on volume of 3,609,800 shares, and partly responsible for a drop in Compaq's stock in New York Stock Exchange composite trading on Wednesday.  Yesterday, Compaq plunged further, closing at $100 a share, off $8.625 a share, on volume of 2,633,700 shares.  Most of Compaq's decline is being attributed to a third-quarter earnings report that came in at the low end of analysts' expectations.  Intel said it had corrected the problems and would start producing bugless chips next week.  "We should not be seeing any more," said Bill Rash, Intel's director for the 486 chip.  What's more, the bugs only emerge on esoteric applications such as computer-aided design and scientific calculations, he said, and then very seldom.  "These errata do not affect business programs," he said.  The bugs will cause problems in "specific and rare circumstances that will not occur in typical applications" such as word-processing and spreadsheets, said Michael Slater, editor of the Microprocessor Report, an industry newsletter.  Sun, Hewlett-Packard and others say Intel isn't wholly to blame for the snafu.  The real culprits, they said, are computer makers such as IBM that have jumped the gun to unveil 486-based products.  "The reason this is getting so much visibility is that some started shipping and announced early availability," said Hewlett-Packard's Mr. Archuleta.  "You can do that but you're taking a risk.  Those companies are paying the price for taking the risk."  In late September, IBM began shipping a plug-in card that converts its PS/2 model 70-A21 from a 80386 machine to an 80486 machine.  An IBM spokeswoman said the company told customers Monday about the bugs and temporarily stopped shipping the product.  IBM has no plans to recall its add-on cards, the spokeswoman said, and could probably circumvent the bugs without long product delays.  "We don't look at this as a major problem for us," she said.  Compaq, which said it discovered the bugs, still plans to announce new 486 products on Nov. 6.  Because of the glitch, however, the company said it doesn't know when its machine will be commercially available.  That's a break from Compaq tradition, because the company doesn't announce products until they're actually at the dealers.  The problem is being ballyhooed, experts say, because the 486 is Intel's future flagship.  Intel's microprocessors are the chips of choice in many of today's personal computers and the 80486 microprocessor is the spearhead of the company's bid to guard that spot in the next generation of machines.  "Although these sorts of bugs are not at all uncommon, the 486 is an extremely high-profile product," said Mr. Slater, the newsletter editor.  Intel's 80486 chip is the Corvette of Intel's microprocessors, a super-fast, super-expensive chip that only the most power-hungry computer users are likely to buy for at least several years.  Unveiled last April, the chip crams 1.2 million transistors on a sliver of silicon, more than four times as many as on Intel's earlier model, 80386.  Intel clocks the chip's speed at 15 million instructions per second, or MIPs.  That's four times as fast as the 386.  Machines using the 486 are expected to challenge higher-priced work stations and minicomputers in applications such as so-called servers, which connect groups of computers together, and in computer-aided design.  But while the chip's speed in processing power is dazzling, it's real strength lies in its software inheritance.  The 486 is the descendant of a long series of Intel chips that began dominating the market ever since IBM picked the 16-bit 8088 chip for its first personal computer. (A 16-bit microprocessor processes 16 pieces of data at a time and is slower than newer, 32-bit chips.) Since then, Intel has cornered a large part of the market with successive generations of 16-bit and 32-bit chips, all of which can run software written for previous models.  That's what will keep computer makers coming in spite of the irritation of bugs.  Big personal computer makers and many makers of engineering workstations are developing 486-based machines, which are expected to reach the market early next year.  Of the big computer makers, only Apple Computer Co. bases its machines on Motorola chips instead.  "The 486 is going to have a big impact on the industry," said Hewlett-Packard's Mr. Archuleta.  "It's going to be the leading edge technology in personal computers for the next few years.  This bug is not going to have any affect on that at all."  ---  Andy Zipser in Dallas contributed to this article.  Bethlehem Steel Corp. has agreed in principle to form a joint venture with the world's second-largest steelmaker, Usinor-Sacilor of France, to modernize a portion of Bethlehem's ailing BethForge division.  The venture, which involves adding sophisticated equipment to make cast-iron mill rolls, is part of a two-pronged effort to shore up a division that has posted continuing operating losses for several years.  The other element includes consolidating BethForge's press-forge operations.  The entire division employs about 850 workers.  While the joint venture affects only a small part of Bethlehem's operations, it is significant because it marks the first time the nation's No. 2 steelmaker has joined forces with a foreign partner.  Wall Street analysts have criticized Bethlehem for not following its major competitors in linking with a foreign company to share costs and provide technology to modernize old facilities or build new ones.  "We think it's a step in the right direction for Bethlehem," said Felix Bello, WEFA Group's international steel analyst.  "It's important to share the risk and even more so when the market has already peaked."  He said the move could be the beginning of a broader relationship between the two companies, one that could open up new markets for Bethlehem.  Bethlehem had little choice but to go with a European steelmaker, because its competitors already have tapped the Japanese and South Korean industry leaders, analysts noted.  Under terms of the agreement, Usinor's Chavanne-Ketin unit and Bethlehem would establish a modernized facility to make cast-iron mill rolls at the company's cast-iron shop here.  Terms for the venture, which would be jointly owned by both companies, weren't disclosed.  The Usinor unit has agreed to provide technology and expertise to install a so-called spin caster by early next fall.  The caster improves the metallurgical quality of the iron mill rolls, which are basically huge rolling pins used to flatten or shape steel products.  Bethlehem is also working with the United Steelworkers union to consolidate BethForge's two machine shops and four heat-treatment facilities of the press-forge operations.  Once the consolidation is complete, Bethlehem plans to concentrate its forgings business on nuclear fabrication, hardened steel and large-diameter steel rolls for rolling mills and selected custom-die applications.  Bethlehem said earlier this year that it planned to restructure the BethForge division to improve its cost structure.  In the second quarter, Bethlehem posted a $50 million charge related to its plans to realign the division.  If you're still wondering about the causes of the slump in the junk-bond market, consider the case of Columbia Savings & Loan.  The California thrift has just announced a $226 million third-quarter loss.  How did this happen?  Well, when Congress in its recent S&L bailout mandated that the thrifts sell off all their junk-bond holdings by 1994, it not only artificially increased the supply of these bonds in the market but also eliminated one of the few profitable investments thrifts have made.  But there is a grimly ironic twist to the Columbia loss.  As followers of the debate over a capital-gains tax cut know, there is much talk in Congress and indeed all over Washington about the need to "encourage" long-term investment and discourage the financial sector's presumed obsession with the short term.  Now, we regard this as a largely phony issue, but the "long term" is nonetheless a big salon topic all around the Beltway.  It turns out that Columbia had this huge loss in large part because the new congressionally mandated rules forced it to adjust the book value of its soon-to-be-sold junk bonds to the lower of either their cost or market value.  They could no longer be classified as what Columbia regarded them, namely long-term investments.  Congress's ham-handed treatment of the existing structure of junk-bond holdings reminds us of a story in the Journal earlier this year about the Baby Bell companies' desire to have the court-ordered bans lifted on offering information services.  The issue of seeking relief from Congress was raised to Delbert Staley, the chairman of Nynex.  Mr. Staley replied:  "Legislation tends to be compromised.  I believe we have to take a shot at getting as much done as we can through the court, through Justice and through state and federal regulatory agencies.  I see Congress as a last resort."  Healthy thrifts such as Columbia or the junk-bond market itself should have been so lucky.  The reality of life in modern America is that if you want to wreck something that works, let it fall into the hands of Congress.  Exxon Corp. said it will move its headquarters from Manhattan to Dallas.  Most of the 300 employees at the oil company's midtown headquarters building -- including much of senior management -- were unaware of the plan until informed at a morning meeting by Chairman Lawrence G. Rawl.  The shift won't affect operations.  As part of its restructuring several years ago, Exxon moved most of those out of the city and sold its 53-floor Rockefeller Center skyscraper to a Japanese company.  But the pullout is an embarrassment to New York City officials, coming at a time of high office building vacancy rates and departures by other major companies.  Mobil Corp. is in the process of vacating its headquarters here, and huge operations like J.C. Penney & Co. and Trans World Airlines have recently left.  New York authorities, informed yesterday about the move, reacted with concern and even some anger to the idea of the nation's third-largest corporation leaving without giving them an opportunity to accommodate it.  "We are dismayed, but there's nothing we can do about it now," said Stanley Grayson, New York City deputy mayor for finance and economic development.  Meanwhile, Dallas welcomed the move.  City officials there had been were aware that a large company was moving in, but negotiations had all been conducted through a law firm and under the code name "Everglades."  "When we were told it was Exxon, it was beyond all expectations; what a coup," said Tom Lewis, senior vice president of Dallas Partnership, the economic development affiliate of the city's Chamber of Commerce.  Dallas, its economy based on oil and real estate, has been in a slump.  Exxon said it will build a new headquarters on a 132-acre tract in the 10-year-old Las Colinas complex in the suburb of Irving.  Until the building is completed, Exxon will rent part of an existing office tower.  Las Colinas, once a huge Texas ranch, is a sprawling complex of office buildings, homes and recreational facilities that its developers have been struggling to populate in recent years.  Exxon officials said it will cost less to run its headquarters at Las Colinas than in New York.  The company won't say how much it will save, but during at its interim location, sources say it will likely pay rent of $10 to $15 per square foot.  Owners of the building in New York say they will be asking $50 per square foot for rent to fill the space that Exxon is vacating.  In Texas, taxes and development costs are also lower, they said.  Plus, one Exxon official said, by eliminating the typically long New York commutes between office and home, management will expect employees to work 40 hours a week in Dallas, rather than a 35-hour work week in New York.  Canadian production of market pulp rose 1% in September from a year earlier as the industry operated at 87% of capacity.  The Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, an industry group, said Canadian mills produced 532,000 metric tons of market pulp in September, compared with 527,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Market pulp is wood pulp sold on the open market to producers of paper and other products.  The statistics exclude pulp consumed at the producing mill or shipped to another mill that is affiliated with the producing mill.  Canada is the world's largest producer of market pulp.  The September 87% operating rate compared with a rate of 101% in August but was unchanged from a year earlier.  In the first nine months of this year output was 5,377,000 metric tons, down from 5,441,000 metric tons a year earlier.  IMA Holdings Corp. completed its $3 billion acquisition of American Medical International Inc., purchasing 63 million shares, or 86%, of the Los Angeles-based health-care services concern for $26.50 a share.  The price also includes assumption of about $1.4 billion in debt.  IMA is a group that includes First Boston Corp. and the Pritzker family of Chicago through the leveraged buy-out fund Harry Gray Melvyn Klein & Partners.  Harry J. Gray and Melvyn N. Klein, along with five other IMA designees, were named to join American Medical's 10-member board.  The completion of the merger agreement follows months of twists and turns.  In January, American Medical brought in a new chief executive officer, Richard A. Gilleland, 45, who will remain as chairman, president and chief executive.  A few days later, American Medical announced sharply lower earnings, taking charges of $24 million for insurance reserves and canceled real estate leases.  In March, American Medical received a $24-a-share offer to take the company private from an investor group including large holder M. Lee Pearce.  It also was considering a restructuring to help boost the stock price.  A group including several members of the the Bass family of Texas urged the company to take some steps to maximize shareholder value.  The following month, the company put itself up for sale.  It received more offers, but the auction was surprisingly won by IMA, which bid $28 a share and asked Mr. Gilleland to stay on as an equity participant.  He indicated that some assets might be sold off to service the debt.  Then, after extending its offer four times waiting for a congressional tax ruling, IMA early this month lowered its offer to $26.50 a share amid turbulence in the junk bond market.  American Medical accepted the offer, meanwhile indicating it had heard from two other suitors.  But they never materialized and IMA completed the purchase yesterday.  Other new board members include John S. Harrison and Mark A. Adley of First Boston, James F. Lyons, William S. Goldberg and Harold S. Handelsman.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady said that Congress should grant the Securities and Exchange Commission the power to close the stock markets in periods of crisis.  In testimony to the Senate securities subcommittee, Mr. Brady disputed the view of SEC Chairman Richard Breeden, who told a House panel Wednesday that he doesn't want the ability to halt the markets.  Mr. Breeden contended that discretionary power could have an impact on the markets if rumors were to circulate about when the exchanges might be closed.  He added that the president already has the power to close the markets in an emergency.  But Mr. Brady argued that the SEC is closer to the markets and in a better position to understand when the exchanges are under such stress that they should be closed.  Separately, Mr. Brady said he asked the Working Group on Financial Markets to determine whether futures margins are too low.  He noted that some minimum margin requirements have been reduced to levels below those before the 1987 crash.  "This raises questions whether futures and equity margin requirements are consistent at these levels and whether futures margins are adequate," Mr. Brady said.  Margins are the amount of money an investor needs to put up to buy or sell a futures contract.  Margins on the futures exchanges typically are raised and lowered according to market volatility.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange margins for the Standard & Poor's 500 stock-index futures stood at $10,000 a contract for speculators and $5,000 for hedgers before Oct. 16, 1987; that day the hedging margin was raised to $7,500.  Margins were raised or lowered about a dozen times since the crash Oct. 19, 1987.  Currently, they stand at $12,000 for speculators, who are typically individuals and non-member traders, and $6,000 for hedgers, which are usually institutions and have offsetting positions in the underlying stocks.  Mr. Brady also said he expects the leveraged buy-out phenomenon to "end under (its) own weight."  Asked whether there is anything Congress should do to curb the LBO boom, Mr. Brady responded, "I think the LBO phenomenon, (while) it won't stop completely, will be a thing of the past."  Before taking any action, he advised the panel to "see what the market has produced as a cure."  Mr. Brady also agreed with senators' concerns about recent stock-market volatility, and said he realizes that the gyrations are scaring investors from investing in stocks.  But he added that individuals still are participating in the equity market indirectly through mutual funds and pension funds.  The former Wall Street executive refused to offer an opinion on the controversy surrounding program trading, which has recently become a larger part of the trading in the market and has been blamed for accelerating the drop two weeks ago.  "I do not have a view of whether we should do anything about program trading at this time," he said.  But Mr. Brady endorsed the market-revision bill that both houses of Congress will try to push through this session.  That bill, proposed by the SEC last year, would require brokerage firms to disclose the financial positions of their holding companies, mandate large traders' reporting of program or block trades, and improve clearing and settlement of trades between the futures and stock markets.  The bill also would give the SEC the power to close the markets, a discretion that former SEC Chairman David Ruder wanted but Mr. Breeden doesn't.  Mr. Brady and senators agreed to have their staffs meet within the next week to start fine-tuning the bill.  The Senate Agriculture Committee is responding to trading abuses in the futures markets with a far-reaching bill that would become the Futures Trading Practices Act of 1989.  The proposed legislation has a laudable goal: to assure the integrity of the U.S. futures markets.  However, as is common with sweeping legislation, the proposal contains many provisions that could destroy important parts of the system it sets out to preserve.  The complex bill, introduced by Sens.  Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.), Richard Lugar (R., Ind.), and Bob Kerrey (D., Neb.), covers a wide range of provisions that would affect the funding and authority of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission and would profoundly change the way the industry is regulated.  These include provisions relating to the technology and systems that must be employed by exchanges, oversight and disciplinary procedures for exchange trading practices, the relationship between commodity brokerage firms and floor traders, and exchange governance.  The bill also elevates even minor rule infractions to felonies and provides for recovery of punitive damages in civil lawsuits and arbitration cases without any showing of willful misconduct.  Many aspects of the bill are salutary, providing appropriate public safeguards that can and should be instituted throughout the industry.  Indeed, some of the bill's requirements, including broad representation on the exchanges' boards of directors and strong measures to prevent conflicts of interest, already have been put in place by the Coffee, Sugar & Cocoa Exchange and other futures exchanges.  Other aspects of the bill, however, are either structured in ways that create unnecessary burdens for the industry or actually are harmful to the exchanges, the industry and ultimately the general public.  One of the most prominent features is the requirement that in three years all exchanges have in place a system that records all trades by a source independent of the executing broker.  The New York futures exchanges have been working together to develop a trade recording system much like the one called for in the bill.  We would be delighted to have such a system in place today.  But is it realistic for Congress to mandate by a rigid deadline a system that has not yet been subjected to feasibility studies?  What if the system doesn't work?  What if the only system that does work is so expensive that, at best, only the largest exchanges can afford it?  Cost is a key consideration because of the global sweep of the financial markets.  The U.S. futures exchanges compete world-wide as never before.  Today, trading in almost any commodity can be diverted from U.S. markets with just a few strokes of a keyboard.  All foreign markets are aggressively courting U.S. business.  In fact, several London markets already offer lower costs for trading in the same or very similar contracts.  The U.S. exchanges need both market integrity and cost-efficiency; long-term growth depends on it.  The Senate bill contains many provisions that will increase the costs of trading.  The most arbitrary of these is the imposition of "service fees," which will directly widen the cost spread between U.S. and foreign markets.  Other provisions have a more subtle, but nonetheless real and detrimental effect on the international position of U.S. exchanges.  These include the extension of liability into areas beyond those established by judicial precedent and the expansion of liability to include punitive damages.  In addition to increasing costs as a result of greater financial exposure for members, these measures could have other, far-reaching repercussions.  One section of the bill would make all commodity brokerage firms and floor brokers liable for damages without willful misconduct.  Nowhere in the federal securities law is simple negligence or inadvertent action a source of liability under similar circumstances.  It is only logical to assume that the enactment of this provision will lead to increased litigation.  In an already low-profitmargin business, commodity brokerage firms may well decide to eliminate the risk and expense of dealing with the retail public, depriving the private individual of access to the markets.  Another measure makes commodity brokerage firms liable for violations committed by independent floor brokers who execute trades for them.  This untried concept would expose these firms to potentially astronomical punitive damages.  Faced with the virtually impossible task of supervising the execution of each trade, many commodity brokerage firms are likely to stop doing business with independents and instead hire their own salaried floor brokers.  This would force out of business many of the individuals and small firms that function as floor brokers.  A consequence of their departure could be a serious diminution of market liquidity.  Finally, under the bill, a number of legitimate, longstanding business practices would be arbitrarily banned, unless the CFTC were to take specific and timely action to permit them to continue.  In other words, regulation will occur through inaction and happenstance, rather than through a normal deliberative procedure.  The affected practices include the placing of oral orders, which is the way most public customer orders are placed, and trading between affiliated brokers, even though in some cases trading with affiliates may be the only way to obtain the best execution for a client.  Also precluded would be dual trading, whereby a broker trades for customers as well as his own account, a practice that provides needed liquidity to the markets.  All U.S. futures exchanges agree that these and other trading practices require proper regulation and supervision.  Nonetheless, each has too much potential value to the system to be banned by legislative fiat before the CFTC carefully considers all the consequences of a ban and what the regulatory alternatives are.  The markets are complex, as is the environment in which they function.  When problems surface, the temptation becomes strong to summarily overhaul a market system that has served for more than 100 years.  That temptation must be put aside to permit careful consideration of all the implications, positive and negative, of the proposed resolutions to those problems, and to avoid creating a marketplace where no one trades.  ---  Mr. Nastro is chairman of the Coffee, Sugar & Cocoa Exchange in New York and director of commodity administration at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Initial claims for state unemployment benefits fell to a seasonally adjusted 332,000 for the week ended Oct. 14 from 396,000 the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving state benefits in the week ended Oct. 7 fell to a seasonally adjusted 2,202,000, or 2.1% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,205,000 the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.2%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended Oct. 7 fell to 1,784,400 from 1,810,700 a week earlier.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  On the hungry streets of Naguib Mahfouz's Cairo, life is nasty, brutish and wickedly entertaining.  Zaita the "cripple-maker" rearranges the limbs of aspiring beggars -- and takes a cut of every cent they cadge.  Hassan Kamel Ali is a card shark and dope dealer who has a simple creed: "I live in this world, assuming that there is no morality, God or police."  For the killer and thief, Said Mahran, fame flows from the barrel of a gun.  "One man said you act as a stimulant," a prostitute tells him, "a diversion to relieve people's boredom."  Mr. Mahfouz's Cairo also has Sufi sheiks and saintly wives who look to God, not crime, for their salvation.  But it is his portrait of Cairo low-life -- of charlatans and opium addicts, of streets filled with "dust, vegetable litter, and animal dung" -- that made his reputation, and won him the Nobel Prize in 1988.  Three novels, "The Beginning and the End" (412 pages, $19.95), "The Thief and the Dogs" (158 pages, $16.95), and "Wedding Song" (174 pages, $16.95), recently published by Doubleday offer an uneven sample of the 77-year-old Mr. Mahfouz's talent.  But they do show the range of a restless intellect whose 30-odd novels span five decades and include work of social realism, protest and allegory.  They also chart the evolution of a city that has grown tenfold in the author's lifetime, from a colonial outpost of fez-wearing pashas to a Third World slum choking on its own refuse.  "Soon it'll be so crowded," a narrator complains, "that people will start eating each other."  "The Beginning and the End," easily the best of the three, belongs to Mr. Mahfouz's "realistic" period and it is the one for which he is most renowned.  Published in 1949, it follows the decline of a Cairo family with the saga-like sweep and rich detail that critics often compare to Dickens, Balzac and Galsworthy.  A minor bureaucrat dies suddenly, dooming his family to poverty and eventual disgrace.  His daughter turns to dressmaking, then to peddling herself for a few piasters.  One son sacrifices his own career so that his avaricious brother can succeed, while another helps support the family with money siphoned from crime.  The real tragedy, though, lies not in the family's circumstances but in its concern for appearances.  Mourning for the father is overshadowed by the shame of burying him in a pauper's grave.  The family moves to another house at night to conceal shabby belongings from neighbors.  And the successful son wishes his embarrassing siblings dead.  As a critique of middle-class mores, the story is heavy-handed.  But its unsentimental sketches of Cairo life are vintage Mahfouz.  We see, smell and hear slums filled with "the echoes of hawkers advertising their wares interspersed with abusive language, rattling coughs and the sound of people gathering spittle in their throats and spewing into the street."  And we meet engaging crooks, such as Hassan "the Head," famed for his head-butting fights, his whoring and his hashish. "`God has not yet ordained that I should have earnings,' he tells his worried mother."  Hassan comes to a bad end, but so does almost everyone else in the book.  If the setting is exotic, the prose is closer to Balzac's "Pere Goriot" than it is to "Arabian Nights."  Mr. Mahfouz began writing when there was no novelistic tradition in Arabic, and he modeled his work on Western classics.  In one sense, this limits him; unlike a writer such as Gabriel Garcia Marquez, who has a distinctive Latin voice, Mr. Mahfouz's style offers little that can be labeled "Egyptian."  But the familiarity of his style also makes his work accessible, as the streets of Cairo come alive for the Western reader as vividly as Dickens's London or Dostoevski's St. Petersburg.  "The Thief and the Dogs," written in 1961, is a taut, psychological drama, reminiscent of "Crime and Punishment."  Its antihero, Said Mahran, is an Egyptian Raskolnikov who seeks nobility in robbing and killing.  "I am the hope and the dream, the redemption of cowards," he says in one of many interior monologues.  Later, he recalls the words of his Marxist mentor: "The people] Theft] The holy fire]"  Said's story reflects the souring of socialism under Nasser, whose dictatorial rule replaced the monarchy overthrown in 1952.  By 1961, Mr. Mahfouz's idealism had vanished or become twisted, as it has in Said.  His giddy dream of redeeming a life of "badly aimed bullets" by punishing the "real robbers" -- the rich "dogs" who prey on the poor -- leads only to the death of innocents, and eventually to his own.  Cairo's spirited squalor also has gone gray.  Here, the city is dark and laden with symbolism: Said has left his jail cell only to enter the larger prison of Cairo society.  While the theme is compelling, the plot and characters are not.  We never care about Said or the "hypocrites" he hunts.  "The Thief and the Dogs" is a pioneering work, the first stream-of-consciousness novel in Arabic, but it is likely to disappoint Western readers.  The 1981 novel "Wedding Song" also is experimental, and another badly aimed bullet.  The story of a playwright's stage debut unfolds in first-person monologues, in the manner of Faulkner's "The Sound and the Fury."  But the device obscures more than it illuminates.  Buried in the work is a meditation on the morality of art, and on the struggle for integrity in an unfair world.  But again, the themes get tangled in Mr. Mahfouz's elliptical storytelling.  The indirectness of his later work reflects both an appetite for new genres and the hazards of art in the Arab world.  Mr. Mahfouz has been pilloried and censored for questioning Islam and advocating peace with Israel.  Veiling his message has helped him endure.  Art, says the playwright in "Wedding Song," is "the surrogate for the action that an idealist like me is unable to take."  "Wedding Song" gives glimpses of a Cairo that has become so much harsher since his youth, when, as he once said, "the poorest person was able to find his daily bread and without great difficulty."  The clutter of the 1940s remains, but its color has drained away, and the will to overcome has been defeated.  Cars can't move because of overflowing sewers.  Characters complain ceaselessly about food queues, prices and corruption.  And the ubiquitous opium addict is now a cynical and selfish man who gripes: "Only government ministers can afford it these days]" Having lost their faith in God, in social reform and in opium, Cairenes are left with nothing but their sense of humor.  ---  Mr. Horwitz is a Journal staff reporter covering the Middle East.  Norwood Partners Limited Partnership of Boston said it may make a tender offer for some or all of Phoenix Technologies Ltd.'s common shares.  Norwood, Mass.-based Phoenix, a once-high-flying maker of software for personal computers, has had substantial losses in the past two quarters.  Its stock, which was as high as $18.75 a share, has been trading under $4 a share recently.  Yesterday it closed at $4.375 a share, up $1.125, in national over-the-counter trading.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Norwood said it's part of a group that holds 525,546 Phoenix Technologies common shares, or a 5.3% stake.  Norwood has made "no detailed plans," but it has engaged in talks with other shareholders, the filing said.  Phoenix declined to comment.  Norwood is controlled by Daniel L. Barnett and Paul A. Reese, both officers of Boston-based Oasis Capital Management Inc., a small Boston money management firm.  Also involved in the group is Robert F. Angelo, formerly Phoenix's senior vice president, field operations, who left Phoenix at the beginning of October.  Mr. Angelo was described in the filing as a consultant to Oasis.  Weirton Steel Corp. said it reached a tentative agreement on a 48-month labor contract with the Independent Steelworkers Union covering production and maintenance employees.  The agreement, subject to approval of union members, would cover about 6,000 workers.  The tentative agreement provides for wage increases of 85 cents an hour retroactive to Sept. 25, 1989, and for increases of 19 cents, 70 cents and 35 cents an hour effective Jan. 1, 1991, 1992 and 1993, respectively.  It also provides for benefit adjustments, including a partial restoration of vacations and holidays, as well as work-rule changes to increase productivity.  Ground zero of the HUD scandal is the Secretary's "discretionary fund," a honey pot used to fund projects that weren't approved through normal HUD channels.  Jack Kemp wants to abolish it.  Instead, Congress's idea of reform is to increase this slush fund by $28.4 million.  And transfer control of much of it to Capitol Hill.  The HUD scandals will simply continue, but under new mismanagement.  After one of the most amazing debates we've ever seen on the cable channel C-SPAN, the House voted 250 to 170 on Wednesday to order $28.4 million in spending for a New Jersey arts center, a Michigan library and 38 other pet projects out of the same discretionary fund that was supposed to have been so abused during Sam Pierce's tenure.  HUD has no paper work whatsoever on 30 of the projects, none of the others has been approved and not a single congressional hearing has been held on any of them.  However, four are in the Michigan district of Rep. Bob Traxler, the chairman of the House subcommittee that writes the HUD spending bill.  Of course, this kind of blatant congressional pork-barreling is called "constituent service" by Members, while the same kind of noncompetitive favoritism at HUD is labeled "influence peddling."  Unlike those awful Republican consultants, Members don't profit directly from HUD projects.  They merely collect campaign contributions from developers that help keep them in office.  The 40 pet projects were discovered buried in the appropriations bill for HUD and some other agencies after it returned from a conference committee that was called to resolve differences between the House and Senate versions.  Conference committees are breeding grounds for mischief.  They are often closed to the public and no minutes are taken.  Members find it easy to doctor legislation by slipping in special provisions that could never survive in the cold light of day.  In this case, the Members outdid themselves.  They transferred some $28 million from the Community Development Block Grant program designated largely for low- and moderate-income projects and funneled it into such items as:  -- $1.2 million for a performing-arts center in Newark, N.J.  -- $1.3 million for "job retention" in Hawaiian sugar mills.  -- $400,000 for a collapsing utility tunnel in Salisbury, N.C.  -- $500,000 for "equipment and landscaping to deter crime and aid police surveillance" at a Michigan park.  -- $450,000 for "integrated urban data based in seven cities."  No other details.  -- $390,000 for a library and recreation center at Mackinac Island, Mich.  Rep. Traxler recently purchased an unimproved building lot on the island.  This is slightly adapted from remarks Oct. 7 by former Secretary of State George P. Shultz to an alumni gathering at the Stanford Business School, where he has returned to the faculty:  I was struck a couple of years ago by the drug-interdiction effort in the Bahamas.  We had intercepted during the year an estimated $5 billion street value of cocaine.  I don't know how much got through.  Nobody has any credible estimate.  The GNP of the Bahamas is probably somewhere between one and two billion dollars.  So you get an idea of the leverage there and elsewhere that our market for drugs has brought about.  I welcome the emphasis that is now being put on the drug problem.  The efforts to get to the people who are addicted, try to rehabilitate them; if they cannot be rehabilitated, at least to contain them; to educate people, to strongly discourage use of drugs by people who are casual users and first users, to stop this process among the young -- all of these things I think are extremely important.  But, I have to tell you that it seems to me that the conceptual base of the current program is flawed and the program is not likely to work.  The conceptual base -- a criminal-justice approach -- is the same that I have worked through before, in the Nixon administration when I was budget director and secretary of the treasury with jurisdiction over the Customs.  We designed a comprehensive program, and we worked hard on it.  In the Reagan administration we designed a comprehensive program; we worked very hard on it.  Our international efforts were far greater than ever before.  You're looking at a guy whose motorcade was attacked in Bolivia by the drug terrorists, so I'm personally a veteran of this war.  What we have before us now is essentially the same program but with more resources plowed into all of the efforts to enforce and control.  These efforts wind up creating a market where the price vastly exceeds the cost.  With these incentives, demand creates its own supply and a criminal network along with it.  It seems to me we're not really going to get anywhere until we can take the criminality out of the drug business and the incentives for criminality out of it.  Frankly, the only way I can think of to accomplish this is to make it possible for addicts to buy drugs at some regulated place at a price that approximates their cost.  When you do that you wipe out the criminal incentives, including, I might say, the incentive that the drug pushers have to go around and get kids addicted, so that they create a market for themselves.  They won't have that incentive because they won't have that market.  So I think the conceptual base needs to be thought out in a different way.  If I am catching your attention, then read a bold and informative article in this September's issue of Science by Ethan Nadelmann on this subject.  We need at least to consider and examine forms of controlled legalization of drugs.  I find it very difficult to say that.  Sometimes at a reception or cocktail party I advance these views and people head for somebody else.  They don't even want to talk to you.  I know that I'm shouting into the breeze here as far as what we're doing now.  But I feel that if somebody doesn't get up and start talking about this now, the next time around, when we have the next iteration of these programs, it will still be true that everyone is scared to talk about it.  No politician wants to say what I just said, not for a minute.  The U.S. economy grew at a moderate 2.5% annual rate in the third quarter, the same pace as the second quarter, despite the worst trade performance in six years, the Commerce Department reported.  Personal spending, buoyed by a burst of automobile buying, was the main catalyst to the economy's expansion.  But trade, one of the economy's main forces in the past few years, showed a sharp deterioration.  Imports of goods and services soared, while exports were flat.  Some economists found the mixture ominous.  "For the past two years, the foreign trade sector has been a major contributor to economic growth.  You can't rely now solely on consumer spending to sustain the economy on a solid growth path," said Norman Robertson, chief economist at Mellon Bank in Pittsburgh.  Although the economy showed no change of pace from the second quarter, many analysts expect it to slow considerably in the fourth quarter as demand for autos falls, partly because of higher prices on models introduced last month.  Many economists think the rise in the value of the U.S. dollar this year will further crimp progress in trade, because it makes exports more expensive and imports cheaper.  And business investment -- which slowed in the third quarter, according to yesterday's report -- is expected to continue to be sluggish.  A sharp reduction in inflation was by far the brightest spot in the report on the real gross national product -- the inflation-adjusted market value of all the goods and services the economy produced.  An inflation gauge that measures the quarterly change in prices of an array of goods and services slowed its growth to a 2.9% annual rate in the third quarter from 5% in the second.  Much of the moderation came from declining energy prices, which have since turned up a bit, analysts said.  Consequently, Michael Darby, undersecretary for economic affairs at the Commerce Department, said inflation probably will edge up from the third-quarter rate in the final three months of 1989.  But he said he believes the second quarter's 5% rate "will prove to have been this year's peak quarterly inflation rate."  Generally, the Bush administration expressed satisfaction with the economy's progress as it heads into its eighth year of sustained growth next month.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady called the 2.5% pace "good, solid growth," although he said he expects the expansion to slow in the fourth quarter.  He added: "Inflation is lower than I think people expected it to be, and I think that's good news."  But administration officials were concerned over the bleak trade report, which showed the deficit in the country's trade of goods and services swelling to a $74 billion annual rate in the third quarter from a $51 billion rate in the second quarter.  Mr. Darby called it a "disappointment" but predicted exports will pick up again.  "We were unprepared for the deterioration in net exports," said Daniel Van Dyke, vice president of U.S. forecasting at Bank of America in San Francisco.  "I can't believe it will continue," he added, noting that the economies of the country's major trading partners are strong and prices of U.S. products are still competitive.  Some analysts also were disturbed by a pickup in the growth of business inventories.  While a buildup of these stocks adds to GNP, it can hurt the economy because a pileup of unsold goods can lead to production cuts and layoffs.  According to the report, inventories outside the farm sector grew at an annual rate of $24.6 billion in the third quarter, up from a $19.5 billion pace in the second quarter.  Manufacturers' stocks fattened at an $18.4 billion annual rate, up from $8.3 billion.  "That suggests there is a little more inventory overhang than some people expected," said Edward Boss, senior financial economist at Continental Bank in Chicago.  "I don't think it's anything that's going to cause a downturn in economic activity.  But it will slow production."  Devastation from Hurricane Hugo, which slammed into the Southeast coast in late September, diminished personal income by about $4 billion, the department said, but it called the effect on the roughly $5 trillion economy "negligible."  Except for the loss from the hurricane, all the figures were adjusted for seasonal factors and inflation.  ---  @ GROSS NATIONAL PRODUCT  Here are some of the major components of the gross national product expressed in seasonally adjusted annual rates in billions of constant (1982) dollars:  @ 3rd Qtr. 2nd Qtr.  @ 1989 1989  @GNP ..................................... 4,158.1 4,132.5  @ less: inventory chng .................. 30.2 19.1  @ equals: final sales ................... 4,127.9 4,113.5  @Components of Final Sales  @ Personal Consumption .................. 2,691.2 2,653.7  @ Nonresidential Invest. ................ 518.0 511.4  @ Residential Invest. ................... 187.0 189.3  @ Net Exports ........................... -74.1 -51.2  @ Gov't Purchases ....................... 805.7 810.3  In the third quarter, the implicit price deflator fell to 2.9% of the 1982 average, from 4.6% in the previous quarter.  Northrop Corp. received a $93.5 million contract by the U.S. Air Force for production tooling and test equipment for the Tacit Rainbow defense-suppression missile.  The contract provides additional equipment for Northrop, the prime contractor on the missile, and also supports a 1990 purchase of 90 missiles for follow-on flight tests.  General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet division said it is offering $750 cash incentives on all 1990 models of its full-size Blazer and Suburban truck lines.  Chevrolet already has cash incentives on the 1989 models of these vehicles.  Hudson's Bay Co. announced terms of a previously proposed rights issue that is expected to raise about 396 million Canadian dollars (US$337 million) net of expenses.  Proceeds of the offering will be used to redeem C$264 million of preferred shares and to reduce short-term debt, the company said.  Canada's largest department store operator said the rights offering will entitle holders of its ordinary shares, except residents in the U.S. and Britain, to subscribe for two additional shares for every five shares held at a price of C$31.25 a share.  The record date is Nov. 9.  The company has about 31 million ordinary shares outstanding.  On the Toronto Stock Exchange, Hudson's Bay shares closed at C$35, up 12.5 cents.  Hudson's Bay said that Woodbridge Co., which currently holds about 77% of the ordinary shares, will subscribe for all the shares to which it is entitled and for any shares that aren't otherwise taken up.  Woodbridge is a holding company owned by Toronto's Thomson family.  Hudson's Bay said it will redeem 9.5 million Series H preferred shares on Oct. 31 at a price of C$27.75 each.  The move was approved at a special shareholders' meeting yesterday.  Gary Lukassen, chief financial officer, said redemption of the preferred shares, originally issued at C$25 each, will eliminate dividend payments of C$17.9 million annually.  Iverson Technology Corp. was one of the fastest-growing small companies in America -- until last year.  The McLean, Va., company modifies computers to keep sensitive military data out of unfriendly hands.  From 1984 to 1987, its earnings soared six-fold, to $3.8 million, on a seven-fold increase in revenue, to $44.1 million.  But in 1988, it ran into a buzz saw: a Defense Department spending freeze.  Iverson's earnings plunged 70% to $1.2 million.  The troubles continued in this year's first half, when profit plunged 81% to $302,000.  Iverson Technology is one of many small defense contractors besieged by the slowdown in defense spending.  Unlike larger contractors with a broad enough base to weather the downturn easily, these companies are suffering big drops in business as once-lucrative specialty niches in the massive military market erode or even disappear.  Companies that only recently were thriving find themselves scrambling to survive.  As their varied strategies suggest, there is more than one way to respond to a disaster -- though it's too soon to tell whether the changes will pay off.  For many companies, the instinctive first response is to cut costs.  Others are trying to find specialty defense work spared by the slowdown or new niches created by budget-cutting.  More venturesome businesses are applying their skills in commercial fields.  ERC International Inc., which provides professional and technical services to the military, is refining its defense niche, not retreating from it.  After quadrupling annual earnings over four years to $6.8 million in 1988, the Fairfax, Va., company, posted a 23% drop in earnings for this year's first half.  In the belief that development of advanced military technology will remain a top Defense Department priority, ERC last year acquired W.J. Schafer Associates, a technical and scientific analysis company with contracts under the Strategic Defense Initiative.  While the SDI anti-missile program recently awarded W.J. Schafer two contracts totaling $13.4 million, ERC's chairman and founder, Jack Aalseth, says he bought the company "more for its technology than its customer."  UNC Inc., an Annapolis, Md., contractor that earned $23.8 million on revenue of $400.4 million in 1988, has gone even further in realigning its military business.  As orders for its aircraft and submarine parts dwindled, three years of steady growth ended with a 69% drop in income in this year's first half.  The company hit on a new strategy: If the Defense Department is so intent on saving money, why not make money off that trend?  Among the company's current efforts: repairing old parts at 25% of the cost of replacing them.  UNC also is selling new parts, if needed, directly to the military instead of through a prime contractor.  At as little as one-third of the government's cost, the company is running a program to train Army helicopter pilots.  It is also taking over the maintenance of certain Navy aircraft with 40% fewer people than the military used.  In another approach, tiny Iverson Technology is trying to resume its growth by braving the new world of commercial products.  Donald Iverson, chairman, says he hopes the company can eventually get up to half of its revenue from commercial markets.  For now, he says, "we're looking at buying some small companies with niche markets in the personal-computer business."  Earlier this month, Mr. Iverson agreed to buy exclusive rights to a software system developed by Visher Systems Inc., Salt Lake City.  The product automates an array of functions performed at small to medium-size printing companies.  Mr. Iverson says there are 5,000 potential customers for the software in the Washington, D.C., area alone.  QuesTech Inc., Falls Church, Va., also has acquired some companies outside the military market.  Moreover, it's trying to transfer its skill at designing military equipment to commercial ventures.  A partnership with a Williamsburg, Va., unit of Shell Oil Co. recently patented a process for producing plastic food containers that won't melt in microwave ovens.  "We're trying to take the imagination and talent of our engineers and come up with new processes for industry," says Vincent Salvatori, QuesTech's chief executive.  "It is an effort to branch out from the government, which is very difficult for a defense contractor."  Mr. Salvatori should know.  Instead of helping his company in the defense spending slowdown, Dynamic Engineering Inc., a troubled subsidiary that makes wind tunnels for the space industry, contributed to much of QuesTech's $3.3 million loss on $55.6 million in revenue last year.  In January, Mr. Salvatori sold the unit.  "It was our first acquisition," he says, "and it was a mistake."  Some companies are cutting costs and hoping for the best.  Telos Corp., a Santa Monica, Calif., provider of software-development and hardware-maintenance services to the military, enjoyed steady growth until this year.  Following a tripling of earnings, to $3.9 million, on a doubling of revenue, to $116 million, over four years, earnings in the company's fiscal first quarter, which ended June 30, plunged 90% to $45,000.  A one-time write-off for booking nonexistent revenue was partly to blame, but so were lower profits from a stingier contract with the Army and delays in getting paid.  Telos responded by combining three of its five divisions to reduce expenses and "bring more focus to potentially fewer bidding opportunities," says Lin Conger, Telos chairman and controlling shareholder.  "It's evident we're entering a more competitive era," he says.  TransTechnology Corp., a Sherman Oaks, Calif., defense contractor that earned $9.2 million on revenue of $235.2 million in 1988, provides a more dramatic example of cost-cutting.  The company not only merged three military-electronics manufacturing operations, but also closed an unrelated plant that makes ordnance devices used in fighter planes and missiles.  The closing contributed to a $3.4 million loss in the fiscal first quarter ended July 31 -- its first quarterly loss since 1974.  "Our ordnance business has been hurt very badly by the slowdown," says Arch Scurlock, TransTechnology's chairman.  "I wouldn't say we're out of the business.  But we're not making as many {pyrotechnic devices} as we used to."  The growing crowd of Japanese investors buying up foreign companies aren't all strait-laced businessmen in dark suits.  Yasumichi Morishita, whose art gallery last month became a major shareholder in Christies International PLC, the London auction house, is one man who doesn't fit the mold.  In Japan, he's known in racy weekly magazines as the "King of Shady Money."  If nothing else, the 57-year-old's past has its share of dents.  Nearly 20 years ago, Mr. Morishita, founder and chairman of Aichi Corp., a finance company, received a 10-month suspended sentence from a Tokyo court for violating a money-lending law and an income tax law.  He was convicted of charging interest rates much higher than what the law permitted, and attempting to evade income taxes by using a double accounting system.  He's had other brushes with the law.  He was arrested, though not indicted, on at least three other occasions in the '60s and '70s: for assault and unlawful confinement, for fraud and forgery of private documents, and for extortion.  Christies says it has had no contact with Mr. Morishita since the stock purchase, but that it's happy to deal with him.  "We like to make our own judgments" about Mr. Morishita, says Christopher Davidge, Christies' group managing director.  "People have a different reputation country by country."  Mr. Morishita is a leading figure among Japan's 38,000 "machikin," which lend to small companies, and "sarakin," which lend to individuals.  Many of these financiers lend freely, often without demanding collateral.  But the interest rates they charge are often near Japan's 54.75% legal limit, says Kenji Utsunomiya, a lawyer specializing in loan troubles.  Aichi is a machikin, Mr. Utsunomiya says, and "one of the nasty ones."  In describing that business in general, he says that when the client can't repay the loan, some machikin "clutch on like hyenas" and even take over the client's company.  Last month, Mr. Morishita's new gallery, Aska International Ltd., purchased 6.4% of Christies for #33 million ($53.3 million).  Acquired from Carisbrook Holdings U.K. Ltd., a company owned by Australian financier Robert Holmes a Court, the stake was apparently the first of its kind for Aska, an entity separate from Aichi.  And the acquisition, which made Aska one of Christies' top five shareholders, left many people wondering who this man was and what his intentions were.  "We're an investor," Mr. Morishita says, sitting back in his purple gallery filled with some 20 Monets and Renoirs.  "In the long run, the {stock} prices will go up."  It's not clear whether Aska plans to buy more shares.  But Christies, Mr. Morishita insists, is happy to see him become a long-term stockholder.  Mr. Morishita considers himself a connoisseur of art.  In 30 years of collecting impressionist and Japanese paintings, he has acquired 600 items, he says, enough to persuade him to start a museum next year.  He says he spent $300 million on his art business this year.  A week ago, his gallery racked up a $23 million tab at a Sotheby's auction in New York buying seven works, including a Picasso.  "He makes snap judgments," says Kiyotaka Kori, the art gallery's manager and Mr. Morishita's secretary for more than seven years.  Mr. Morishita's main business certainly appears to be thriving, although he won't disclose numbers.  According to Teikoku Data Bank Ltd., which tracks company earnings, Aichi's revenue rose 15% to 49.3 billion yen ($348.4 million) in the year ended February.  Revenue doubled from two years ago.  That is, if the company reported results correctly.  The Asahi Shimbun, a Japanese daily, last month reported that Aichi revised its tax calculations after being challenged for allegedly failing to report all of its income to tax authorities over a two-year period.  The Tokyo Regional Taxation Office declines to comment, and Mr. Kori, the tycoon's secretary, says the problem simply resulted from a difference of opinion over what was considered income.  The small, wiry Mr. Morishita comes across as an outspoken man of the world.  Stretching his arms in his silky white shirt and squeaking his black shoes, he lectures a visitor about the way to sell American real estate and boasts about his friendship with Margaret Thatcher's son.  But when asked what exactly he does in business, he immediately takes offense.  "Are you stupid?" he snaps.  "You should know what questions to ask to get people to answer."  Not many people know the details of Mr. Morishita's business, but it's a source of rumors about shady dealings.  When a small company goes belly-up, for instance, the gossipy weekly magazines are often quick to link the demise with Aichi.  Mr. Morishita scoffs at those stories, as well as the ones connecting him to the Japanese mob.  He says he has never even dined with gangsters.  The seventh child of a store owner in Aichi prefecture, Mr. Morishita started out in the textile business.  From there, he set up his finance company and rapidly expanded from lending to investment in real estate to building golf courses.  He spends most weekends flying his helicopter to one of his nine courses, he says, two of which were designed by Jack Nicklaus.  He also owns courses in the U.S. and France.  The gruff financier recently started socializing in upper-class circles.  Although he says he wasn't keen on going, last year he attended a New York gala where his daughter made her debut.  He also leads an opulent life style.  Even in Denenchofu, one of Tokyo's richest neighborhoods, Mr. Morishita's splashy brick manor -- one of some 10 houses he owns -- outshines the neighbors'.  A lavish white portico with a stained-glass window towers over the brick wall surrounding his property.  Although Mr. Morishita says little about his business, he offers one rule to success: Never gamble too far.  "I quit after one try, whether I win or lose," he says.  "I'm done in two minutes."  Mr. Morishita says he intends to expand his business to many other areas at home and abroad.  He'll be there wherever there's money to be made, laughs Mr. Kori, the secretary.  "Who knows," he says, "if he heard that soybeans make money today, he might be flying out to Chicago tomorrow."  WHO'S NEWS: Arthur Price resigned as president and chief executive officer of MTM Enterprises Inc., a Studio-City, Calif., entertainment concern.  He co-founded the company with Grant Tinker and Mary Tyler Moore in 1969.  MTM is a unit of British-based TVS Entertainment PLC, whose chief executive officer, James Gatward, will oversee the company until a successor is named.  As expected, First Interstate Bancorp reported a net loss of $15.5 million for its third quarter because of hemorrhaging at its First Interstate Bank of Arizona unit.  The Los Angeles-based bank holding company disclosed last Friday that it had taken a huge $350 million provision for loan losses at the Arizona bank, the result of the state's worsening real-estate market.  In yesterday's report, First Interstate said its bank in Texas also reported a loss of $23.5 million for the quarter.  But it said that its consumer banks in Oregon, California, Nevada and Washington performed well during the quarter and that nonperforming assets at these banks declined by 14% over the year-ago period.  Private-sector union contracts signed in the third quarter granted slightly lower wage increases than those signed in the second quarter, but wage increases still are running above last year's levels.  The Labor Department said wage settlements in the third quarter called for average annual wage increases of 3.6% in the first year and 3.0% over the life of the contracts.  The last time parties to these settlements negotiated wage increases, mostly in 1986 or 1987, wages increased an average of 2.4% a year over the life of the contracts.  If this pattern continues, the Labor Department said, 1989 will be the first year that the measure has shown an increase since 1981 when the department started comparing expiring contracts with those that replaced them.  This reflects the restoration of wage cuts in the steel and other industries as well as higher wages granted nurses who work in health-care facilities.  Settlements reached in the first nine months of 1989 called for wage increases averaging 3.7% in the first contract year and 3.1% annually over the life of the contracts, the department said.  For all of 1988, union contracts provided for 2.5% wage increases in the first year and 2.4% over the life of the contracts.  In the second quarter, contracts called for increases of 3.9% in the first year and 3.4% over the life of the contracts.  The figures exclude lump-sum payments and cost-of-living adjustments, so the actual wage increases may have been bigger.  About 35% of the workers covered by contracts signed in the first nine months of year get lump-sum payments; about 15% are covered by cost-of-living clauses.  Unions covered by one or other provisions generally settled for lower percentage wage increases.  The Labor Department said wage increases in manufacturing industries continue to be smaller than those in other industries.  For all six million workers under major collective bargaining agreements, regardless of when they were signed, wage increases in the first nine months of 1989 averaged 2.5% -- including cost-of-living adjustments.  An enormous turtle has succeeded where the government has failed: He has made speaking Filipino respectable.  The 6 1/2-foot-tall turtle, Pong Pagong, is a character who stars in the children's television show "Batibot."  He speaks only in Filipino.  "Batibot," which started in 1983 as a hybrid of the U.S. program "Sesame Street," has developed into a distinctly Philippine effort.  Radio programs and books have followed the daily television show.  In the process, "Batibot," an archaic Filipino word meaning "strong" or "enduring," has become a powerful advocate of the use of the Filipino language.  "It impresses on ordinary, young Filipinos that there's nothing to feel inferior about in using their own language," says Randy David, a sociologist and host of a popular television talk show.  "When we started the program six years ago, the use of Filipino was deemed unwise by the predominantly middle class," says Lydia Brown, the program's creator.  Now, she says, "it's no longer an issue."  The success of "Batibot" stands in marked contrast to many academic and government attempts to promote Filipino as a national language.  Filipino -- once known as Pilipino -- is predominantly Tagalog, the Malay-based language spoken in a part of the country's principal island of Luzon.  Resistance to a national language comes primarily from members of the country's elite, who generally prefer English.  But while better-off Filipinos are quick to cite the logic in using a language as widespread as English, they are often slow to reveal that they are prejudiced against Filipino, say advocates of the native language.  "For the middle and upper-middle class {Filipino} is declasse," says Bien Lumbera, a Philippine-studies professor at Quezon City's University of the Philippines.  There's also resentment.  Other opponents of Filipino come from non-Tagalog regions.  They argue that their own languages should have equal weight, although recent surveys indicate that the majority of the country's population understands Filipino more than any other language. (There are seven major languages and more than 70 dialects in the country.)  What tongue to speak is an emotional mine field in the Philippines.  It is entrenched in the country's colonial bonds to the U.S., in Philippine class structure, in the regional loyalties of its people and in its island geography.  As they did when the Philippines was a colony of the U.S., teachers for the most part teach in English, even though it is a foreign language for most Philippine children.  As a result, they often speak one language at home, another at school.  Mrs. Brown calls the modern-day cultural ambivalence to Filipino a "language schizophrenia."  The issue has been simmering for years.  It doesn't take much to provoke an intense debate.  When President Corazon Aquino, whose command of Filipino is spotty, announced last year that the language would be used in official communications, there was an uproar from many legislators, who continue to conduct debates mostly in English.  But many proponents of Filipino see resistance to the language finally crumbling.  They believe the media, including "Batibot," have played a crucial role.  According to chief scriptwriter Rene Villanueva, "Batibot" doesn't set out to advance the cause of Filipino.  "It's not as if we're teaching language per se," he says, "We're just using it."  These days, "Batibot" is produced in a converted lumberyard on a shoestring budget of $3,000 a one-hour segment.  It is shown weekdays on two of the country's five networks.  With an audience totaling more than 400,000, "Batibot" consistently ranks in the country's top-four most-watched daytime programs.  But advertising revenue is inadequate.  Periodically, there are threats that the program will fold.  "Batibot" lacks the polish of "Sesame Street."  Sound stages echo.  Acting sometimes falls flat.  There are only two large puppets in the program: Pong Pagong and a monkey named Kiko Matsing.  But the production is the equal of any local program.  And the show's creativity makes up for any technological deficiencies.  The program isn't afraid to tackle controversial topics such as nuclear weapons and the environment.  Not that the language war is won, even on "Batibot."  During one recent episode, all the advertisements were in English.  CMS ENERGY Corp. said management would recommend to its board today that its common stock dividend be reinstated at a "modest level" later this year.  The Dearborn, Mich., energy company stopped paying a dividend in the third quarter of 1984 because of troubles at its Midland nuclear plant.  In addition, CMS reported third-quarter net of $68.2 million, or 83 cents a share, up from $66.8 million, or 81 cents a share, a year ago.  HEALTHDYNE Inc., Atlanta, said its subsidiary, Home Nutritional Services Inc., registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission an initial public offering of four million shares of common.  The in-home health care services provider said it will sell 1.8 million of the new shares, while Home Nutritional Services will sell the remaining 2.2 million.  The company estimates the offering price at between $14 and $16 a share.  The company said it expects to use the proceeds to repay certain bank debt and for general corporate purposes, including establishing new operating centers and possible acquisitions.  Home Nutritional currently has 10 million shares outstanding.  It will have 11.8 million shares outstanding after the offering, with Healthdyne owning about 65% of the total.  Black & Decker Corp. said it agreed to sell its Bostik chemical adhesives unit to Orkem S.A., a French chemical company, for $345 million.  Bostik is the first Emhart Corp. unit to be sold as part of the power-tool manufacturer's effort to reduce debt and consolidate operations after it acquired Emhart earlier this year.  Black & Decker said it plans to put other Emhart units on the block in the future, with the goal of raising $1 billion in net proceeds.  Black & Decker rescued Emhart from the takeover bid of Topper Limited Partnership last March by agreeing to acquire the maker of door locks and gardening tools for about $2.8 billion.  The move significantly expanded Black & Decker's product line, but also significantly increased its debt load.  The acquisition boosted Black & Decker's ratio of debt to total capital to more than 80%.  Company officials have said they plan to reduce that ratio to less than 50% over the next 2 1/2 years.  Earlier this year, Black & Decker put three Emhart businesses on the auction block: the information and electronics segment, the Dynapert electrical assembly business and Mallory Capacitors.  The three units had combined 1988 sales of about $904 million.  The three units contributed about a third of Emhart's total sales.  In addition, Black & Decker had said it would sell two other undisclosed Emhart operations if it received the right price.  Bostic is one of the previously unnamed units, and the first of the five to be sold.  The company is still negotiating the sales of the other four units and expects to announce agreements by the end of the year.  The five units generated sales of about $1.3 billion in 1988, almost half of Emhart's $2.3 billion revenue.  Bostic posted 1988 sales of $255 million.  "Our divestiture program is on schedule, and we remain confident that we will achieve our stated goal of over $1 billion in net proceeds," said Nolan D. Archibald, Black & Decker's president and chief executive officer, in a statement.  The sales are an attempt to quell investor concern about Black & Decker's increased debt burden from the Emhart purchase.  The company's stock plunged when it first announced that it planned to acquire Emhart.  The company maintains that it doesn't expect Emhart to contribute to earnings for about another 12 months.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Black & Decker closed at $19.75 yesterday, down 25 cents.  The company didn't announce the sale until after the close of the market.  Dick Darman, call your office.  Embedded in the "budget" being concocted by the House-Senate conference committee is something that looks, smells and waddles like a duck.  It's a nuisance tax on mergers.  Congress has decided to raise $40 million by charging companies $20,000 for the honor of filing the required papers under the Hart-Scott-Rodino law.  Ever since the bad days of Big is Bad antitrust enforcement, this law has required that anyone proposing a merger must make a filing describing the effects on all relevant markets.  The Hart-Scott filing is then reviewed and any antitrust concerns usually met.  Typically, Hart-Scott is used now to give managers of target firms early news of a bid and a chance to use regulatory review as a delaying tactic.  The $20,000 tax would be a small cost in a multibillion-dollar deal, but a serious drag on thousands of small, friendly deals.  One especially dangerous aspect to the new tax would be that the proceeds will be used to increase the budgets of the antitrust division at Justice and the Federal Trade Commission.  This amounts to a bounty for regulators -- the more regulating the more they get to keep.  Also, as former Reagan antitrust chief Charles Rule has noted, this would "establish the precedent that the government may charge parties for the privilege of being sued regardless of whether the government prevails."  Yet another opportunity for President Bush to respond, "Read my lips.  Line-item veto."  Michael Grobstein, 46 years old, was named vice chairman for planning, marketing and industry services, a new post.  Mr. Grobstein had been a vice chairman of Ernst & Whinney, an accounting firm that merged with rival Arthur Young in July to form Ernst & Young, a major accounting, tax and management consulting firm.  Mr. Grobstein's appointment formalizes a role he has been performing since the merger, a spokeswoman said.  Cie. de Navigation Mixte Chairman Marc Fournier said his board unanimously rejected as too low the $1.77 billion bid by Cie.  Financiere de Paribas to bring its stake in Navigation Mixte to 66.7%.  At a news conference, Mr. Fournier accused Paribas of planning to pay for the takeover by selling parts of the company, whose interests include insurance, banking, tuna canning, sugar and orange juice.  The chairman said his board members, including representatives of West German insurance giant Allianz AG and French banks Credit Lyonnais and Societe Generale, hold nearly 50% of Navigation Mixte's capital.  Mr. Fournier said that as Navigation Mixte chairman, he is prohibited by takeover regulations from organizing his own defense or doing anything besides managing current company business.  But sources said he will be urging his allies to boost their stakes in Navigation Mixte, which is being traded in London and is to resume trading in Paris Tuesday.  At the same time, he is expected to seek legal and regulatory means of blocking or delaying Paribas's bid.  For the moment, the sources said, he has decided against seeking a white knight or organizing a counterbid for Paribas.  Mr. Fournier said Navigation Mixte's 1989 unconsolidated, or parent-company, profit is likely to be 4.7 billion francs ($754.4 million), up from 633.8 million francs last year.  That is due mostly to payments from Allianz for most of the 50% stake it has agreed to acquire in Navigation Mixte's insurance business.  Mr. Fournier said the exceptional gain would mean nearly twice as high a dividend this year as last.  If holders avoid tendering to Paribas, he added, they can expect strong dividends again next year.  Analysts noted that over the past 20 years, Mr. Fournier has built his company through astute stock-market activity and has warded off at least three takeover attempts.  This time, however, some analysts think he could face a real battle.  "Without some unexpected "coup de theatre", I don't see what will block the Paribas bid," said Philippe de Cholet, analyst at the brokerage Cholet-Dupont & Cie.  Mr. de Cholet said Mr. Fournier's biggest hope was to somehow persuade regulatory authorities to block the bid.  Paribas still needs the go-ahead from the Commission des Operations de Bourse, a government regulatory agency, but analysts said that is considered likely.  Mr. Fournier also noted that Navigation Mixte joined Paribas's core of shareholders when Paribas was denationalized in 1987, and said it now holds just under 5% of Paribas's shares.  Once he realized that Paribas's intentions weren't friendly, he said, but before the bid was launched, he sought approval to boost his Paribas stake above 10%.  The petition is still pending, but Mr. Fournier downplayed the likelihood of his organizing a takeover bid of his own for the much-larger Paribas.  One big question now is the likely role of Mr. Fournier's allies.  Mr. Fournier said the large institutions that hold nearly 50% of Navigation Mixte's capital all strongly support him, but some analysts said they aren't so sure.  Allianz, for example, has said in official comments so far that it will remain neutral.  Paribas is Allianz's lead French bank.  Paribas said Monday that it intends to bid to boost its stake in Navigation Mixte to 66.7%, from the 18.7% it already owns.  The purchase of the additional 48% stake is expected to cost more than 11 billion francs ($1.77 billion).  Paribas says it will offer 1,850 francs ($296.95) each for Navigation Mixte shares that enjoy full dividend rights, and 1,800 francs each for a block of shares issued July 1, which will receive only partial dividends this year.  Alternatively, it is to offer three Paribas shares for one Navigation Mixte share.  The Paribas offer values Navigation Mixte at about 23 billion francs, depending on how many of Navigation Mixte's warrants are converted into shares during the takeover battle.  BLOCKBUSTER ENTERTAINMENT CORP. said it raised $92 million from an offering of liquid yield option notes.  The gross proceeds from the sale of the notes, which will be due on Nov. 1, 2004, will be used to reduce existing debt and for general corporate purposes, the company said.  The debt reduction is expected to save the Fort Lauderdale, Fla. home video concern about $2 million a year in interest expense.  The zero-coupon subordinated notes have no periodic interest payments.  Each note is being offered at $308.32 per $1,000 principal amount at maturity, representing an 8% yield to maturity.  In addition, each note can be converted into Blockbuster Entertainment common stock at a rate of 13.851 shares per note.  Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Inc. is the sole underwriter for the offering.  The notes will have a principal amount of $300 million at maturity.  Blockbuster shares closed yesterday at $18.75, down $1.125, in New York Stock Exchange trading.  The 1986 Tax Reform Act has nearly eliminated the number of large, profitable corporations that don't pay federal income tax, according to Citizens for Tax Justice, a nonprofit, labor-funded research and lobbying group.  In a study of 250 of the nation's richest companies, the group found that only seven managed to avoid paying federal income taxes last year compared with 40 in 1986, the last year the old tax rules were in effect, and 16 in 1987, when some of the new tax provisions went into effect.  Moreover, 41 companies that paid no federal income tax from 1981 through 1985 -- despite billions of dollars of profits -- ended up paying an average of 27.9% of their income in federal taxes in 1988.  The report, released yesterday, comes as Congress is considering a number of special tax breaks only three years after the sweeping tax-revision legislation abolished or curtailed many loopholes.  In the corporate realm, the 1986 law abolished the investment-tax credit, scaled back use of an accounting method that allowed large contractors to defer taxes until a project was completed and strengthened the so-called alternative minimum tax, a levy to ensure all money-making businesses pay some federal tax.  The combination of lower rates and fewer loopholes has meant that the so-called average effective tax rate -- the rate actually paid -- of the 250 corporations surveyed reached 26.5% in 1988, compared with 14.3% in the years from 1981 through 1985, according to the study.  In addition, corporations are now shouldering a bigger share of the tax burden, as the authors of the 1986 law hoped.  Corporate taxes paid for almost 12% of federal spending in 1988 -- excluding Social Security -- compared with less than 8% in the first half of the 1980s, the study found.  "Tax reform is working," the study said.  "Under the new tax-reform law, the days of widespread, wholesale corporate tax avoidance have come to an end."  Still, Kroger Co., Pinnacle West Capital Corp., CSX Corp., Illinois Power Co., Media General Inc., Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp. and Gulf States Utilities Co., didn't pay any federal income tax last year although they garnered a total of $1.2 billion in profits, the group said.  In fact, six of those companies received refunds, which totaled $120 million.  The lobbying group used publicly available information to calculate each company's domestic profits and its federal income tax payments.  This is the fifth year Citizens for Tax Justice has released a study on corporate tax bills.  Earlier reports, which revealed that as many as 73 companies were avoiding income tax legally, have been credited with helping galvanize efforts to overhaul the tax code.  But even though companies are paying more taxes, many are still paying less than the statutory rate, the report said.  And 45 companies paid effective tax rates of below 10% of their income.  "While the overall picture is very encouraging, significant corporate tax avoidance continues," the study said.  ---  Glenn Hall contributed to this article.  F. Gil Troutman, 46 years old, was named chief executive officer.  He retains his titles of president and chief operating officer and succeeds as chief executive Howard O. Painter Jr., who remains chairman of the board.  DSP makes electronic instrumentation and data acquisition systems.  In search of buyers for upscale department-store chains such as Bloomingdale's and Saks Fifth Avenue, investment bankers are turning to -- who else?  The Japanese.  But so far Japan's cash-rich retailers are proving to be cautious shoppers.  "We have the money to buy.  But operating a U.S. department-store chain would be very difficult," says Motoyuki Homma, managing director of the international division at Mitsukoshi Ltd., one of Japan's leading department stores.  Japanese retail executives say the main reason they are reluctant to jump into the fray in the U.S. is that -- unlike manufacturing -- retailing is extremely sensitive to local cultures and life styles.  The Japanese have watched the Europeans and Canadians stumble in the U.S. market, and they fret that business practices that have won them huge profits at home won't translate into success in the U.S.  Japanese department stores are also wary of attracting negative publicity.  After Sony Corp.'s recent headline-grabbing acquisition of Columbia Pictures, many say it makes good political sense to lie low.  "It's a question of timing," says Mayumi Takayama, managing director of international operations at Isetan Co., a Tokyo department store.  Still, for those with a long-term eye on the vast U.S. retail market, this is a tempting time to look for bargains.  Britain's B.A.T Industries PLC is trying to unwind its U.S. retailing operations, which include such well-known stores as Saks Fifth Avenue, Marshall Field's, Breuners and Ivey's.  And debt-ridden Campeau Corp. of Toronto is giving up the 17-store Bloomingdale's group.  "Every department store in Japan is taking a look," says Mike Allen, a retail analyst at Barclay's de Zoete Wedd Securities (Japan) Ltd. Mr. Allen, however, doesn't think that Japan is about to embark on a major buying binge.  Nonetheless, speculation heated up yesterday when Tokyu Department Store Co. confirmed a report in Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japan's leading business daily, that Tokyu is talking with Campeau about buying Bloomingdale's.  Tokyu, however, said no agreement had been reached.  Nor is Tokyu the only Japanese retailer interested in Bloomingdale's, which bankers in Tokyo estimate could cost between $1 billion and $1.5 billion.  Seven Japanese department-store groups were approached by investment bankers representing Bloomingdale's chairman, Marvin Traub, and more than half are seeking additional information on the group, bankers say.  What Mr. Traub is hoping to put together, investment bankers say, is a management-led group to buy the New York department-store group that he heads from Campeau's Federated Department Stores subsidiary.  Federated ran into a cash crunch after it was acquired last year by Campeau, which relied heavily on debt to finance the transaction.  Paying off that debt put such a squeeze on Campeau and its stores that Federated decided to sell off the jewels of its retailing empire, including Bloomingdale's.  Hoping to avoid another takeover, Mr. Traub retained Blackstone Group and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. to help him find partners for a management-led buy-out.  Ideally, investment bankers say, he wants to get backing from a Japanese department store and a European department store to forge a global retailing network.  "When you look at the economics, Traub needs a Japanese and a European partner to make it work," says one investment banker who follows the retail industry.  "Looking only at a narrow American strategy isn't where it's at."  Persuading tradition-bound Japanese retailers to get involved in the turmoils of the U.S. retailing industry isn't likely to be so easy, analysts say.  Up until now, most stores have followed the same basic overseas strategy: First they set up overseas merchandising offices to import items and track new fashion trends.  Then they opened small gift shops mostly aimed at Japanese tourists.  Reluctant to advance further on their own, some stores have settled for tie-ups with famous specialty shops.  Last March, Isetan invested 1.5 billion yen ($10.6 million) in a venture with Barney's Inc., an up-scale New York specialty clothier.  The first Barney's shop is scheduled to open in Japan next year.  And Mitsukoshi recently increased its equity stake in Tiffany & Co. to 13%.  Through the longstanding relationship between the two companies, Mitsukoshi has opened 22 Tiffany shops in its stores and arcades in Japan.  Plans are under way to open a Tiffany's in Hawaii to cater to Japanese tourists; it will be run mostly by Mitsukoshi.  Some industry observers say that Mitsukoshi's classy image makes it a possible match for Saks Fifth Avenue.  Company officials say they are studying various proposals but won't discuss details.  Takashimaya Co., Japan's oldest department store, is another name that keeps popping up as a potential fit with Saks.  Eiji Nakazato, a Takashimaya general manager, admits that his company's image is similar to Saks's and that there is some interest in the idea.  But he stops there.  "We'd like to do business in America," he says.  "But it looks tough."  ---  Marcus W. Brauchli contributed to this article.  THE VATICAN'S DEFICIT  The Vatican was in the red last year.  It said the regular 1988 deficit amounted to $43.5 million, based on revenue of $74.4 million and expenses of $117.9 million.  But it said extraordinary expenditures for its radio station and restoration of buildings increased the deficit to $57.2 million.  A statement from the council of cardinals said Catholics had responded generously to an appeal last year to give more money after 1987's record $63 million deficit.  The statement said a 5% jump in the "Peter's Pence" collection -- the annual offering from Catholics to the pope -- helped cover the deficit.  Council member Cardinal Gerald Carter of Toronto told Vatican Radio: "Now that we say we covered our deficit this year, people are going to relax and say well that's fine, the Holy See is out of the hole.  But we're . . . going to be in the exact same situation next year."  NIXON TO VISIT CHINA  Former President Richard Nixon is to visit China at the invitation of the government beginning Saturday, the Foreign Ministry announced.  According to Mr. Nixon's office, "This is solely a fact-finding trip.  There will be no sightseeing, no shopping and no social events."  Mr. Nixon's office said the former president "expects to have one-on-one discussions with the major Chinese leaders" and will give his assessment of those leaders to President Bush upon his return.  A POLL ON NATO  A poll conducted in 12 of 16 NATO countries shows that the Dutch appear to be the strongest supporters of the alliance.  The poll, conducted for the Dutch daily De Telegraaf by Gallup International said 81% of Dutch people supported NATO. Canada was the second most pro-NATO country with 78% supporting the alliance, followed by the U.S. with 75%, Britain with 71%, Belgium with 69% and West Germany with 63%.  All other countries registered support below 50%.  PASTA CONTROVERSY  The Israeli Manufacturers' Association filed a police complaint against an Arab pasta maker for using the four colors of the outlawed Palestinian flag on spaghetti packages.  "We asked police to investigate why they are allowed to distribute the flag in this way.  It should be considered against the law," said Danny Leish, a spokesman for the association.  The spaghetti is made by the Al Ghazel Macaroni Co. in Bethlehem and is marketed in a package decorated with green, black, red and white stripes.  BRITISH FRAUD  British postal authorities say they have uncovered a large-scale scheme where unscrupulous stamp dealers chemically removed stamp cancellations, regummed the stamps and sold them to U.S. collectors or, in large lots, to British businesses.  The scheme allegedly cost the post office #10 million ($16.1) in revenue in the past 12 months.  Dealers bought the used stamps cheaply from charities, including the Guide Dogs for the Blind Association.  The charities regularly sell used stamps, which they collect from children and other donors, to raise funds.  A GIFT FOR SAN FRANCISCO  Akio Tanii, president of Japan's Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., presented the U.S. consul general in Osaka with a $1 million check to help San Francisco's earthquake victims.  The company's U.S. subsidiary, Matsushita Electric Corp. of America, had donated over $35,000 worth of Matsushita-made flashlights and batteries to residents shortly after the disaster, a company spokesman said.  Several other Japanese companies and regional governments have sent aid to San Francisco.  Sumitomo Bank donated $500,000, Tokyo prefecture $15,000 and the city of Osaka $10,000.  CANTON'S TRADE FAIR  Chinese officials are trying to use the Canton Trade Fair to lure back overseas traders after the bloody crackdown on dissent.  But attendance is down from previous years.  What's more, a Hong Kong textile trader says, some Chinese exporters from state-run enterprises are protesting the crackdown by dragging their feet on soliciting new business.  "They are angry about the government . . . so they hold back the goods," he said.  This autumn's edition of the biannual fair will run through Oct. 31.  Inside the 156,000-square-yard glass exhibition complex, products ranging from clothing to AK-47 machine guns are on display.  Fair officials say that 21,000 guests visited during the first five days, a 10% drop from the spring exhibition.  But China's official Xinhua News Agency reported that the number of foreign businessmen was greater than the previous fair -- without providing statistics.  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  In another sign of glasnost, Alexander Solzhenitsyn's long-banned chronicle of Soviet repression, "The Gulag Archipelago," is now recommended reading in one 11th-grade Moscow history class. . . .  British customs officers said they'd arrested eight men sneaking 111 rare snakes into Britain -- including one man who strapped a pair of boa constrictors under his armpits.  A customs official said the arrests followed a "Snake Day" at Utrecht University in the Netherlands, an event used by some collectors as an opportunity to obtain rare snakes.  Di Giorgio Corp. said it's continuing talks with potential buyers of certain units, but has reached no agreement on any deals.  Di Giorgio, a food wholesaler and building products maker, is seeking alternatives to an unsolicited $32-a-share tender offer of DIG Acquisition Corp., a unit of Rose Partners Limited Partnership.  DIG is the vehicle being used to pursue to acquisition.  Robert Mellor, Di Giorgio's executive vice president, said the company stands to reap more money through the sale of individual units to others than by accepting DIG's offer.  Some lousy earnings reports whacked the stock market, but bond prices fell only slightly and the dollar rose a little against most major currencies.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average tumbled 39.55 points, to 2613.73, in active trading.  Long-term Treasury bonds ended slightly higher.  The dollar rose modestly against the mark and the yen, but soared against the pound following the resignation of Britain's chancellor of the Exchequer, Nigel Lawson.  Analysts have complained that third-quarter corporate earnings haven't been very good, but the effect hit home particularly hard yesterday.  Compaq Computer nose-dived $8.625 a share, to $100, and pulled other technology issues lower after reporting lower-than-expected earnings after the stock market closed Wednesday.  Later yesterday the nation's major auto makers added to the gloom when they each reported their core auto operations were net losers in the third quarter.  The less-than-robust third-quarter results came amid renewed concern about the volatility of stock prices and the role of computer-aided program trading.  Taken together, the worries prompted a broad sell-off of stocks.  The number of stocks on the New York Stock Exchange that fell in price yesterday exceeded 1,000, a key measure of underlying sentiment among technical analysts.  Although the government said the economy grew an estimated 2.5% in the third quarter, in line with expectations, analysts are increasingly predicting much more sluggish growth -- and therefore more corporate earnings disappointments -- for the fourth quarter.  "There are a lot more downward revisions of earnings forecasts than upward revisions," said Abby Joseph Cohen, a market strategist at Drexel Burnham Lambert.  "People are questioning corporate profits as a pillar of support for the equity market."  The bond market was unmoved by the economic statistics.  While bond investors would have preferred growth to be a little slower, they were cheered by inflation measures in the data that showed prices rising at a modest annual rate of 2.9%.  That is another small encouragement for the Federal Reserve to lower interest rates in coming weeks, they reasoned.  In major market activity:  Stock prices fell sharply in active trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 175.2 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board outstripped gainers 1,141 to 406.  Bond prices were barely higher.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year rose fractionally.  Yield on the issue was 7.88%.  The dollar rose modestly against most major currencies.  In late New York trading the dollar was at 1.8400 marks and 142.10 yen compared with 1.8353 marks and 141.52 yen Wednesday.  The dollar soared against the pound, which was at $1.5765 compared with $1.6145 Wednesday.  The House joined the Senate in making federal reparations for Japanese-Americans held in World War II internment camps a legal entitlement requiring the Treasury Department to meet expedited payments of an estimated $1.25 billion during the next several years.  The 249-166 roll call came as the chamber approved a compromise bill allocating $17.2 billion to the departments of State, Justice, and Commerce in fiscal 1990 and imposing increased fees on business interests making filings with the government.  An estimated $40 million would come annually from a new $20,000 charge on pre-merger notifications to the Justice Department, and Securities and Exchange Commission filing fees would rise by 25% to fund a $26 million increase in the agency's budget.  Yesterday's vote on Japanese-American reparations ensures final enactment of the entitlement provision, which abandons earlier efforts to find offsetting cuts but is seen as a more realistic path to expediting compensation first authorized in 1988.  "The only way to reduce the costs is to say we don't want to pay the bill," said Rep. Neal Smith (D., Iowa), who taunted President Bush's party to back up his campaign promise of supporting the claims of $20,000 per individual.  "Read my lips," said Mr. Smith.  "If you're for paying the claims . . .  I don't know how anyone can oppose this."  No payments would be made this year, but beginning in fiscal 1991, the bill commits the government to annual payments of as much as $500 million until the total liability of $1.25 billion is met.  The issue has assumed some of the character of past civil-rights debates and reopens old regional divisions in the Democratic majority.  As much as Republicans led the opposition, among the 53 Democrats voting against treating the payments as an entitlement, 42 came from the 13 states in the Old Dixiecrat South and its borders.  The odd mix of departments in the underlying bill makes it one of the more eclectic of the annual appropriations measures, and it is a lightning rod for a running battle over the fate of the Legal Services Corp.  The measure provides $321 million to maintain services but would sharply curb the power of the current board until successors are agreed to by the Bush administration.  The conservative bent of the incumbent appointees, named by former President Reagan, has divided Republicans.  And on back-to-back roll calls, 206-199 and 223-178, the Appropriations Committee leadership turned back efforts to weaken or strip the proposed restrictions first added by Sen. Warren Rudman (R., N.H.)  The estimated $40 million from the new pre-merger notification fee would be divided between the Justice Department's Antitrust Division and the Federal Trade Commission, which both face serious cuts if the income isn't realized.  The Federal Bureau of Investigation is slated to receive $30 million by charging for fingerprint services in civil cases, and the judiciary will rely on another $32 million from bankruptcy charges, including a 33% increase in the current filing fee.  The $17.2 billion total for the bill doesn't include an estimated $1.2 billion in supplemental anti-drug funds approved by the House-Senate conference yesterday, and the rush of money is already provoking jealousy among states competing for assistance.  The House agreed to defer for a year a scheduled 50% increase in the required state matching funds for law-enforcement grants but, by a 287-123 margin, the chamber stripped a Senate initiative to raise the minimum grant for smaller states, such as New Hampshire and Delaware, to $1.6 million from $500,000.  Few are more powerful in the competition for funds than the appropriations committees themselves -- including the three authors of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit-reduction law.  When a House-Senate conference on yesterday's bill rescinded $11.8 million in unexpended funds for a Fort Worth, Texas, economic development project backed by former Speaker James Wright, Sen. Phil Gramm (R., Texas) insisted last week that the money be preserved.  The measure includes $2 million secured by Mr. Rudman for a marine-research project at the University of New Hampshire, and Sen. Ernest Hollings (D., S.C.) used his power to add $10 million for an advanced technology initiative in the Commerce Department.  This was in addition to a more parochial $4.5 million authorization for a health center in South Carolina upheld by a 273-121 vote in the House last night.  The Big Three U.S. auto makers posted losses in their core North American automotive businesses for the third quarter, and expectations of continued slow vehicle sales and price wars are casting a pall over the fourth period.  The strongest sign of the Big Three's woes came from Ford Motor Co., which said it had a loss in its U.S. automotive business for the first time since 1982.  Ford predicted fourth-quarter net income will fall below the year-earlier level, partly because of a likely $500 million charge from the sale of its steel operations.  The bleak automotive results were offset by strong earnings from some non-automotive operations.  Still, the combined profit of Ford, Chrysler Corp. and General Motors Corp. fell 44% to $1.02 billion from $1.83 billion a year earlier, excluding a one-time gain of $309 million at Chrysler from the sale of Mitsubishi Motors Corp. stock.  The last time all three companies reported North American automotive losses was in the recession year of 1982.  Yesterday's announcements helped spark a midday wave of program selling in the stock market.  GM's common closed at $44.375 a share, down 50 cents, Ford fell 37.5 cents to end at $47.50, and Chrysler eased 37.5 cents to $22.25, all in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The market's pessimism reflects the gloomy outlook in Detroit.  As Japanese auto makers gained market share, the Big Three, with GM in the lead, slashed North American production and launched a retail discounting blitz.  The price war peaked in the third quarter as Big Three factory discounts climbed to more than $1,000 a vehicle, according to industry officials.  GM probably had the "heaviest incentives," said Robert S. Miller, Chrysler's chief financial officer.  "We all did what we had to do to stay within sight of them."  But the costly efforts did little to slow Japanese market gains, and domestic car sales have plunged 19% since the Big Three ended many of their programs Sept. 30.  GM, Ford and Chrysler have already cut fourth-quarter U.S. output plans an estimated 15% from 1988 levels.  If sales don't pick up, the cuts will go deeper and incentives will sprout again.  Ford, which has long boasted of its ability to weather a downturn, saw earnings take a beating.  The No. 2 auto maker blamed incentive costs and reduced production -- both the result of a substantially weaker U.S. market -- for a 44% drop in net to $477.1 million, or $1.03 a share, on revenue of $20.24 billion.  Nearly all the decline came in Ford's U.S. automotive operations.  The Dearborn, Mich., auto maker ran a loss of $37 million on assembling and marketing cars in the U.S., a deterioration of $378 million in that line from the 1988 quarter.  Ford managed to show a profit for the quarter primarily because of earnings from overseas auto operations and financial services.  A year earlier, Ford reported record net of $856.3 million, or $1.78 a share, on revenue of $20.38 billion.  In the latest nine months, Ford earned $3.52 billion, or $7.51 a share, compared with $4.14 billion, or $8.53 a share.  The U.S. automotive loss was a sharp reversal for a company that had reeled off 12 consecutive quarters of improved earnings until the 1989 second quarter.  But David N. McCammon, vice president, finance, insisted that cost-cutting and tight production capacity will make results "better in this downturn than in prior downturns," when Ford had net losses.  Still, Mr. McCammon said Ford expects the U.S. economy to weaken through the end of 1990, causing weaker sales and production.  As a result, fourth-quarter profit will come in below 1988 results, although the drop won't be as sharp as the 44% third-quarter decline, he said.  Part of the drop will come from an anticipated charge of as much as $500 million from the proposed sale of its Rouge Steel unit.  In the 1988 fourth quarter, Ford had net of $1.16 billion, or $2.42 a share.  Chrysler's operating profit fell to a scant $22 million, or 10 cents a share, its lowest quarterly total in seven years.  Its $309 million, or $1.32 a share, gain from the sale of 75 million Mitsubishi shares made net $331 million, or $1.42 a share.  Sales were flat at $7.88 billion.  The results include record quarterly earnings of $76 million from Chrysler Financial Corp.  A year earlier, Chrysler's net was $113 million, or 50 cents a share.  Mr. Miller said costs of incentives caused a "moderate" loss in the Highland Park, Mich., company's North American car and truck business.  He said the loss wasn't "that much different" from Ford's $37 million loss on U.S. automotive operations, but he declined to be specific.  Mr. Miller said Chrysler spent an average of $1,000 a vehicle on its incentive programs in the third quarter, compared with about $450 a vehicle a year earlier -- a "high-water mark" at the time.  He said Chrysler "is no longer sure" of its forecast for industry car and truck sales of 14.2 million in the 1990 model year.  Consumers, he said, are balking at higher prices on 1990 cars, especially after seeing the incentive-reduced prices on 1989 models.  In the nine months, net was $1.02 billion, or $4.38 a share, including the gain from the Mitsubishi stock sale, compared with $617 million, or $2.77 a share, after a charge of $93 million, or 42 cents a share, for plant closings in the 1988 period.  Sales rose 8.4% to $27.95 billion from $25.78 billion.  Heavy losses in North American auto operations sent GM's net tumbling to $516.9 million from a record $859.2 million.  Detroit-based GM doesn't issue separate quarterly earnings for the North American automotive business.  But analysts estimated that GM had a loss of as much as $300 million on domestic vehicle operations.  An 8.5% drop in North American factory sales of cars and trucks cut into revenue, and rebates to dealers and customers more than offset gains from price increases on 1990 model vehicles delivered during the period, a GM spokesman said.  But GM's results also illustrate the increasing diversity of its operations.  In one breakdown, GM attributed half of its net to its two big technology units, Electronic Data Systems Corp. and GM Hughes Electronics Corp. Meanwhile, GM said overseas auto operations are on track to exceed last year's record full-year net of $2.7 billion.  The diversified operations helped GM build its cash reserves, exclusive of its financial subsidiary, to $5.5 billion as of Sept. 30, a 22% increase from a year earlier.  This cushion could come in handy if GM has to trim fourth-quarter North American production schedules more than the already scheduled 9.5%.  Under the circumstances, it won't be easy for GM to exceed its record 1988 fourth-quarter net of $1.4 billion, the spokesman acknowledged.  That means it's unlikely the company will surpass last year's $4.9 billion full-year profit, even though net for the first nine months was up 1.9% to $3.52 billion on revenue of $95.57 billion.  It earned $3.46 billion on revenue of $91.21 billion in the 1988 nine months.  ---  @ Softer Auto Earnings  @ Third quarter earnings suffer as Big Three U.S. production slides  @ Big Three Share of Total U.S.  @ Third Quarter Vehicle Production  @ 1987 91.8%  @ 1988 91.5  @ 1989 87.7  @ Big Three Third Quarter Earnings  @ In millions of dollars  @ 1987 1988 1989  @ General Motors $812.3 $859.2 $516.9  @ Ford 703.0 856.0 477.0  @ Chrysler 246.0 112.5 22.0*  @ *All figures are net income except Chrysler 1989, which represents income before $309 million after-tax gain from sale of stock  There are two versions of "Measure for Measure" on stage at the Alley Theater here.  One is a strong, vigorous portrayal of Shakespeare's play; the other is director Gregory Boyd's overlay of present-day punk rock decadence on old Vienna.  "Measure for Measure" is one of Shakespeare's "problem" plays, so named because it does not fit neatly into a category such as tragedy, comedy or history.  Its ambiguity and uneasy mixture of the serious and the comic is no doubt one reason why it is very much in vogue with directors just now.  Last season, Hartford Stage director Mark Lamos mounted a production at Lincoln Center, and currently two other productions -- one just closed at the Old Globe in San Diego and another now at the Seattle Rep -- overlap with Mr. Boyd's.  In the play, the Duke of Vienna despairs over the licentiousness of his subjects and turns over the rule of the city to the puritanical Angelo, hoping he can set things right.  When Angelo hears that the young man Claudio has made his fiancee pregnant before he could marry her, Angelo summarily condemns Claudio to death.  When, however, Claudio's sister, Isabella, a novitiate in a convent, goes to Angelo to plead her brother's case, the obdurate ruler immediately falls in love with her and, in a supreme act of hypocrisy, demands that Isabella yield up her virtue to him in exchange for her brother's life.  Meanwhile, the Duke, who set the original scheme in motion, appears on the scene disguised as a friar and becomes involved in a series of intrigues that has everyone fearing the worst possible outcome until the Duke arranges a last minute reprieve for all concerned.  For the Alley production, scene designer Peter David Gould has arranged a stark but extremely effective set featuring a rectangular platform of white-washed boards that extends into the audience.  When the action requires, a prison cell, consisting of an enlarged wire cage, rolls forward on iron wheels on the platform.  In the play's major scenes Mr. Boyd demonstrates that he has a firm grasp of the Shakespearean dynamic.  When Isabella (Ellen Lauren) confronts her brother Claudio (Matt Loney) in his cell, explaining the price she has been asked to secure his freedom; when Isabella and the disguised Duke (Philip Kerr) conspire to trick Angelo; and when Mariana (Annalee Jefferies), a woman wronged by Angelo, confronts him with his past misdeeds, the performers bring the dramatic high points to life with intense energy and intelligence.  At such moments Mr. Boyd makes it clear that he has the capacity to be a superior interpreter of Shakespeare.  When, however, he decides to be modern, or more accurately, when he decides to be trendy, the results are far less satisfactory.  Mr. Boyd is of the directorial school that believes one must find modern parallels or metaphors to make Shakespeare accessible to today's audiences.  It's a valid approach, but it puts a heavy burden on the director to show an uncommon degree of imagination and taste.  In his "Measure," Mr. Boyd has "modernized" the pimps and prostitutes of Vienna whom Angelo is supposed to bring under control by converting them into transvestites, punk rockers and heavy metal types, with a strong emphasis on leather, chains and porno-inspired costumes.  Loud rock music accompanies all the scene changes, even those in the convent.  When Claudio is arrested, he is brought on stage nude except for the manacles on his wrists and ankles.  When the opportunist Lucio (Jack Stehlin) visits the convent to inform Isabella of her brother's fate, Lucio not only slaps the mother superior on her rear, but brings along a voluptuous companion (Jill Powell), not in Shakespeare's script, to undulate lasciviously.  Meanwhile, the pimp Pompey (Glen Allen Pruett), dressed in black leather and a prominent codpiece, indulges in enough obscene gestures and pelvic thrusts to launch a space probe.  The problem here is not in the concept but in its lack of discrimination.  The inclusion at one point, for example, of a list of glitzy modern-day malefactors, ranging from Jim Bakker and Leona Helmsley to Zsa Zsa Gabor, is a bid for a cheap laugh unworthy of Mr. Boyd's ability.  Despite the excesses, however, the scorecard for the production has many more pluses than minuses.  What's more, it represents an important step for the Alley Theater.  "Measure for Measure" is Mr. Boyd's first directorial assignment as the theater's new artistic director.  He succeeded Pat Brown, who was fired by the Alley board 18 months ago.  Her dismissal angered many in the regional theater establishment and led Peter Zeisler, head of Theatre Communications Group, to write an editorial in American Theatre magazine condemning the board.  None of this backlash could change the fact that Ms. Brown's regime was remarkably undistinguished and unimaginative.  Now the Alley has moved ahead on both artistic and financial fronts.  Not only is Mr. Boyd giving the theater a new sense of adventure and excitement on stage, the balance sheet is the best the theater has had in 10 years.  As opposed to the $1.4 million deficit of the 1987-88 season, the 1988-89 year concluded with a $200,000 surplus and a $500,000 cash reserve.  Admittedly last season's runaway hit, "Steel Magnolias," helped a lot, but so did cost cutting and other measures insisted on by the board.  Only time will tell if Mr. Boyd can restore to the Alley the acclaim it received when its founder, Nina Vance, was at the height of her powers.  But it is clear he is going to give it a shot.  Democratic leaders have bottled up President Bush's capital-gains tax cut in the Senate and may be able to prevent a vote on the issue indefinitely.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell (D., Maine) said he intends to use Senate procedures to force advocates of the tax cut to come up with at least 60 votes before they can address the issue.  And neither Democrats nor Republicans are predicting that the capital-gains forces can produce enough votes.  "The 60-vote requirement will be there and they don't have the 60 votes," Sen. Mitchell said.  "They don't have the votes to get it passed."  Sen. Bob Packwood (R., Ore.), the leading Republican proponent of the tax cut, didn't disagree.  "I'm not sure what's going to happen," he said.  Previously he had said he would be able to find the requisite 60 votes eventually.  Sen. Packwood has offered his capital-gains-cut package as an amendment to a bill, now pending in the Senate, that would authorize aid to Poland and Hungary.  Democrats are holding up a vote on the amendment by threatening a filibuster, or extended debate.  For a cloture vote to stop the filibuster, Republicans must muster at least 60 votes.  Yesterday, Sen. Packwood acknowledged, "We don't have the votes for cloture today."  The Republicans show no sign of relenting.  GOP leaders continued to press for a vote on the amendment to the Eastern Europe aid measure.  And they threatened to try to amend any other revenue bill in the Senate with the capital-gains provision.  "This is serious business; we're serious about a capital-gains reduction," said Kansas Sen. Robert Dole, the Senate's Republican leader.  "The strategy is `Let's vote.' "  The Republicans contend that they can garner a majority in the 100-member Senate for a capital-gains tax cut.  They accuse the Democrats of unfairly using Senate rules to erect a 60-vote hurdle.  Democrats counter that the Republicans have often used the same rules to suit their own ends.  The two sides also traded accusations about the cost of the Packwood plan.  Democrats asserted that the proposal, which also would create a new type of individual retirement account, was fraught with budget gimmickry that would lose billions of dollars in the long run.  Republicans countered that long-range revenue estimates were unreliable.  The Packwood proposal would reduce the tax depending on how long an asset was held.  It also would create a new IRA that would shield from taxation the appreciation on investments made for a wide variety of purposes, including retirement, medical expenses, first-home purchases and tuition.  A White House spokesman said President Bush is "generally supportive" of the Packwood plan.  The World Bank approved $363 million in loans to the Ivory Coast and Brazil.  The Ivory Coast will get two loans totaling $216 million to support agricultural reforms and help finance municipal development in more than 30 cities.  Brazil will get two loans amounting to $147 million for schools, roads and other projects in urban areas and to help finance agricultural research projects in the Amazon and northeastern regions of the country.  The loans will be at variable interest rates, currently 7.74% a year.  Quantum Chemical Corp. suspended its cash dividend until at least April, saying it would pay stock dividends instead.  The move came as the company, hurt by falling plastics prices and two fires at an important plant, reported a third-quarter loss of $21.4 million, or 86 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, the New York-based maker of commodity plastics reported earnings from continuing operations of $94.7 million, or $3.72 a share.  Profits from discontinued operations made year-ago net $99.8 million, or $3.92 a share.  As partial compensation to its shareholders, who received a special $50-a-share cash dividend earlier this year, Quantum declared a 1% stock dividend payable Dec. 1 to stock of record Nov. 10.  The company said it suspended the cash dividend because of a covenant with some of its bondholders that limits payouts to 50% of retained operating profit from Jan. 1, 1989.  For the nine months, the company has already paid $2.25 a share of dividends on operating earnings of $3.87 a share.  While an exception could have been made, the company said, it would only have postponed the suspension.  "Why not bite the bullet?" said a spokesman for the company.  As previously reported, Quantum has been hurt by a drop of 20% to 30% in prices for polyethylene, a basic ingredient used to make such products as garbage bags, milk jugs, meat packaging and toys.  Sales from continuing operations fell sharply to $557.7 million from $724.4 million in the year-earlier quarter.  For the nine months, sales fell slightly to $2.04 billion from $2.11 billion.  Although Quantum has captured about a 20% share of the U.S. polyethylene market, it is more vulnerable to price swings than some of its bigger rivals, including Dow Chemical Co. and Union Carbide Corp., which have much broader business bases.  In addition, two devastating fires at Quantum's chemical complex in Morris, Ill., caused an estimated loss of $22 million, or 89 cents a share, in the third quarter.  The plant, which filled about 25% of the company's ethylene needs and represented about 25% of its polyethylene capacity, won't be back on line until early 1991.  Until then, secondary plants that depend on products made at Morris will operate at reduced capacity.  A further hit came from expenses connected with Quantum's joint acquisition in August of Petrolane Inc., a propane distributor.  Nonrecurring charges from the bridge loan and other purchase expenses cost the company $17.9 million, or 79 cents a share, for the quarter.  Moreover, Quantum is still in the midst of a three-year plant expansion program valued at about $1.3 billion that will continue to put pressure on its cash flow and earnings.  Despite the hammering, Quantum said it may restore the cash dividend at its April 26 board meeting.  If not, the company says it will pay 2% stock dividends on a semiannual basis until its cash situation improves.  Investors seemed ambivalent about Quantum's prospects.  Several brokerage firms issued buy recommendations on the stock yesterday.  In active trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Quantum's shares closed at $33.25, down $1.50.  Just when it looked like the Nasdaq over-the-counter market might be firming, nervous investors dumped shares of the biggest nonfinancial issues and sent the market tumbling.  Because of the heavy selling of such large stocks as Intel, Oracle Systems, Apple Computer, Microsoft and Lotus Development, the Nasdaq Composite Index slumped 4.74, or 1%, to 458.15.  Those stocks and other industrial issues are part of the Nasdaq 100 Index, which plunged 8.12, or 1.8%, to 444.11.  By comparison, the New York Stock Exchange Composite fell 1%; the Dow Jones Industrial Average slid 1.5% and the S&P 500 Index dropped 1%.  Every Nasdaq industry index was lower.  The Utility Index, which includes Tele-Communications, MCI Communications and LIN Broadcasting, plummeted 9.55 to 734.41.  All three of those stocks declined.  Industrial stocks fell 5.80 to 444.19 and transportation issues slid 4.03 to 478.28.  The Other Finance Index -- the barometer of regional banking, real-estate-investment and brokerage issues, dropped 2.58 to 536.94.  The index of small commercial banks was down 2.54 to 440.99 and the index of insurance stocks eased 0.84 to 536.04.  The Nasdaq Financial Index of the 100 largest stocks in the group lost 2.11 to 452.75.  "The market felt sloppy.  I didn't see any buying at all," said William Sulya, head OTC trader at A.G. Edwards & Sons in St. Louis.  Mr. Sulya also noted that volume was tepid, totaling only 128.7 million shares.  "We were down and it was quiet on top of it.  Those are two nails in a trader's coffin," he commented.  Some traders complained that OTC market makers are becoming more risk-averse because of the recent volatility.  Tony Cecin, managing director of equity trading at Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood in Minneapolis, said the overall OTC market is drifting lower in part because "nobody has the nerve to make a bid for anything," he said.  Mostly in response to news from bellwether Compaq Computer, the OTC market's technology stocks were battered all day.  Compaq's quarterly earnings were at the low end of analysts' forecasts, and the company said it is experiencing problems with a new microchip from Intel.  Intel confirmed the Compaq report, but said the problems aren't expected to affect most users, except in "certain scientific applications."  Intel said it has more than 200 customers using the chip.  Nevertheless, Intel dropped 7/8 to 32 on 3.6 million shares.  Other computer stocks caught in the fallout included Apple, which fell 1 1/4 to 45 1/4.  Oracle Systems dropped 1 to 24 5/8.  Microsoft tumbled 2 to 77 3/4 and Lotus Development was off 1 5/8 to 30 5/8.  Sun Microsystems eased 5/8 to 17 1/8, despite better-than-expected fiscal first-quarter earnings.  Yesterday, Sun reported net income of seven cents a share, compared with 26 cents a share a year earlier.  But the report was better than the flat earnings the company had projected this summer, after reporting a loss for its fiscal fourth quarter.  Also, Sun's sales in its first quarter, ended Sept. 29, were up 39% from the year-earlier period.  MCI lost 1/4 to 42 3/4.  In response to a similar lawsuit by MCI filed earlier, American Telephone & Telegraph sued its competitor for misleading advertising.  Jaguar fell 5/8 to 11.  General Motors said it is seeking clearance to buy as much as 15% of the company.  On Wednesday, Ford Motor said it had already bought 12.45% of the British company's shares and may bid for the rest.  Yesterday, Ford said it won't enter an unlimited bidding war with GM for Jaguar's shares.  Buffets slid 1 to 14 after reporting third-quarter earnings of 17 cents a share, one cent below the low end of analysts' estimates.  The company earned 14 cents a share in the year-earlier period.  Chartwell Group plunged 1 1/2 to 1 1/2 after estimating that it had a loss of about $3.2 million in the latest third quarter, before a $5,350,000 addition to loss reserves.  The company also said it wouldn't make the semiannual interest payment on its $40 million of 7% convertible subordinated debentures by the Nov. 1 due date or within the grace period.  It blamed softness in the interior-furnishings industry for its financial troubles.  Astec Industries tumbled 2 1/8 to 9 7/8 after it reported a $2.4 million loss in the latest third quarter, compared with net income of more than $1 million a year earlier.  The paving-equipment maker said the loss was caused by bad weather, which had hurt sales in its Barber-Greene Co. and Telsmith Inc. units.  Foremost Corp. of America surged 2 1/8 to 36 1/2.  The company's third-quarter net income rose to eight cents a share from five cents a share the year before.  The mobile-home insurer said Hurricane Hugo cost it 80 cents a share in the latest quarter.  Charter One Financial Inc., a bank holding company, expects to report that third-quarter net income jumped 30% to $4.5 million, Charles John Koch, president and chief executive officer, said.  On a per-share basis, earnings are estimated at 64 cents to 66 cents.  In the year-ago quarter, Charter One earned $3.4 million, or 51 cents a share.  Last year's figures have been restated to reflect the August 1989 mergers of Western Reserve Savings Bank in Cleveland and First Federal Savings of Akron with Charter One.  In connection with the mergers, Charter One issued 1,063,946 common shares.  The company currently has 6.6 million shares outstanding.  In an interview, the chief executive attributed the improved results to strength in its core operations, as well as higher volume of loans and fee income, especially relating to tax-deferred annuities.  He noted that Charter One also had a more profitable loan mix, with gains in both consumer and commercial loans.  The thrift's largest loan category is residential mortgages.  Because of the mergers, the company had $750,000 in nonrecurring expenses in the latest quarter.  Those expenses, however, were offset by a gain of about $1.7 million on the sale of 35,000 shares of Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.  The company retains 421,000 shares of Freddie Mac, but expects to continue to sell about 30,000 shares a quarter.  For the year, Mr. Koch said the company expects to earn $13 million, or $1.85 to $1.88 a share, up from a restated $9.5 million a year ago.  The company's book value as of Sept. 30 was $23.20 a share, up 17% from a year ago.  Mr. Koch said the increase was due in large part to the addition of the two thrifts.  Mr. Koch also said that Ohio's strong economy has helped Charter One, as well as other thrifts in the state.  In a year when scores of such institutions failed in Texas, Oklahoma, Arizona and other states, Mr. Koch said only a few of Ohio's 221 thrifts have failed.  "The institutions in Ohio that failed were primarily those that made loans outside of Ohio," he said.  "Those that have succeeded have continued to lend in local areas."  In addition to Cleveland and Akron, First Federal Savings also serves the Youngstown and Portsmouth areas and in Toledo operates under the name of People's Savings.  Investors ran away from the stock market yesterday, dumping many recently favored stocks as they fled.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 39.55 to 2613.73.  New York Stock Exchange volume rose to 175,240,000 shares from 155.6 million Wednesday.  Badly shaken by recent big swings in stock prices and the cloudy outlook for the economy, investors sold many of the consumer-oriented blue chips that were the market's star performers only a week ago.  Many of those issues-such as Philip Morris, Procter & Gamble and Merck -- are in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  Traders said investors were either raising cash or buying very selectively.  In a sign of just how nervous investors are, precious-metals stocks were among the best performers yesterday.  Compaq Computer's disappointing earnings report after the market closed Wednesday set the pace for the sell-off yesterday.  Compaq closed down 8 5/8 to 100 on 2.6 million shares.  Compaq, a highly sought stock only a few days ago, hit a record high of 112 1/2 on Oct. 19.  Third-quarter earnings were on the low end of analysts' forecasts, and the company disclosed that it had uncovered two technical flaws in Intel's new microprocessor, which could cause delays in shipments of some new Compaq products.  Intel dropped 7/8 to 32 in over-the-counter trading.  "When you see what happened to Compaq, it is completely (numbing) for the mentality of the market," said Jack Solomon, technical analyst for Bear Stearns.  "It is hard for the mind to digest that what was the leading stock is now the one leading you down the tubes."  Investors took little comfort in yesterday's report that third-quarter gross national product grew at a 2.5% annual rate.  Though that growth was in line with expectations, investors focused on signs of a slowdown: a buildup in inventories and dubious strength in consumer spending.  Futures-related selling pushed the industrial average about 45 points lower in the morning as rumors about RJR Nabisco's pending sale of its Del Monte foods unit spread through the trading pits in Chicago.  The purchase of Del Monte is likely to be financed with junk bonds or a bridge loan.  The stock market has had a heightened concern about turmoil with high-risk financing ever since Campeau Corp. nearly missed an interest payment on its junk bonds in September.  While futures-related sell programs depressed prices at first, buy programs pared the industrial average's losses later in the session.  However, Donald Selkin, head of futures research at Prudential-Bache Securities, said that the stock market appears to be poised for a round of futures-related selling this morning, given the discrepancies between futures and stocks at the close.  The New York Stock Exchange started trading its new "basket" product yesterday, with which institutions can buy and sell all the stocks in the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index in one trade.  About $45 million of stock traded through the basket.  In a sign of the credit needs among market makers during the 190-point plunge on Oct. 13, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York said yesterday that loans by New York's nine largest banks for the financing of securities positions rose $786 million, to $6.6 billion during the week ending Oct. 18.  Among other computer stocks, International Business Machines fell 1 1/8 to 100 3/4 on 1.7 million shares, Digital Equipment droped 2 1/4 to 88 and Unisys lost 1/2 to 17.  Also, Tandem Computers lost 1 to 24 7/8 even though earnings for the September quarter were in line with expectations.  Semiconductor issues slumped as well; Texas Instruments dropped 1 to 31 1/2, Motorola fell 5/8 to 55 1/4 and Cypress Semiconductor lost 1/2 to 12 1/4.  Anheuser-Busch slid 1/2 to 38 and led the Big Board's list of most active issues as 4.3 million shares were traded.  The stock had plunged 4 3/8 Wednesday on the news of third-quarter earnings weakness and its discounting strategy, which it expects to affect results through the end of 1990.  Philip Morris fell 1 7/8 to 41 5/8 on 3.7 million shares, reflecting the possibility that Anheuser-Busch's decision could have a negative impact on results at its Miller Brewing unit.  Other consumer stocks coming under selling pressure included Procter & Gamble, which went down 3 1/4 to 126 3/4; Coca-Cola Co., down 1 3/8 to 71 1/8, McDonald's, down 1/4 to 31 1/4; PepsiCo, off 1 to 60 3/8, and Merck, down 1 1/2 to 76 3/4.  Auto stocks slumped as each of the nation's Big Three auto makers reported that third-quarter operating profits were down from 1988.  Ford Motor, which also said it expects results for the fourth quarter to be soft because of a slowdown in auto sales, dropped 3/8 to 47 1/2.  General Motors lost 1/2 to 44 3/8 and Chrysler slid 3/8 to 22 1/4.  Oil field-services issues were especially weak.  Shearson Lehman Hutton cut short-term investment ratings on Schlumberger, which went down 2 1/4 to 41 1/8; Halliburton, down 1 1/8 to 35 1/8; Dresser Industries, off 1 to 37 3/4, and Baker Hughes, down 3/4 to 21.  Precious-metals stocks, widely viewed as a safe investment haven in periods of uncertainty, posted solid gains.  Newmont Gold climbed 2 1/2 to 39, Battle Mountain Gold rose 1 to 16, Hecla Mining went up 5/8 to 13 3/8, Homestake Mining added 5/8 to 15 3/4 and ASA Ltd. rose 2 to 46.  Tandy fell 5/8 to 43 3/8 on 1.8 million shares, including a 1.5 million-share block that the company repurchased as part of an ongoing buy-back program.  The block equaled 1.7% of its shares outstanding.  Nipsco Industries, the owner of Northern Indiana Public Service, rose 1/2 to 17 7/8.  Its board authorized the repurchase of an additional 3.5 million common shares, or about 5% of its shares outstanding, under an ongoing buy-back program.  N.V. Philips, whose third-quarter net profit was up 41% from a year earlier, added 1/2 to 22 1/4.  Also, the company said it would file for an initial offering of a 20% stake in its Polygram unit, as expected.  Imperial Chemical Industries plunged 6 1/4 to 69 7/8.  The company's third-quarter pretax profit was 12% lower than the year-ago level and fell short of its expectations.  Quantum Chemical, which reported a loss for the third quarter, dropped 1 1/2 to 33 1/4.  The company also suspended payment of cash dividends on its common stock until at least next April; it plans to pay stock dividends instead.  Telerate, which said it is holding talks with Dow Jones about the latter's $18-a-share takeover offer, advanced 7/8 to 20 1/2.  Earlier this month, a special committee of Telerate's board rejected the bid as inadequate.  The American Stock Exchange Market Value Index fell 2.44 to 373.48.  Volume totaled 12,190,000 shares.  La Jolla Bancorp climbed 3 to 13.  Security Pacific signed a letter of intent to acquire the company in a stock swap valued at $15 a share.  Lawyers for former Housing and Urban Development Secretary Samuel Pierce say he again will refuse to answer questions from a congressional subcommittee investigating federal housing scandals.  In a letter to Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), chairman of the House Government Operations subcommittee on housing and employment, the lawyers said Mr. Pierce would invoke his Fifth Amendment protection against self-incrimination at hearings scheduled for today and Friday.  On Sept. 26, Mr. Pierce invoked the Fifth Amendment and refused to testify.  At that time, he said his lawyers hadn't been given enough time to prepare.  The letter sent yesterday to Mr. Lantos says Mr. Pierce "is concerned that there continues to be an atmosphere wherein he remains a target of the subcommittee's hearings."  In the letter, lawyers Paul Perito, Robert Plotkin and Inez Smith say they "hope that sometime in the near future the present level of tension may be reduced such that Mr. Pierce can reconsider his present position and testify under fair and mutually agreeable circumstances."  Accor S.A. of France withdrew from an agreement to acquire a 51% stake in Greetings Group Ltd., an Australian hotel operator.  A spokesman for Credit Lyonnais May Mellor Ltd., Accor's Australian financial adviser, said in a telephone interview that Accor "decided that the deal as originally structured wasn't suitable."  But negotiations are continuing and a new agreement might be reached next month, the spokesman added.  "Accor would still like to have a presence in Australia, and alternative arrangements are being considered," the spokesman said.  He wouldn't discuss any details of the new proposals.  In September, Accor entered into an option agreement with major shareholders of Greetings that would have given Accor a 51% stake through an issue of new shares.  Britain's Monopolies and Mergers Commission said the proposed #395 million ($637.7 million) acquisition of Tootal Group PLC by Coats Viyella PLC, a U.K. textile manufacturer, could go ahead pending certain conditions.  The commission said Coats must first dispose of its interest in Britain's domestic sewing thread industry and its shares in the Gutermann Group.  The panel was concerned that the merger of the two groups would damage competition in British markets for industrial and domestic sewing thread and clothing.  Coats has offered one ordinary Coats share and 400 pence in cash for every four shares in Tootal, which is the equivalent of 138.4 pence per share.  President Bush unveiled food-safety proposals that would significantly increase the penalties for the misuse of pesticides.  Under the plan, released at a White House briefing yesterday, the civil penalty for the illegal sale, distribution or commercial use of a pesticide would be raised to a maximum $25,000 a day for each violation.  Currently, the maximum civil fine is $5,000 a violation.  Criminal violations would be raised to felonies from misdemeanors.  At the same time, reporting requirements would be increased for farmers and others who use pesticides that have restricted uses.  The Environmental Protection Agency also would get greater inspection authority.  The package also contains proposals that would speed the removal of harmful pesticides from the market and would provide for the establishment of consistent "negligible risk" levels for pesticides in fresh and processed food.  Chemicals that posed risks greater than these levels generally would be barred, unless the EPA determined that other factors, such as the economic effect on consumers, outweighed the risk.  The proposals also are designed to bar states in most cases from setting more-stringent pesticide tolerance levels than the federal government sets.  Information released yesterday, however, indicates that states could seek waivers and set their own levels if special circumstances exist.  Prince, the rock star, is indecent, according to the Federal Communications Comission.  At least before 8 p.m.  The FCC proposed to fine KLUC-FM, in Las Vegas, $2,000 for playing the Prince song "Erotic City" on May 16, 1988, at 7:53 p.m. because the song is allegedly indecent.  By FCC standards, that means the song uses "patently offensive" terms to describe "sexual or excretory activities or organs."  "Erotic City," which was released as a single in 1984 and sold 250,000 copies, is certainly hot -- too hot for this newspaper to reproduce the lyrics.  Suffice it to say, the song uses a short word for sexual congress, and congress is in session a lot during the song.  An agent for Prince didn't return a telephone call seeking comment.  And KLUC, a part of Nationwide Communications Inc., couldn't be reached.  The Las Vegas telephone directory only lists KLUC's "Concert Hot Line" -- and no one answered the Hot Line at midday yesterday.  But the proposed fine is bound to be controversial.  For one thing, the FCC dismissed 51 complaints about indecency because the programs aired material after 8 p.m. -- only seven minutes after KLUC played "Erotic City."  The FCC now says 8 p.m. is the time that is all right to begin airing indecent material because children aren't likely listening in great numbers.  Earlier, the agency set the decency line at midnight, but an appeals court rejected that time as too restrictive.  "You have to draw some lines," said Robert Pettit, the FCC's general counsel.  Tom Chiusano, vice president and general manager of WXRK-FM in New York, said the FCC decision singling out KLUC seemed unfair because he estimated probably 500 radio stations have played "Erotic City."  But Mr. Chiusano has his own problems.  The FCC also sent WXRK a letter saying it believed one of its shows, the Howard Stern Show, contained indecent material.  The agency hasn't yet proposed a fine for WXRK.  But two years ago, when the agency began its crackdown on indecency, Mr. Stern's show, which features a lot of gross jokes, was one of the shows cited in the agency's first warning letters to broadcasters.  "Howard Stern doesn't broadcast indecent material," said Mr. Chiusano.  "He does four hours of contemporaneous humor."  So far the indecency crackdown has managed to offend both civil libertarians, who say the FCC has gone too far, and Congress, which says the FCC hasn't gone far enough.  Meanwhile the courts have rejected most of the FCC's plans, and the agency has been subject to constant ridicule.  One commissioner even proposed banning a reading of James Joyce's "Ulysses" until cooler heads prevailed.  But the agency hasn't given up.  In addition to citing the stations in New York and Las Vegas, the FCC proposed fining radio stations in Miami and Los Angeles for airing allegedly indecent material before 8 p.m.  In addition, the agency said it would begin a proceeding to see whether it was possible to find legal grounds for a ban on indecent programming around the clock.  RENAISSANCE INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT Inc. has standing agreements with several brokerage firms to execute block trades, and designates one of those firms as principal to handle each of those trades.  Yesterday's edition incorrectly said Renaissance solicits brokerage firms for the best price to carry out its trades.  (See: "Renaissance Said to Dip One Foot Into Stocks Again" -- WSJ Oct. 26, 1989)  McDonnell Douglas Corp. reported a 54% drop in third-quarter net income, but its Douglas Aircraft Co. subsidiary appears to be fixing some of its problems.  Douglas Aircraft completed a restructuring in the third quarter but clearly is still adjusting to the jolt.  The subsidiary posted a $3 million loss for the quarter, but that was after a one-time pretax gain of $25 million stemming from an insurance payment.  "They lost $28 million, but that is good news," said Jack Modzelewski, a PaineWebber Inc. analyst, who had expected Douglas's loss to be as much as $50 million.  In the second quarter, the subsidiary had a $158 million loss.  At least, Mr. Modzelewski said, "it's losing money at a decelerating rate."  Indeed, while investors weren't exactly gleeful, McDonnell Douglas held steady on the New York Stock Exchange, closing yesterday at $67.125 a share, unchanged.  McDonnell Douglas posted third-quarter net of $38 million, or 98 cents a share, down from $83 million, or $2.18 a share, a year earlier.  The latest results include an extraordinary gain of $6 million, or 14 cents a share, from the divestiture of the bulk of the company's information systems group.  In the year-earlier period, the company had a $4 million loss from discontinued operations.  Sales for the St. Louis-based aircraft and defense company rose 1.1% to $3.72 billion from $3.68 billion.  Besides the troubles at Douglas -- which continued to be plagued by high development costs on the new MD-11 tri-jet and parts shortages -- McDonnell Douglas's combat aircraft segment also had its difficulties.  Profits for the division tumbled to $67 million from $91 million, primarily because of reduced earnings for its AH-64 Apache helicopter and write-downs on several other helicopter programs.  These more than offset an improved financial performance by the F-15 fighter.  Earnings were also off 33% in the missiles, space and electronic-systems segment, despite a 13% rise in revenue.  Mr. Modzelewski, while noting that times are tough for arms makers, said he expected McDonnell Douglas's Pentagon-related projects to "bounce back next quarter" to some degree.  A number of defense-oriented aerospace companies, including Northrop Corp. and General Dynamics Corp., have reported either flat or lower third-quarter earnings.  But the biggest question mark remains Douglas.  Deliveries of its MD-80 jetliner, which competes primarily with Boeing Co.'s 737 series, jumped to 30 in the third quarter, from 24 in the second period and 28 a year earlier.  Losses on the program narrowed to $1 million in the latest quarter from $34 million in the second period.  Company officials boast that Douglas could account for half of McDonnell Douglas revenues by 1992, compared with about a third now.  Besides the MD-80 and MD-11 commercial jetliners, Douglas is building the T-45 Navy trainer and C-17 military transport.  But whether things at the Long Beach, Calif., subsidiary can really be turned around has yet to be seen.  "Douglas is improving," said Judith Comeau, analyst at Goldman Sachs & Co., "but they're no where near where they need to be."  Delta Air Lines, in a move that could help it thwart the kind of takeover attempts that have bedeviled other airlines this year, agreed to sell about 5% of its stock to Singapore Airlines Ltd.  It was the second such transaction for the Atlanta-based airline, which this summer sold a 5% stake to Swissair and placed another 14% of its stock in employees' hands.  As part of a 10-year marketing agreement with Singapore Airlines announced yesterday, Delta also agreed to spend about $183 million -- the same amount Singapore Airlines will spend for its Delta shares -- to buy a similar stake in Singapore Airlines.  Delta wouldn't comment on whether the moves were anti-takeover measures.  But they come after a period during which three of the carrier's largest rivals were the subject of takeover bids.  With its fat profits, low debt levels and steady growth, Delta has been considered by Wall Street analysts as likely prey for corporate raiders.  Its shares have risen nearly 15% over the past six months.  Yesterday, it closed at $66.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, down 12.5 cents.  Under the terms of equity cross-purchase agreements, Singapore Airlines agreed to buy 2.5 million shares of Delta common stock for 110% of its closing price for the four days surrounding its purchase announcement.  Delta agreed to buy the same dollar amount of Singapore Airlines shares.  Singapore Airlines also agreed not to transfer its Delta shares and to vote those shares in the same proportion as all other shares are voted or as recommended by Delta's board.  Delta made a similar pact regarding its Singapore Airlines holdings.  As part of the 10-year marketing agreement, the two airlines also plan to coordinate their schedules and possibly operate joint service on certain routes.  An added benefit for Delta is that its agreement with Singapore Airlines provides a toehold in the Pacific, where U.S. airlines face the best possibility of expansion.  U.S. health officials granted long-deferred access to the drug AZT for children with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Louis Sullivan, secretary of Health and Human Services, announced the move by the Food and Drug Administration after two years of restricted access for the youngest AIDS patients to the only anti-viral drug yet cleared to treat the fatal disease.  The drug was given treatment investigational new drug status, which is a label given to drugs that lack formal approval but are thought to be believed effective against a life-threatening disease.  Under the designation, the drug's maker, Burroughs Wellcome Co., will give the drug free of charge for a time to children with the disease and symptoms of advanced infection.  Burroughs Wellcome is a unit of Wellcome PLC, London.  Dr. Sullivan said the FDA action "will give many sick children access to a drug that offers promise for improving or even extending their lives."  Adults with AIDS have had access to AZT since the FDA approved the drug's usage for adults in March 1987.  But despite nearly two years of research showing AZT can relieve symptoms in children, the drug still lacks federal approval for their use.  As a result, many youngsters were unable to obtain the drug and, for the few exceptions, insurance carriers wouldn't cover its $6,400 annual cost.  AIDS has stricken 1,859 children under age 13, with many times that number believed to carry the infection without symptoms.  To date, 1,013 of those children have died, according to the Centers for Disease Control.  Pilots of Federal Express Corp. voted to reject affiliation with the Air Line Pilots Association, giving a resounding victory to the company's founder and chairman, Frederick W. Smith.  In the National Mediation Board election, 709 pilots voted to support the union, out of a total electorate of 2,022 Federal Express aviators.  The results were unexpectedly dismal for the pro-union side, especially given that some 960 eligible voters were former Tiger International Inc. pilots who had been longtime ALPA members.  Federal Express bought Tiger in February for $880 million.  "We're stunned," said Barney Barnhardt, a captain and leader of the pro-ALPA campaign.  "Apparently, we lost a lot of the Tiger votes.  I don't know why."  Mr. Smith had campaigned hard against the union, insisting in company materials that a union would infuse unnecessary confict into the company's employee relations.  A pilots' union would have been Federal Express's first major collective bargaining unit in the U.S., and company executives had feared that it would soften Federal's gung-ho, customer-driven culture.  "The company feels very gratified" with the vote, said T. Allan McArtor, Federal's senior vice president, air operations.  "We like to think that the Federal Express management can deal directly with its pilots without a union's intervention."  Mr. Smith, through a spokesman, declined to be interviewed yesterday.  In Washington, ALPA issued a statement saying the union was "disappointed" with the election's outcome.  It said it filed an objection with the National Mediation Board, protesting "improprieties" in the vote.  Specifically, the union is contending, among other charges, that Federal Express misled pilots by calling the Flight Crewmembers Handbook a valid contract.  Mr. Barnhardt said Federal was apparently successful in its effort to persuade former Tiger pilots to give the company a chance without a union.  The company had told pilots that it's much easier to vote in a union than to vote one out.  "It looks like the `let's-give-it-a-year campaign' worked," said Mr. Barnhardt.  As for the veteran Federal pilots, Mr. Barnhardt said the pro-union side had counted on getting at least 100 of them to support ALPA.  But it seems many fewer than that actually voted for the union, probably because of fears that union rules would hurt them in their battle over seniority issues against the former Tiger pilots.  Depending on how a mediator reconciles the different job classifications of Federal and Tiger, Federal Express still faces possible union elections this fall among airplane mechanics, ramp workers and stock clerks.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Federal's shares closed at $52, down 12.5 cents.  Thursday, October 26, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 13/16% high, 8 11/16% low, 8 11/16% near closing bid, 8 3/4% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.45% 30 to 44 days; 8.20% 45 to 66 days; 8.325% 67 to 89 days; 8.05% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.50% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.55% 30 days; 8.45% 60 days; 8.40% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.09% one month; 8.04% two months; 8.03% three months; 7.96% six months; 7.92% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.55% one month; 8.50% three months; 8.45% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.48% 30 days; 8.32% 60 days; 8.30% 90 days; 8.12% 120 days; 8.02% 150 days; 7.94% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% two months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% three months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% four months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% five months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 5/8% three months; 8 7/16% six months; 8 3/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 9%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 23, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.52% 13 weeks; 7.50% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.77%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.70%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.65%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.65%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  UAL Corp.'s third-quarter net income fell 72%, but that reflected a large year-earlier special gain and sizable expense this year for stock appreciation rights tied to recent takeover activity.  UAL, parent of United Airlines, said net income fell to $110.9 million, or $5.11 a share, from $402.4 million, or $18.68 a share.  The year-earlier quarter included a one-time after-tax gain of $223.4 million from the sale of interests in its computerized reservations partnership, Covia.  The company said its third-quarter results reflected the recent sharp climb in UAL stock to $282 a share as of Sept. 29, sparked by bids from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis and a labor-management buy-out group.  UAL's board approved the labor-management bid Sept. 14.  But the bid collapsed two weeks ago, and the stock has dropped sharply since.  Thus, UAL said it expects to reverse most of the stock appreciation expenses in the fourth quarter.  The stock appreciation rights are related to stock options that UAL officers hold.  As the value of UAL stock rises, the company must reflect this in its accounting methods as an increased expense.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, UAL shares rose $9.75 to $170.75 on volume of 1.1 million shares.  Excluding the stock appreciation expense this year and the special gain last year, per-share earnings would have been $6.74 in the third quarter, compared with $8.31.  Most industry analysts expected UAL to report third-quarter earnings of around $7 a share.  Third-quarter revenue rose 7% to $2.58 billion from $2.41 billion.  Third-quarter traffic was up 3% to 19.3 billion revenue passenger miles from 18.8 billion in the year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  For the nine months, net income fell 71% to $317.3 million, or $14.66 a share, from $1.1 billion, or $34.35 a share, which includes the gain from the sale of Covia interests.  Revenue increased 10% to $7.43 billion from $6.76 billion.  Traffic was nearly flat at 52.8 billion revenue passenger miles vs. 52.6 billion miles a year earlier.  Separately, the leadership of UAL's machinists union met to discuss the possibility of proposing a recapitalization to UAL's board.  The leadership came to no conclusion, and discussions will continue.  The board said Monday it believes the company should remain independent for now.  Takeover stock traders and other investors, however, have been pushing for some form of recapitalization to regain the losses they suffered when the labor-management bid collapsed.  When Adolph Coors Co. announced the appointment of William Coors as president late Wednesday, Peter Coors wasn't promoted -- at least not officially.  But the announcement by the big Golden, Colo., brewer was an implicit statement of Peter Coor's rising role at the company, analysts say.  It also underscores the difficult task ahead as Coors attempts to purchase Stroh Brewery Co. and fight off increasingly tough competition from Anheuser-Busch Cos.  The latest management shuffling at Coors seemed to focus on Jeffrey Coors, who will relinquish the president's post to his uncle William, who is 73.  The elder Coors has been chairman since 1970.  Jeffrey, who at 44 is one year older than his brother Peter, will head up Coors Technology Co., a small unit he has run for several years.  But Coors insists the administrative changes won't really shift responsibilities at the company.  Indeed, a spokesman for Coors said that since January, Peter has been reporting directly to William, rather than to his brother.  The change in titles "makes the structure conform to the reality," the spokesman said. (William, the brothers, another brother Joe Jr., and their father Joseph Sr. all serve on the company's nine-member board.)  According to analysts, the changes reflect the tough task the company faces in integrating the operations and marketing efforts of Stroh and Coors, steering the merger through the Justice Department and continuing to fight the battle Coors is waging with Anheuser and Miller Brewing Co., a unit of Philip Morris Cos.  "It's gray-beard time," said Tom Pirko, president of Bevmark Inc., a Los Angeles consulting firm, referring to the move of William into the presidency.  "This is a time of tremendous risk at the company, and Peter has a tremendous amount of responsibility."  Putting William at the helm probably won't increase the elder Coors's imput into the beer business, but "it doesn't hurt to have a senior statesman at the top," he said.  In a brief telephone interview yesterday, Peter Coors said his uncle "is our leader.  We depend on all his years of experience and knowledge in the industry, and that doesn't change."  But in January, Peter said, his uncle told him and his brothers, "You guys run those units."  Coors stressed that the removal of Jeff from the presidency wasn't a demotion, but would allow him to devote his full attention to his unit.  Coors has continually pointed to the importance of the technology unit to its diversification efforts.  But overall, "Coors's success or lack thereof depends on the beer business," said Emanuel Goldman, analyst at PaineWebber Inc. in San Francisco.  Mr. Goldman credits Peter Coors with "pulling Coors's marketing efforts into the 20th century" by pushing for intensified marketing efforts, modern advertising campaigns and significantly higher marketing expenditures.  Analysts also credit Peter with selling other family members on the purchase of Stroh, a transaction that will cost about $425 million and slap a big piece of debt on Coors's books for the first time in the company's history.  "Peter had a major struggle in getting this done," said Mr. Pirko.  Taking on debt was controversial within the family, Mr. Pirko added, but in the end, "Peter called the shots."  In yesterday's interview, however, Peter declined to take individual credit for the moves.  "We manage as a team here," he said.  "The team establishes the goals.  It's the result that's important, not who's the architect or the driving force."  And Peter will continue to be under the gun, given the dominance of Anheuser, the stubbornly flat beer market of the past decade and recent Coors financial results that have been frustratingly mediocre.  So far this year, Coors' market share has been slipping and so has net income, due to increased costs and increased price competition, the company said.  Price competition is about to become even more fierce.  Anheuser announced on Wednesday that it would begin discounting Budweiser, its flagship brand, which analysts say will put exceptionally heavy pressure on Coors management in the midst of a major merger.  Peter Coors, however, said the discounting by Anheuser could also mean that Coors' increased marketing efforts are having an impact.  Furthermore, he said, "I don't know how the industry can get too much tougher.  This is just a signal that the toughness is going to continue."  Sony Corp. asked a Los Angeles court to deny Warner Communications Inc.'s request for an injunction preventing Hollywood producers Peter Guber and John Peters from taking over the management of Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc.  The Japanese concern made its request in Los Angeles Superior Court, where Warner last week filed a $1 billion breach of contract suit against Sony.  Mr. Guber and Mr. Peters are currently under contract to produce movies exclusively for Warner.  Sony, which has agreed to pay $3.5 billion and to assume $1.5 billion in debt to buy Columbia, is also offering $200 million for Guber Peters Entertainment Co., of which the producers are co-chairmen and own a combined 28% stake.  While executives from both sides say the matter still could be settled, papers filed in the court by Sony appear to heighten the acrimony of Hollywood's most-watched legal battle.  Sony claims an injunction would leave it "faced with the ominous possibility that it would complete a $5 billion entertainment company acquisition and be left with no management to run the company."  Sony adds that "Warner must be grinning from ear to ear at the possibility of leaving Sony in such a position and at the opportunity to prevent the revitalization of Columbia into a strong competitor."  Sony disputes Warner's contention that its offer to Mr. Guber and Mr. Peters violates their contract with Warner, which is in the process of being acquired by New York-based Time Warner Inc. Furthermore, Sony claims that the contract as written -- and oral agreements that Warner has denied exist -- allow the producers to take on such executive posts.  Sony's legal argument even raises the novel idea that Mr. Guber and Mr. Peters could actually make movies for Warner while serving in executive posts at another studio.  Sony acknowledges that Warner's contract prevents the Guber-Peters team from being producers or executive producers of movies for another studio.  But, Sony says, that doesn't exclude them from taking an executive post at another company where they would be involved in choosing movies and in managing, but not in day-to-day production of movies.  Sony says Columbia "could allow Guber and Peters to produce motion pictures for Warner as soon as the acquisition is consummated."  But Sony also says in its filing that the Warner contract "doesn't require that Guber and Peters take any affirmative steps to produce motion pictures; it simply rewards them when they do and prohibits them from producing for another entertainment company."  And Sony says Warner has already shown it doesn't need the producers "by taking action to prevent Guber and Peters from completing production in Warner properties."  Among the arguments Sony makes is that Warner should let the producers go to Columbia because it already allowed the producers to become co-chairmen of publicly held Barris Industries Inc., which earlier this year changed its name to Guber Peters Entertainment.  Sony also says in its filing that Mr. Guber and Mr. Peters were offered management posts at Columbia once before in 1987, and that "Warner approved and encouraged them to do so."  But in a sworn affidavit last week, Warner Bros.  Chairman Robert Daly denied that.  Mr. Daly said that Mr. Guber had mentioned such an offer, and that he responded that "I thought the idea was a bad one from his point of view, and I understand he dropped the idea shortly thereafter."  The two sides did some rival-bashing yesterday as well.  In a sworn declaration, Walter Yetnikoff, president of Sony's CBS Records unit, said Warner Chairman Steven Ross has an "anti-Japanese, anti-Sony" bias.  But Stuart Rabinowitz, Warner's outside counsel, says Sony "violates American business morality by secretly raiding major producers under exclusive contract to Warner."  In another sworn declaration yesterday, Sony Corp. of America Vice Chairman Michael Schulof said that while he was negotiating with Mr. Guber and Mr. Peters, he relied on the producers' assurances that Warner had previously agreed to let them terminate the contract and wouldn't have any trouble obtaining a release.  Mr. Guber, meanwhile, in his own sworn declaration yesterday, maintained that running a studio has always been "our professed goal," and that Warner executives made an oral agreement that would free the producers from their contract should the opportunity arise.  Mr. Peters, in his declaration, supported Mr. Guber's claims and said he is "shocked" by the assertions of Warner executives that such an agreement was never made.  Regional thrift regulators charged that phone calls were bugged during the examination of Lincoln Savings & Loan Association and that federal officials in Washington delayed Lincoln's seizure until its $2.5 billion cost made it the most expensive thrift failure ever.  "Clearly, we were shot in the back . . . as we battled to protect the taxpayers," said William Black, acting district counsel for the San Francisco region of thrift regulators.  In a day of extraordinary testimony before the House Banking Committee, officials from the San Francisco Office of Thrift Supervision also testified that a Big Eight accounting firm, Arthur Andersen & Co., participated in back-dating loan documents and that the Washington officials even agreed in one document not to prosecute Lincoln over certain infractions.  The hearing may also add to the unease of Sens.  Alan Cranston (D., Calif.) and Dennis DeConcini (D., Ariz.), who are being scrutinized for intervening on behalf of Lincoln, a unit of American Continental Corp., Phoenix, Ariz.  The officials said Sen. DeConcini and an aide to Sen. Cranston called California state thrift officials to press for a sale of Lincoln, instead of its seizure.  Witnesses said the room in which California examiners were auditing Lincoln this past spring was bugged.  According to a government memo, regulators who took control of the thrift in August discovered that a phone line in Lincoln's headquarters in Irvine, Calif., had been "compromised" to allow calls to be monitored on other extensions.  It didn't say who was monitoring the calls, but said the matter was turned over to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.  A Lincoln spokesman said its management "never authorized or participated in any bugging of anyone."  The regional officials said Washington's chief thrift regulator, Danny Wall, and his principal lieutenants repeatedly ignored warnings that Lincoln was being operated in a reckless manner, certain to cause its failure.  They also accused Mr. Wall of holding improper meetings with Lincoln officials, while refusing to listen to field examiners.  Members of the Banking Committee generally received the regional officials as bureaucratic heroes and sharply criticized their Washington bosses, who had relieved them of their responsibility for Lincoln two years before the thrift's parent filed for bankruptcy-law protection.  Committee Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas) said Mr. Wall "willingly cut the legs out from under his regulatory troops in the middle of the battle," and renewed his call for Mr. Wall to step aside.  Rep. Joseph Kennedy (D., Mass.) said, "The higher up in the regulatory process, the more corrupt it would appear."  Mr. Wall is scheduled to testify Nov. 7, and his agency said that all sides of the issue should be heard before drawing conclusions.  Separately, other Washington thrift officials disputed the regional examiners' statement that they had called specifically for the seizure of Lincoln in 1987, saying that it was only one option they presented.  The regional officials also said that Arthur Andersen backdated data to support loans that were made with no underwriting standards.  Over two years, until April 1986, $1 billion in loans were approved, even though Lincoln had no written loan standards, said Mike Patriarca, acting principal supervisory agent with the Office of Thrift Supervision.  Fifty-two loans were made in March 1986, he said, and none had credit reports or other background work completed.  "At a later time, the files looked good because they had been stuffed," Mr. Patriarca said.  Leonard Bickwit, a Washington attorney for Lincoln, conceded that some memos had been written after the fact.  He said that "memorialization of underwriting activities that had been undertaken at an earlier time" did occur, but that Lincoln believed it adhered to lending standards superior to the industry average.  A spokesman for Arthur Andersen denied any improprieties, adding, "At the request of our then-client, we provided staff personnel to work for a limited period of time under the direction of client personnel to assist them in organizing certain files."  The matter is under active criminal investigation at the Justice Department, Mr. Black said.  The hearings also disclosed that Washington officials promised in May 1988 not to launch any civil or criminal actions based on an examination in which regional officials concluded that Lincoln was being operated in an unsafe and unsound manner.  "Giving up the right to make criminal referrals to me is inconceivable," Mr. Black said.  The committee also heard testimony from two officials who said that Sens.  Cranston and DeConcini, who received campaign contributions from Lincoln Chairman Charles Keating Jr., arranged for telephone calls on their behalf to state thrift regulators.  The officials said both calls encouraged a sale of Lincoln to an outside buyer, which Mr. Keating sought, rather than putting it in receivership.  A spokesman for Sen. Cranston said that telephone-company records for three months disclosed no phone calls to the state regulators from his office.  An aide to Sen. DeConcini said the phone call to a top California thrift regulator was "informational."  The White House and the Senate Intelligence Committee agreed on new rules for covert operations that will give President Bush a freer hand to involve the U.S. in coup plots in Panama and elsewhere.  Based on assurances from the White House, the committee agreed to rescind Reagan-era restrictions and give U.S. operatives wide latitude to participate in planning foreign coups, according to committee officials.  In particular, the Bush administration will no longer be bound by a controversial legal interpretation put in place last year that could have required notifying dictators in advance of coup plots that might endanger their lives.  Instead, the officials said, an executive order barring assassinations would be considered satisfied as long as U.S. agents stay away from coup plots that have assassinations as their explicit goal.  "We start with a clean slate," said one official familiar with the pact.  The agreement was disclosed last night after the panel approved separate intelligence legislation and held a closed hearing regarding Panama with officials from the Central Intelligence Agency, the State Department and the Pentagon.  The legislation also contains significant compromises that have the effect of giving Mr. Bush more leeway in covert actions.  The panel dropped a plan to require 48-hour notice of covert acts, and it voted to permit the CIA to use a contingency fund to launch covert acts.  In return, Mr. Bush is sending Congress a letter pledging to notify the committee in advance of nearly all covert acts, but reserving the right to delay notification in some cases until a few days after the operations are launched, and in rare cases, to take longer.  In addition, the administration promised to put into writing all presidential intelligence decisions, called "findings."  And the CIA reluctantly agreed to accept a more independent internal inspector's office than now exists.  Some gifts are better left unopened.  In 1984, Howard Conant, a director of Valspar Corp., donated to Goodwill Industries Inc. of Chicago an eight-acre site on the city's west side, where Valspar had operated a paint factory.  Goodwill planned to sell the property and pocket the proceeds, as it had in many similar cases.  Six months later, Goodwill says, it was stunned to learn from the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency that Mr. Conant's gift was contaminated and that the charity, as the current owner, could be held responsible for any cleanup costs.  Only this June, after the state agency made a more complete survey of the site, did Goodwill realize the extent of the problem: The property contains more than 70 storage tanks holding hazardous oily solvents and lead, and the soil is contaminated by similar substances.  "It's a toxic time bomb," says James D. Wadsworth, president of the Chicago Goodwill, which is independent of sister Goodwills around the country.  Cleaning up the site is expected to cost many millions of dollars.  Paying even a portion of the cleanup costs could bankrupt the charity, which has annual revenue of $6 million, says Russell B. Selman, Goodwill's lawyer.  In a pending lawsuit, the charity has asked a federal district court in Chicago to rescind its donation agreement with Valspar and Mr. Conant.  Goodwill's problem looms as a potential threat to any charity that accepts property gifts in the new age of tough environmental laws.  Under federal and Illinois law, present and past owners of a contaminated site are among those who can be held liable for all cleanup costs, regardless of who caused the problem; regulators generally assign the costs.  Donating contaminated property allows companies to share the costs of their environmental problems, says Laurence Molloy of Molloy Corp., an environmental management firm in New York.  It also allows businesses to stop paying taxes and insurance on land they no longer use and to take a tax deduction on the property, tax lawyers say.  Nonprofit organizations might escape liability by showing that they didn't know a site was contaminated, but to succeed they must also show that they conducted an investigation before accepting the donation and that it didn't disclose the toxic-waste problem.  Such an investigation can cost as much as $50,000.  Charities face a dilemma, because they can't reject gifts of property without significantly reducing their revenue.  Since 1984, non-cash donations, which include real estate, have accounted for 20% of corporate giving, according to the Conference Board, a New York trade group that tracks corporate giving.  In 1983, such donations represented only 11% of corporate giving.  Still, because of the hazards, many nonprofit organizations are tightening their rules on such gifts.  Since June, the Salvation Army's Eastern division has refused real-estate donations unless the donor first conducts an environmental assessment of the property.  "We tend to be very careful," says Carl Schoch, property secretary for the Eastern division.  "We're aware an owner might want to get rid of" a hazardous site.  At the Nature Conservancy, site inspections, which have been mandatory since the late '70s, "are now specifically geared to looking for hazardous-waste problems," says Michael Dennis, general counsel for the Rosalind, Va., group.  So far the organization hasn't incurred any major liabilities.  Last year it went back to a donor eight years after accepting a gift when the conservancy learned of waste on the site.  The donor agreed to share the cleanup costs.  Now the group is considering hiring environmental specialists and engineers to work for it and investigate properties."All you need is one hazardous property, and you could have a multimillion-dollar liability on your hands," Mr. Dennis says.  Universities also are proceeding with caution.  In 1987 the University of Minnesota spent $100,000 cleaning up toxic waste at a property donated by a local power utility.  The site had been contaminated by a company that leased the property and is now bankrupt.  Now all property transfers involving the university are scrutinized for potential hazards -- at a base cost of about $20,000 for preliminary research and soil samples -- and scuttled if environmental problems can't be resolved.  Many nonprofit groups spurn some donations out of fear of potential problems.  The Council on the Environment of New York City, a governmental agency, refused a gift of a site to be used for a children's playground when the council learned an auto repair shop had been located there.  Little money was available for tests on the site, but "common sense said there could be problems," says Lys McLaughlin, the agency's executive director.  Since receiving the Valspar gift, the Chicago Goodwill has virtually closed the door on property donations, says its president, Mr. Wadsworth.  But that's no help in its current toxic-waste mess.  In its suit, Goodwill claims that Valspar, a paint and varnish maker based in Minneapolis, and Mr. Conant haven't met terms of the donation agreement or environmental regulations about property transfers.  Mr. Conant, however, isn't about to take back his gift.  His lawyer, Michael Quinn, says he doesn't want the land back because its value has declined since it was donated due to vandalism or poor maintenance.  Valspar, which had leased the property from Mr. Conant, says it has complied with all requests from the Illinois EPA about the site.  "We have empathy for the unfortunate situation Goodwill is in, but that doesn't mean a legal obligation attaches to it," says Leo G. Stern, a lawyer for Valspar.  Both Valspar and Mr. Conant argue that Goodwill doesn't have standing to bring its suit.  As the litigation progresses toward the pretrial fact-finding stage, Goodwill's bills continue to mount.  It has already spent more than $50,000 on security guards and fences at the site.  The charity also owes $400,000 in back taxes on the property; its tax-exempt status applies only if property is being used for charitable purposes.  The state of Illinois has sued Goodwill for a share of the cleanup costs at a second site, a former paint factory in Chicago.  That property was donated to Goodwill by Artra Group Inc., a Northbrook, Ill., company with interests in fashion jewelry and accessories.  Goodwill later sold the site, before, it says, there was any indication of contamination.  Some charity officials now say Congress should exempt nonprofit organizations that receive land donations from any cleanup liability.  That seems unlikely, though, because "everyone wants an exemption," says David Van Slyke, a lawyer with the enforcement and compliance division of the federal EPA.  "But the agency is trying to be equitable.  We're not trying to jam people when they are an innocent party."  For now, Goodwill's Mr. Wadsworth lectures other charities about accepting land donations.  "It's supposed to be a gift," he says.  "But it can turn out to be a liability."  For a company that sells billions of dollars in military hardware each year, Northrop Corp. is pressing awfully hard to get back a mere $6,250,000.  The missing funds -- and the way they've been accounted for -- are at the center of a long-running dispute between the Los Angeles aerospace company and a well-connected Korean enterprise called Asia Culture Travel Development Co.  Since news of Northrop's Korean dealings became public last year, the company has insisted that it sunk the money into a proposed hotel venture in Seoul, losing everything when it was bamboozled by Korean con men.  The Koreans say that the hotel was a ruse from the beginning, and Northrop really intended to bribe government officials to buy its ill-fated F-20 Tigershark jet fighter.  Now, a document released by the House Energy and Commerce subcommittee alleges that Northrop tried to cover up those purportedly illicit payments by forging signatures, shuffling millions of dollars in and out of banks and even paying hush money to middlemen who threatened to disclose the scam to the authorities.  Some of the allegations were given to the subcommittee during testimony in August 1988.  But the document -- featuring a passel of new details -- is sure to revive interest in the matter on Capitol Hill, where lawmakers this week are deciding on appropriations for Northrop's most important Pentagon program, the B-2 Stealth bomber.  Asia Culture Travel submitted the document as part of its legal defense to the International Chamber of Commerce, which is arbitrating the case between Asia Culture Travel and Northrop.  One subcommittee investigator, who works for Chairman John Dingell (D., Mich.), called the information "a major step forward" in its own inquiry.  A federal grand jury also is actively trying to determine whether Northrop violated the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act.  Northrop has strongly denied any illegalities.  It said that in August it made an extensive filing to the chamber that rebuts, point by point, the allegations by Asia Culture Travel.  A copy wasn't immediately available.  In a May 8 filing to the chamber, though, Northrop stressed its view that "this is not a complex case . . . but is instead a straightforward breach-of-contract dispute."  The company added that Asia Culture Travel's "allegations are so contradictory and inconsistent that they provide powerful evidence" that the Koreans "deceived Northrop" by pitching the hotel project.  But Asia Culture Travel lays out a much different story in its 52-page brief.  Northrop's first contact with the Koreans, this version of the tangled events goes, occurred in the summer of 1983 when Northrop approached Dong Yang Express Co., a bus company that was run by Lee MinHa.  His brother-in-law was the late Park Chong Kyu, a powerful businessman.  Mr. Park, the pistol-packing owner of a notorious Seoul night spot called the Safari Club, was a member of the Seoul Olympic Organizing Committee with easy access to the highest echelons of the Korean government.  The brief alleges that Northrop, by way of a Honolulu-based consultant named James Shin, proposed the idea of selling to Korea as many as 200 F-20s through Dong Yang Express, which was to receive a 2% commission with a $55 million cap.  As part of the arrangement, the document contends, Northrop was asked to invest in the Sofitel Seoul, "a high-class hotel" that was to be built on the site of a Dong Yang Express garage.  Though it is typical for American companies to invest in foreign countries in which they want to trade arms, thereby offsetting the cost of currency conversion on its contracts to the overseas government, it was still initially puzzling why Northrop approached a bus company to do it.  "I first thought it made no sense to offer to an express bus company the distribution of up-to-date fighters," Mr. Lee told public prosecutors in Seoul who have also investigated the situation, according to the document.  "But later I learned that it was not Dong Yang Express but Mr. Park Chong Kyu that Northrop aimed to contact."  In May 1984, the document asserts, Northrop officials met with Mr. Park -- known best to Americans as C.K. Park -- and allegedly asked him to "perform promotional activities" for the F-20.  The brief says Mr. Park then asked for $5 million up front, adding that "he could procure such expenses from the budget for the Sofitel Hotel project if approved by Northrop."  But Northrop declined, the brief says, when its representatives pointed out that a payoff would be illegal and "such a payment, if done, would constitute a scandal."  Yet the document alleges that it didn't take long before Northrop and Mr. Park devised a new scheme to funnel the money.  The conduit, the filing insists, was to be another hotel project -- this time a joint venture with Asia Culture Travel, another Park-affiliated concern.  Promotional materials touting Asia Culture Travel were delivered to Northrop and appear to have been signed by Kang Oh-Hyun, an official of the firm; in fact, the filing alleges, they were forged by Mr. Shin, the Northrop consultant.  The brief says other procedural forms relating to the joint venture appear to have been signed by four Asia Culture Travel shareholders when Mr. Park came to Los Angeles in the summer of 1984 for the Olympic Games.  But three of the holders, the filing says, weren't in California at the time.  On Aug. 9, 1984, Northrop told Mr. Park that $6,250,000 had been deposited to an account in Hong Kong that he controlled.  Everything, the arbitration filing suggests, seemed set.  That is, at least until October when, during a test flight, an F-20 crashed.  The pilot was killed and the aircraft destroyed.  Shortly thereafter another F-20 crashed in Canada during a demonstration, and Northrop eventually gave up on the F-20 program after out-of-pocket expenditures of more than $1 billion.  Mr. Park died of cancer in 1985.  Meanwhile, Northrop's own board began inquiring about what happened to the hotel -- the Seoul Palace, it was to be called -- and the $6,250,000.  It was at that point, the filing alleges, that a cover-up began.  First, the brief says, Northrop wanted to formally cancel with Dong Yang Express the earlier Sofitel Hotel transaction that had been proposed.  The idea, the filing alleges, was to be able to transfer to Dong Yang Express $3.5 million in termination fees.  Donald Foulds, a Northrop executive, even allegedly drafted the settlement claim for Dong Yang Express.  Mr. Foulds's attorney, Jan Handzlik, said his client "denies that he engaged in any improper activity in respect to the Korean hotel project, including any cover-up activities."  That money, investigators for the House subcommittee said, was in turn designed to be handed back to Northrop to help it account for more than half of the missing $6,250,000.  Of the remainder, the filing maintains, $1,750,000 could be chalked up to expenses and $1 million was available through a Park bank account.  But, the filing says, that plan had to be killed when "the blackmailers appear."  The first allegedly was a Dong Yang Express middleman, who told James Dorsey, a Honolulu-based Northrop marketing executive, that he would "publish all the facts concerning Northrop's efforts to sell the F-20 to the Korean government," the document says.  Both Mr. Dorsey and his lawyer, Daniel Bookin, declined to comment.  Welko Gasich, then a top Northrop executive, allegedly handed over $1.5 million to Dong Yang Express, which passed on $500,000 to silence the middleman, the document claims.  Mr. Gasich declined to comment; the middleman couldn't be located.  In early 1987, the arbitration filing asserts, Mr. Shin, the Northrop consultant, demanded $2 million to remain silent.  Mr. Shin, who is being sued by Northrop in federal court in Honolulu, couldn't be reached.  It was then that Northrop filed suit against the Koreans -- in what the House investigators claim was an attempt to make it look as if Northrop had been swindled.  The company is asking the International Chamber of Commerce to order Asia Culture Travel and its associates to return the $6,250,000, plus interest "at the highest lawful rate."  A.H. Belo Corp. said it asked the Federal Communications Commission to dismiss a request by the Dallas Times Herald calling for the FCC to revoke Belo's Dallas television license.  In a response to the commission, Belo, owner of the Dallas Morning News, WFAA-TV in Dallas and other TV stations, said that the Times Herald's complaint is "without merit" and is an effort to gain leverage in a legal battle.  The Dallas Times Herald filed the request with the FCC earlier this month, charging that an agreement between Belo and Universal Press Syndicate is intended to eliminate newspaper competition in Dallas.  The Belo-Universal agreement calls for the two companies to study developing television programs based on Universal's features.  As part of the agreement, Universal moved 26 features, including "Doonesbury," "The Far Side" and Dear Abby, to the Morning News from the Times Herald.  A lawsuit filed by the Times Herald against Belo charging antitrust law violations and interference with a contract is pending in Houston state court.  Arnold C. Pohs was officially named president and chief executive officer of Cellular Inc., a provider of management, financing and operating services to cellular-telephone systems.  Mr. Pohs, previously executive vice president and chief operating officer, was named interim president and chief executive officer after David M. Harrold, a company founder, resigned from the posts for personal reasons in August.  Cellular said Robert J. Lunday Jr., its chairman and another founder, resigned from the company's board to pursue the sale of his telephone company, Big Sandy Telecommunications Inc.  A new director hasn't been named to fill that seat, which expires in 1992.  Mr. Pohs said the board probaby will elect a new chairman at its meeting Nov. 10.  In addition, the company said Monroe M. Rifkin, a cable television investor and consultant, was elected a director, filling a vacant seat that will expire in 1991.  The board currently has six members, but is expanding to nine, Mr. Pohs said.  France's Banque Indosuez shocked London markets by moving to become the dominant shareholder in prestigious but troubled merchant bank Morgan Grenfell Group PLC.  Indosuez said it has agreed to purchase Willis Faber PLC's 20.4% stake in Morgan Grenfell, by far the largest single holding in the bank.  That would bring Indosuez's total stake to 24.8%, Indosuez said.  While awaiting Bank of England permission to pass the 15% mark, Indosuez said, it has agreed to purchase immediately a 10.5% share in the bank for 410 pence ($6.62) a share, bringing its stake to 14.9%.  It then intends to acquire the remaining Willis stake at 462 pence a share.  The transaction still must be cleared by Willis shareholders.  Morgan Grenfell shares jumped 38 pence to 400 pence on London's stock exchange.  Indosuez said it has agreed that, barring a major change in Morgan Grenfell's situation, it won't launch a full takeover bid for at least a year.  But despite signs that Morgan Grenfell staff was unhappy at the sudden investment, Indosuez Chairman Antoine Jeancourt-Galignani said he will begin linking the two banks into "an important merchant banking group in Europe."  In a telephone interview, Morgan Grenfell Chairman John Craven said the Indosuez holding "wasn't one that was taken at our initiative," adding that Morgan Grenfell "remains perfectly confident in the future of our business as an independent entity."  Mr. Craven added he held "important discussions" yesterday with Indosuez officials about the possible benefits of a combination, and that Morgan Grenfell's attitude "is entirely objective."  He added: "My understanding of what I have heard is that their intentions are very long term.  I guess if they get to 25%" Morgan Grenfell would be a troublesome target for another counterbidder, he added.  In a statement, Morgan Grenfell said it now seeks further clarification of Indosuez's intentions.  Mr. Jeancourt-Galignani refused to say whether Indosuez will bid for all of Morgan Grenfell when its year is up.  If it does, the operation would be one of the largest foreign purchases of a U.K merchant bank.  It would catapult Indosuez from the position of a marginal London player, with strong Asian and Middle Eastern activities, to the upper levels of the U.K. merchant banking scene.  It is part of Indosuez's overall plan of building its business across Europe, as the 1992 reduction of European Community market barriers looms.  Mr. Jeancourt-Galignani said Indosuez had to move fast because it feared that another investor -- widely rumored to be Deutsche Bank -- was buying shares heavily.  Indosuez said it believes Deutsche Bank currently has a 4.9% stake, but it refused to say who it believed was buying.  It said Deutsche Bank is the largest other holding it knows of.  Indosuez completed the purchase in just two weeks, and market sentiment is that Indosuez's rush led it to pay a high price, but French analysts tended to welcome the investment.  "The logic is that Indosuez is a French investment bank with a lot of market activities, but not a lot of fund management," said Romain Burnand, a financial analyst at Paris brokerage Cholet-Dupont & Cie.  He said Morgan Grenfell manages about #7 billion pounds ($11.3 billion) in investment funds.  "It is a force in the market and has a very good international image," Mr. Burnand said.  "The problem is that executives are volatile.  They can leave when they are unhappy."  One year after hitting the auction block, RJR Nabisco Inc. resembles a runner in a long-distance race: The first mile has been almost flawless, but the pace may be difficult to maintain.  Under buyer Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., which acquired the food and tobacco giant for $25 billion in February, RJR has kept pace with an ambitious schedule to pare its massive debt load.  But events beyond the company's control -- namely the skittish bond markets -- could have a big effect on the buy-out's profitability.  And rumors resurfaced yesterday that RJR's planned $1.48 billion sale of its Del Monte canned foods unit might fall through.  If the Del Monte deal does hit a snag, it would be the first setback in an otherwise successful year.  Since February, RJR has been a study in perpetual motion.  It has moved its headquarters here from Atlanta, shed about 2,000 employees, sold businesses accounting for nearly a quarter of its $17 billion revenue base, and kicked what is called the "loading" habit, the practice of shipping distributors billions of cigarettes that stuff inventories but are never consumed.  So far, history's biggest leveraged buy-out looks good from a financial standpoint.  In the first six months this year, RJR's operating profit soared 21% from the year-earlier period.  The results have led analysts to predict that the company's 1989 cash flow will be more than 20% ahead of the debt-coverage ratio required by RJR's banks.  "We're acting like we're not an LBO company," said a beaming Louis Gerstner Jr., RJR's chairman and chief executive officer.  But there are clouds on the horizon.  Much of KKR's financing for the RJR buy-out is with so-called payment-in-kind debt, notes that accumulate interest in more notes and don't require cash payments for several years.  Although RJR is having no trouble meeting cash-interest payments, it is too early to tell just how onerous the high-interest PIK notes will be once they come due.  Moreover, asset sales, which have gone smoothly so far, could hit some hurdles.  Yesterday, prices of RJR's high-yield junk bonds fell on rumors of problems with the Del Monte deal.  Since Oct. 4, the price of RJR's junior bonds has fallen by about 14%.  "Everything had gone well until the junk market went into disarray," said David Goldman, an analyst with Nomura Securities International Inc.  "But from this point forward, I think the jury is definitely out."  In some respects, the deal is right on track.  RJR's operating profit from tobacco, bolstered by strong overseas sales and manufacturing improvements, jumped 17% in the first six months.  The tobacco business does have some long-term problems.  Its brands are battered by Philip Morris Cos., and it is still unclear whether KKR will be able to afford the major overhaul to turn that business around.  In the short term, however, the tobacco unit will continue to throw off more cash because of an estimated $500 million in cost cuts.  Meanwhile, RJR's food business is surpassing almost everybody's expectations.  RJR operating income from food soared 31% in the six months, paced by 40% growth at its Nabisco Brands unit.  Nabisco has cut costs aggressively, according to John Greeniaus, the unit's chief executive.  Savings have come from firing some high-paid research engineers, ending peripheral marketing activities such as race-car promotions and deferring plant-modernization plans.  Mr. Greeniaus also says Nabisco, following the lead of competitors, has been "relatively aggressive" in raising prices.  But the big story at Nabisco this year is new products.  The unit's Teddy Grahams snack food has surged to become the industry's third-selling cookie in less than a year on the market, behind Nabisco's own Oreos and Chips Ahoy] brands.  Mr. Greeniaus put Teddy Grahams' first-year sales at just under $150 million, which he called "unprecedented."  Last month, Nabisco brought out a dozen more new products.  Next year, Mr. Greeniaus said, Nabisco's operating income should climb 15% -- down from the expected 40% growth this year but above the 10% level considered strong in the industry.  RJR's asset sales will be on schedule, too -- if the Del Monte deal is successful.  In June, RJR got $2.5 billion for its European food units, which it used, along with about $200 million of other proceeds, to pay down about $2 billion of a $6 billion bridge loan.  RJR owes another $3 billion on that loan by February.  It expects to pay that with roughly $1 billion in sales of assorted small assets (probably including its 20% stake in ESPN, its Butterfinger and Baby Ruth candy bar brands, and its breakfast cereals unit) and $2 billion from the two-part sale of most of Del Monte.  A group led by Merrill Lynch & Co. agreed to acquire Del Monte last month, but the agreement is contingent on the securities firm's ability to finance about $350 million of the purchase price, either by selling junk bonds or making a bridge loan.  The Del Monte purchase is scheduled to close in late December.  If it doesn't go through, that could force KKR to adjust the terms of the sale or to sell other assets, including RJR's food units in Latin America and New Zealand, the hot-cereals division, or even the Planter's LifeSavers unit, to meet the bank debt pay-down time-table.  Neither Merrill, RJR nor KKR would comment yesterday on the deal.  Several people familiar with the agreement said Merrill hasn't told RJR of any decision not to proceed with the purchase.  By next August, RJR must pay the last $1 billion of the bridge loan, with half that amount required to come from more asset sales.  Predictably, RJR is taking advantage of its improving balance sheet to refinance some of its most expensive debt.  Karl von der Heyden, chief financial officer, said he is talking with bankers about refinancing between $2.5 billion and $3 billion of RJR loans at lower interest rates, possibly securing the refinanced debt with some of RJR's assets.  "Conceptually, the longer we wait, the better our credit gets," said Mr. von der Heyden.  "There would have to be some cataclysmic event for us not to bring our interest rate down."  But once the bridge loan is paid off, the company will still owe some $19 billion in various types of debt.  And although the company apparently is meeting its cash-interest payments with ease, the clock is ticking on its non-cash notes -- to the tune of about $1.4 billion of accrued interest this year, with the amounts expected to rise to about $2.3 billion in 1993.  A pivotal test will come in the next 18 months, according to bankers and money managers familiar with the buy-out.  Some time before April 1991, RJR must fix the interest rates on $5.8 billion worth of PIK bonds so the notes trade at par, in accordance with the bonds' terms.  That means if the notes continue trading below their $100 par value -- they are now trading below $80 (excluding accrued interest) -- RJR must boost the bonds' interest rates as high as necessary to drive their market price to $100.  That could require fixing the interest rate as high as 20%, bankers say, especially if the junk-bond market remains weak or deteriorates further.  If RJR does have to raise rates significantly on the PIK debt, it won't cost the company cash for several years.  The bonds will continue to accrue interest in paper until the mid-1990s to late 1990s.  But it could erode the deal's profitability.  For example, a large, accruing debt to bondholders would diminish RJR's value in an initial public offering of stock.  As the transaction was originally structured, about one-third of the PIK debt is due to convert into a 25% stake of RJR equity in 1993, unless 90% of the bond holders decide against conversion.  The key factor in the bond holders' decision will undoubtedly be whether the PIK notes that they are holding are more valuable than a 25% equity stake.  And that, of course, will depend on just how high RJR is forced to fix the interest rate to get the bonds trading up to par.  Moreover, the $4 billion of PIK debt that isn't convertible into equity could be a big drain on returns if the bonds' interest rates have to be fixed higher.  "The higher the reset, the greater the share of the return on equity will accrue to bondholders as opposed to equity holders," said Robert Long, a bond analyst with First Boston Corp.  RJR's executives say they aren't concerned about the troubled junk-bond market yet.  "We certainly wouldn't want to reset those bonds today," said Mr. von der Heyden.  "If the markets don't recover, it will be costly.  But we have until April 28, 1991, to do it."  "I really don't worry about what happens in the bond market from day to day, or even week to week," added Mr. Gerstner, RJR's chairman.  "I think our paper has been well received.  I'm not concerned."  ---  Randall Smith contributed to this article.  Fujitsu Ltd. posted a modest 6.7% gain in unconsolidated pretax profit in the first half ended Sept. 30, the company said.  Pretax profit for the Tokyo computer maker rose to 50.161 trillion yen ($354.4 million) from 47.013 trillion yen a year ago.  Net income rose 18% to 28.461 trillion yen, or 15.87 yen a share, from 24.213 trillion yen, or 13.81 yen a share.  The company said falling sales in its communications division hurt results.  Sales from the division slipped 7.5% to 161.080 trillion yen.  A Fujitsu spokesman said the weaker performance reflected slipping sales to Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp., Japan's domestic telephone monopoly.  Total sales rose 4.7% to 966.471 trillion yen.  Sales of electrical devices rose about 19% to 147.874 trillion yen, while sales in the information systems division gained 5.4% to 657.517 trillion yen.  Enimont S.p.A. said net income totaled 525 billion lire ($390 million) for the first half of 1989.  The Italian chemicals company didn't provide year-earlier figures because it was formed on Jan. 1 as a joint venture between Montedison S.p.A. and state-owned Enichem S.p.A.  A joint statement issued by the two partners said Enimont rang up revenue of 8.2 trillion lire ($6.09 billion), while gross operating profit amounted to 1.4 trillion lire in the opening half of the year.  The statement didn't address the issue of a possible change at the top management as Chairman Lorenzo Necci is expected to be appointed chairman of Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi, succeeding Franco Reviglio whose term expires in November.  ENI, the state energy concern, is Enichem's parent.  According to local news reports, Gabriele Cagliari, a member of ENI's executive council, is a front runner to take over Mr. Necci's post at Enimont.  Imperial Chemical Industries PLC , a major British chemicals and pharmaceuticals concern, said pretax profit in the first nine months of the year rose 9% on growth in pharmaceutical sales.  Pretax profit rose to #1.23 billion ($1.99 billion) from #1.13 billion in the year-earlier period.  The company's pretax profit, however, was hit particularly hard by soft returns in ICI's petrochemical and plastics operations during the third quarter.  Third-quarter pretax profit dropped 12% to #306 million from #347 million in the 1988 period, ICI said.  The results for the third quarter and nine months were worse than expected.  ICI said its nine-month profit after tax, or net profit attributable to shareholders, rose 18% to #744 million from #632 million in the year-earlier period.  Per-share earnings increased 9% to 108.3 pence ($1.75) from 99.7 pence.  The New York Post plans to close down its Sunday edition after launching it just eight months ago with much fanfare.  Peter Kalikow, owner and publisher of the Post, announced that he would discontinue the edition, which he initially started in the hopes of luring upscale readers and retail advertisers that shunned the more sensational tabloid in favor of the New York Times and the Daily News.  Industry observers and analysts still are unsure whether folding the Sunday Post will guarantee that the paper will survive.  When Rupert Murdoch sold the paper to Mr. Kalikow, it was posting losses of $10 million a year by conservative estimates.  In its first 10 weeks, the Sunday edition alone was estimated to have recorded a deficit of as much as $7 million.  Mr. Kalikow and Editor Jerry Nachman assembled employees in the paper's newsroom in lower Manhattan yesterday afternoon to break the news, which had been rumored in recent weeks.  Post executives had denied earlier reports that the Sunday edition was closing down.  Mr. Kalikow said the death of the Sunday paper is no indication that the Post itself is in danger of closing down, as some industry observers have speculated.  By closing down the Sunday Post, he said in a statement, the Post "foresees a profitable year in 1990."  The Post's last Sunday edition will be Nov. 26.  Mr. Kalikow blamed the demise of the Sunday Post on the soft ad market in the New York area and on low circulation.  "The economics just aren't there," he said.  While there has been a wave of new Sunday newspapers launched in small to medium-sized cities in the last decade, the Post was by far the largest newspaper to launch a Sunday edition in years.  While Post executives had expected circulation would reach 500,000, Valerie Salembier, president of the Post, said the Sunday circulation has reached only about 250,000.  "In any other city, 250,000 would be considered great, but it just wasn't enough in New York," said Ms. Salembier.  Ms. Salembier said about 30 people in circulation, ad sales and other business departments would lose their jobs.  "What we don't know about is the number of layoffs on the editorial side," she said.  "The editorial side is more complicated," she added, saying that editorial layoffs will be announced later.  The paper has been particularly hurt by declines in the level of real estate and retail advertising, and by the fact that the Sunday paper could not attract any coupons from national companies.  In late September, the paper announced its was canceling its weekly real estate section.  The section had shrunk from more than 20 pages to six pages recently as a result of declines in advertising.  Months earlier, Mr. Kalikow had already begun to scale back the Sunday Post.  In May, the Post said it would scratch all supplements in the Sunday edition, including USA Weekend magazine, and cut the $1 price to 40 cents.  Ms. Salembier said closing the Sunday paper was a "big disappointment" but the right move.  "We were losing a lot of money.  While Peter {Kalikow} has deep pockets, it makes sense to put our resources into our Monday through Saturday product," she said.  N.V. Philips said third-quarter net profit surged 41% to 227 million guilders ($109.4 million), or 84 guilder cents a share, from 161 million guilders, or 63 cents, a year earlier.  Separately, the Dutch electronics group announced it will spin off about 20% of its PolyGram BV recording subsidiary in an international stock offering.  It said it plans to file the share offer with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and Amsterdam Stock Exchange "within the next few weeks."  It didn't elaborate.  The big earnings improvement reflected extraordinary gains and the accounting impact of subsidiary disposals, as well as restructuring charges, mixed market factors, higher taxes and plunging financing costs and other spending reductions.  The 1989 third-quarter's jump in net profit was aided by a 277 million guilder, or 47.4%, drop in net financing charges.  Disappointments in the quarter included intense competition causing downward price pressure that led to unspecified operating losses in two key product lines, especially in the U.S.  As a result, Philips's pretax operating profit before financing items tumbled 15.7% from a year earlier to 592 million guilders.  Third-quarter sales world-wide were unchanged from a year ago at 13.57 billion guilders.  Bolar Pharmaceutical Co., under pressure from the Food and Drug Administration, agreed to recall its generic version of the antibiotic drug Macrodantin from retail shelves, according to FDA officials.  It was another setback for Bolar, the flagship of the generic drug industry.  Earlier this month, Bolar began recalling its nitrofurantoin macrocrystalline capsules from wholesalers and distributors because of FDA evidence suggesting that the company passed off Macrodantin as its own to obtain FDA approval to market its generic product.  At that time, however, the company balked at a retail recall, arguing that the evidence wasn't sufficient to justify such a move.  But on Oct. 25, the FDA offered additional evidence to buttress its case that the brand-name drug had been substituted for Bolar's product in pre-market testing, FDA officials said yesterday.  The agency now has evidence that Bolar submitted Macrodantin as its generic version for testing not only at PharmaKinetics Laboratories Inc., Baltimore, but also at an independent laboratory in Canada.  FDA investigators obtained a sample of the Bolar drug from the Canadian lab, according to FDA official Michael Shaffer.  "It turned out to be the brand-name product," he said.  In Copiague, N.Y., Robert Shulman, president of Bolar, and sales director Karen Sattig couldn't be reached for comment.  The inspector general's office of the Health and Human Services Department already is conducting a criminal investigation of whether Bolar filed "false information" with the FDA in seeking clearance to market at least two generic drugs.  Meanwhile, the FDA is moving to withdraw its approval of Bolar's nitrofurantoin macrocrystalline capsules, which are used primarily to treat urinary-tract infections.  The brand-name drug is manufactured by Norwich Eaton, a subsidiary of Cincinnati-based Procter & Gamble Co.  Although no health problems are known to have been caused by Bolar's product, the FDA officials said the agency can no longer ensure that it is the equivalent of Macrodantin.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Bolar closed at $14.375, down 50 cents.  Ford Motor Co. Ltd., the U.K. unit of Ford Motor Co., said it offered its hourly workers a 15% raise in wages over two years as a first offer in contract talks.  A Ford spokesman said 33,000 manual workers at the company's 21 plants in the U.K. have been offered 8% in the first year and 7% in the second year.  But Charlie Whelan, an official of the Amalgamated Engineering Union, said the offer was rejected by union leaders as "totally unacceptable."  The Ford wage settlement will be watched closely as a barometer of wage inflation in the U.K.  The annual underlying average increase in wages is currently running at about 8.75%, and overall inflation at about 7.6%.  Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher urged companies not to give in to demands that would aggravate inflation.  Union leaders earlier this month lodged a claim for a "significant" raise, aimed at bringing Ford's hourly wages in line with the motor company's European plants.  The unions haven't made a counter-demand to Ford.  They recently rejected Vauxhall Motors Ltd.'s offer of a 9.1% raise, made as part of a two-year package.  Two exchanges' new stock "basket" products got off to a slow start yesterday.  The New York Stock Exchange's Exchange Stock Portfolio, which allows investors to trade all 500 stocks in Standard & Poor's index in a single transaction, received permanent regulatory approval Wednesday.  However, the Securities and Exchange Commission will review three rules regarding Big Board's basket trading over the next six months.  The SEC also approved the Chicago Board Options Exchange's basket product.  Both exchanges will compete for institutional business in the months ahead, and one probably will emerge as the dominant market for stock baskets.  Only nine ESP contracts traded on the Big Board -- equivalent to about one million shares of stock, with a value of about $45 million.  "It was a slow start, but we expected it would be," said Big Board President Richard Grasso.  "We were generally pleased with the way the systems acted."  At the CBOE, 14 baskets traded -- the equivalent of about 500,000 shares with a value of about $24 million.  The CBOE's basket requires a minimum of $1.7 million a trade, compared with a $5 million minimum for the Big Board basket.  David Hall, vice president at the CBOE, said five to six firms traded the stock basket product, located on the floor of the CBOE near the S&P 500-stock index options pit.  Bond investors sat on the sidelines yesterday, paying little attention to falling stock prices and the government's latest gross national product report.  "This was a bit surprising," said John Lonski, an economist at Moody's Investors Service Inc.  He said that in recent weeks, such news has often set a positive tone for the bond market.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 39.55 points to close at 2613.73.  Meanwhile, the government reported that third-quarter real gross national product, the inflation-adjusted value of the nation's goods and services, rose at an annual rate of 2.5% in the third quarter.  Although the rate of growth was unchanged from the second quarter, economists said the new GNP report had an ominous tone.  Among other things, the report showed a sharp deterioration in export trade, which had been a major source of strength for the economy.  Bond investors didn't show much reaction to the news.  As a result, the benchmark 30-year Treasury bond, which meandered for most of the day, ended little changed.  Mortgage-backed securities moved slightly higher, and investment-grade corporate bonds ended unchanged.  In the junk bond market, most prices were unchanged to slightly lower.  But there was one notable exception.  The junk bonds of RJR Nabisco, which have been whipsawed in recent months for a variety of reasons, fell sharply yesterday on rumors of possible problems with RJR's pending $1.48 billion sale of its Del Monte canned foods unit to a group led by Merrill Lynch & Co. However, late yesterday, a spokesman for Merrill Lynch said the planned sale is on track.  Proceeds from the Del Monte sale would account for a portion of the $5 billion worth of bank debt RJR had planned to repay by Feb. 9.  RJR bonds closed one to two points lower, or off between $10 to $20 for each $1,000 face amount.  RJR's 13 1/2% subordinated debentures maturing in 2001 were off 1/2 at 101, while its 14.7% convertible pay-in-kind securities finished the day down 1 7/8 at 86.  In the municipal market, institutional selling drove prices sharply lower.  The municipal market has been struggling for weeks to absorb large customer "bid-wanted" lists, or sell orders.  But dealers said inventories now are full and bids for bonds are getting soft.  Among others, a bid-wanted list totaling about $109 million circulated yesterday.  It followed a $223 million sell list handled by Chemical Securities Inc. Wednesday and at least three other lists in that size range within the past two weeks.  Traders said the bonds appear to be coming from a range of investors, with commercial banks among the leading sellers.  Tax law changes that go into effect later this year make municipal holdings less attractive to certain investors.  Municipal market participants also remain concerned that property and casualty insurers may be forced to lighten their tax-exempt holdings as a result of claims stemming from Hurricane Hugo and the Northern California earthquake.  Treasury, Agency Securities  The Treasury market could get an unexpected $17 billion of new supply next week.  Late yesterday, a Treasury official said the department may take the unprecedented step of borrowing $17 billion to avoid default on certain obligations unless Congress assures by 1 p.m. EDT today that it will raise the debt limit, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  If assurance isn't given, the official said the Treasury might raise the money by adding to the weekly Treasury bill issue or through a cash-management bill issue.  The official said Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady indicated the possible move in a letter dated yesterday to House Minority Leader Robert Michel (R., Ill.).  Separately, the $4.52 billion of Resolution Funding Corp. bonds sold Wednesday were quoted late yesterday at 99 19/32, down 1/8 from the auction average.  Much of the Refcorp issue was purchased by four large securities firms that had planned to repackage the bonds.  But yesterday, some dealers said the repackaged bonds were selling slowly.  The benchmark 30-year bond ended at about 102 21/32, compared with 102 22/32 Wednesday.  The yield was unchanged at 7.88%.  The 10-year notes ended at about 100 23/32, compared with 100 24/32.  The yield was unchanged at 7.87%.  Mortgage-, Asset-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities were 1/32 to 4/32 point higher, with Government National Mortgage Association 10 1/2% securities the top-performing issue.  Dealers said the 10 1/2% securities rose in response to a $500 million purchase by a bank for its mortgage portfolio.  The dealers noted that the securities, which gained 4/32 to 104 1/32, have been relatively weak recently because high-coupon securities aren't favored in rising markets.  Thus, the issue has quite a high yield.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities were at 98 5/8 late yesterday, up 2/32, and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities were at 97 3/4, up 1/32.  The yield spread of the Ginnie Mae 9% issue over the 10-year Treasury note narrowed 0.01 percentage point to 1.45.  In derivative markets, the Federal National Mortgage Association issued a $500 million real estate mortgage investment conduit backed by its 9% securities through Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  In other matters, Maryland National Bank, a unit of Baltimore-based MNC Financial Inc., became the first commercial bank to issue securities backed by home-equity lines of credit.  The $267 million transaction was underwritten by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds rose for the fourth consecutive day, buoyed by a firm pound and further weakness in British stocks.  But later, after trading had basically ended, the pound declined sharply on the unexpected resignation of Nigel Lawson, Chancellor of the Exchequer.  The Treasury 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 10/32 to 112 30/32 to yield 9.95%, while the 12% notes due 1995 were up 3/32 at 104 11/32 to yield 10.86%.  Japanese government bonds ended lower after quiet trading, pulled down in part by the sale of 500 billion yen ($3.53 billion) of new one-year bonds.  They were priced at 99.58 to yield 5.163% with a coupon rate of 5.1%.  The rate compares with a 4.9% coupon at the previous auction in August.  In response to the auction, Japan's No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 95.33, down 0.20, to yield 5.39%.  West German bonds ended lower in quiet trading.  Bonn's 7% bonds due October 1999 fell 0.10 to 99.95 to yield 7.01%.  Municipals  Details of New York City's forthcoming bond offering were released yesterday.  As described in the preliminary official statement, the city will offer $729 million of tax-exempt bonds tentatively structured as serial bonds maturing in 1989 to 2008.  The city also plans to sell $57.8 million of taxable municipal bonds at the same time, possibly maturing in 1994, 2004, 2009 and 2010.  The bulk of the taxable bonds are in the two longest maturities, which are tentatively to total $26.9 million each.  In the secondary market, New York City 7% bonds due 2014 were offered priced to yield 7.70%, while 7 1/2% bonds due 2007 were offered at 98 to yield 7.71%.  Among active issues, New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.20% bonds due 2018 were off 1/4 point at 98 1/4 bid to yield 7.35%.  Corporate Issues  Most corporate bonds were unchanged to slightly lower.  New-issue volume dropped off sharply from Wednesday.  Among the issuers that tapped the debt market yesterday was Tenneco Credit Corp.  The subsidiary of Tenneco Inc. offered $150 million of seven-year senior notes priced to yield 9.324%.  The issue was sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  A New York bankruptcy judge has temporarily stopped the Resolution Trust Corp. from placing an insolvent thrift institution under government control.  Deltacorp, the holding company that owns the thrift, contends that the federal law empowering the RTC to place failing savings and loan associations under government control conflicts with the federal bankruptcy law, Chapter 11.  Deltacorp has a bankruptcy petition pending in New York.  The company is scheduled to appear before federal bankruptcy Judge Tina L. Brozman Thursday to ask her to impose a 60-day preliminary injunction on the Office of Thrift Supervision, the enforcement arm of the RTC. Deltacorp hopes within 60 days it will be able to sell the thrift, says its lawyer David M. Friedman, a partner with Gordon Hurwitz Butowsky Weitzen Shalov & Wein in New York.  If Deltacorp prevails, similarly situated companies will be able to use Chapter 11 to thwart President Bush's program to restructure the trouble S&L industry.  Under Chapter 11, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Passed early this year, the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act authorizes the RTC to declare troubled thrift institutions insolvent and place them in receivership.  The RTC can then close the thrift institution and sell it whole or in parts.  Established three months ago, the RTC has taken over 256 thrifts valued at $95.6 billion.  The RTC was on the verge of placing Colonial Savings Bank of Roselle, N.J., a subsidiary of Deltacorp, into receivership.  This week Deltacorp persuaded Judge Brozman to issue a temporary restraining order, arguing that before its thrift was taken over the apparent conflict between the two federal laws should be resolved.  According to Mr. Friedman, the RTC's pending takeover would impair the company's ability under Chapter 11 to recoup loses by putting its subsidiary up for bid.  Mr. Friedman claims Deltacorp estimates that by selling the thrift it could make about $23 million.  If the government sells the thrift, the company will make far less, he contends.  "If the court were to issue the injunction, it would set a significant precedent," says Mr. Friedman, who says he doesn't know how many other companies are in a position to use the bankruptcy law as a shelter against RTC takeovers.  Jerome Kowalski, a partner with Parker Chapin Flattau & Klimpl who has clients in situations similar to Deltacorp, says lawyers would be "foolish not to tell clients to follow" the Deltacorp strategy.  The Office of Thrift Supervision failed to return numerous phone calls.  ---  REAGAN TOOK more than 10 months on average to nominate federal judges.  That's the conclusion of a study by Daniel Meador, a law professor at the University of Virginia.  Mr. Meador, a former assistant attorney general, criticizes what he calls "inordinate delays" in filling federal judgeships and suggests the creation of a permanent office on judicial nominations within the Justice Department.  Federal judges in Washington, D.C., and other areas complained recently that long-standing vacancies have contributed to mounting backlogs of cases.  Forty-five federal judgeships are vacant nationwide.  Mr. Meador, whose study appears in the fall issue of the University of Virginia's Journal of Law & Politics, writes that "it is not rare for two or more years to pass before the administration sends a nomination to the Senate."  His study covers the years 1979 to 1988.  Under Attorney General Dick Thornburgh, a committee of ten senior Justice Department officials evaluate potential judicial nominees and send recommendations to the White House.  Congressional Democrats have accused Mr. Thornburgh of delaying the nomination process.  But a spokesman for the the attorney general said the Senate Judiciary Committee contributed to the problem by failing to act on nominations made during the final months of the Reagan administration.  ---  U.S. DISTRICT JUDGE upholds New York's "Son of Sam" law.  The state law, designed to prevent lawbreakers from profitting from such things as books and movies about their crimes, survived its first federal challenge in a ruling by Judge John F. Keenan in federal court in New York.  Simon & Schuster Inc. sued to have the law declared unconstitutional, claiming it restricts publishers' freedom of speech.  The company filed the suit in 1986 after the "Son of Sam" law was applied to "Wiseguy: Life in a Mafia Family," a best-seller by Nicholas Pileggi.  The book was based on the life of Henry Hill, whom the court refers to as a "career criminal" and who received payments from the publisher in return for his life story.  Simon & Schuster said many books about criminal activities would never be published if criminals couldn't be paid for their stories, and that this had a chilling effect on the publishing industry.  But Judge Keenan said, "Although it may be more difficult for publishers and authors to create books with the cooperation of a criminal source {under the "Son of Sam" law}, it is not impossible nor is such cooperation proscribed."  The judge added, "The speech itself is not the target of {the state law}; the profit-making aspect is the target."  A spokeswoman for Simon & Schuster said the New York company would appeal the ruling.  ---  BAKER & McKENZIE Moscow bound.  The Chicago law firm, the world's largest, will open the first Soviet-accredited office of a foreign law firm in Moscow later this year.  Coudert Brothers, a New York law firm, and Arnold & Porter and Heron, Burchette, Ruckert & Rothwell, both in Washington, D.C., have had lawyers in the Soviet Union under the auspices of companies' trade offices or in unofficial capacities.  But 1,400-lawyer Baker & McKenzie will open a full-fledged branch.  The firm will have 46 offices in 27 countries.  It became the first foreign firm with an Eastern European branch when it opened in Budapest two years ago.  Three lawyers, headed by partner Paul J. Melling, will be in Moscow full-time.  Ten lawyers from the firm's other offices will work with them.  Fifteen joint ventures have already signed on as clients, according to Robert W. Cox, chairman of the firm.  ---  ILLINOIS JUDGE joins firm.  After nine years in the state judiciary, William R. Quinlan, 49 years old, has joined the Chicago law firm of Phelan, Pope & John as a partner.  He will specialize in complex commercial and environmental litigation at the 75-lawyer firm.  In a Oct. 23 resignation letter to Illinois Gov. James R. Thompson, Mr. Quinlan said he could no longer sit on the bench and fulfill financial responsibilities to his family.  He said that while education costs and living expenses spiralled, judicial salaries in Illinois haven't increased for four years.  Mr. Quinlan was appointed to the Illinois Appellate Court in 1985.  He served as a Circuit Court judge in Cook County, Ill., and corporation counsel for the city of Chicago.  "The judiciary is called upon to decide the most important issues facing our society.  But we're not spending the money to staff it with the best people we can get or keeping the best people there," says Mr. Quinlan.  ---  DISNEY SUES Amvest for copyright infringement.  Noting that the Happy Hampster isn't one of its creations, Walt Disney Co. filed a $17 million suit in federal court against Amvest Video Corp., of Rahway, N.J.  Disney alleges Amvest violated its copyrights at least 170 times in at least 23 video cassettes, some of them full-length Disney movies such as Bambi and Fantasia.  The suit also alleges Amvest created a character called the Happy Hampster which it is trying to pass off as a Disney character.  In addition to the $17 million in damages -- $100,000 for each copyright infringement -- Disney is seeking unspecified punitive damages.  A spokeswoman for Amvest had no comment and said the company hadn't yet seen the suit.  CONFRONTATIONS LOOM between Bush and Democrats in Congress.  The early bipartisanship dissipates as issues become more contentious and the Democrats find their voice.  They begin to blame Bush's insistence on a capital-gains cut for the disarray in the budget process; one White House aide sees a "train wreck" coming.  The Democrats also increasingly lash Bush for timidity on Eastern Europe.  White House advisers formally threaten vetoes of the foreign-aid and child-care bills and informally discuss a possible veto of the defense bill.  Child care could be an especially tough fight; after Bush's veto of abortion funding for rape and incest victims, anti-abortion lawmakers feel extra pressure to show attention to women's concerns.  Bush still tries a personal touch; he golfs with Ways and Means Chairman Rostenkowski and meets privately with Senate Democrats.  A "MUST-SIGN" BILL becomes a magnet for controversial proposals.  To avoid missing Social Security payments, the government must get a raise in its borrowing limit by Nov. 8; the necessity of the measure attracts numerous attempts at adding unrelated measures to it.  Republicans will try to offer the capital-gains cut in the Senate; the Democrats probably have the votes to block it, though some fear brinksmanship on the bill.  Other likely candidates for riders include revision of the Gramm-Rudman law, repeal of catastrophic-illness insurance, child care and other measures that were stripped off the recent budget-reconciliation bill.  Democratic leaders will try to keep them off, fearing that allowing any of them would weaken their argument against capital gains.  BUSH TURNS the failed Panama coup to his advantage, at least for now.  His complaints about secret restrictions on anti-Noriega plots put Congress on the defensive, even though the curbs didn't play a role in the coup's collapse.  Senate intelligence chiefs Boren and Cohen agree with the White House to loosen the rules; CIA agents stand to gain broad leeway to work with rebels, even if a coup might endanger Noriega's life.  The next step: a new covert plan for unseating the dictator.  One possibility is more active American recruitment of rebels who would agree to hand Noriega to the U.S. and install the elected leaders he rebuffed.  The last coup plotters refused to do either.  But Bush's handling of the previous attempt hobbles future efforts.  Noriega has purged potential enemies, and doubts grow about U.S. resolve.  LAWMAKERS' PATIENCE wears thin over the CFTC's slow pace of reform after the "sting" operation that led to the spring indictments of 46 traders at two Chicago exchanges.  Incredulous senators grill Chairman Wendy Gramm about the fact that 11 of the traders are still handling customer accounts.  Nebraska Sen. Kerrey asks her: "Do you work full-time at this job?"  THE PENTAGON BALKS at Darman's budget strategy of threatening to make the automatic Gramm-Rudman cuts permanent.  Pentagon brass worry it could mean sharp cutbacks in training, acquisition of spare parts and weapons development.  "The impact for us could be appreciably worse than OMB has admitted in its maneuvering with Congress," says a Pentagon budget aide.  NEW ALLY: Attorney General Thornburgh, back from the U.S.S.R., reports that the Soviets are now providing assistance and intelligence to the U.S. on international drug trafficking.  In exchange, the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration is training several Soviet agents in drug enforcement.  ORGAN-TRANSPLANT DOCTORS worry at HHS moves to assert control over the transplant system, currently overseen by a nonprofit group under federal contract.  The department decides to impose a 10-step review on new transplant policies.  Dr. Robert Corry, who heads the nonprofit group, says the move will "stifle innovative changes" and slow medical progress; he hopes to negotiate a compromise.  ABORTION POLITICS shape legal as well as electoral agendas.  Illinois Attorney General Neil Hartigan, whose gubernatorial campaign is under pressure from pro-choice forces, pursues a settlement of the current Supreme Court case challenging the state's tough restrictions on abortion clinics.  Agreement would sharply reduce the stakes in the court this term; the two remaining cases don't as directly challenge Roe vs.  Wade.  Pennsylvania's new abortion law almost certainly will provide a Supreme Court test, but probably not until next year.  Abortion-rights activists plan a new series of major marches next month, but their biggest boost would come with a gubernatorial victory in Virginia, where black nominee Wilder is riding the pro-choice issue hard.  The National Abortion Rights Action League, already running ads for Wilder, hits the airwaves today for New Jersey Democratic candidate Florio.  MINOR MEMOS: Among documents in the HUD scandal: a handwritten 1987 letter from presidential son Jeb Bush to Deborah Dean, a central figure in the scandal, wishing her "every success in trying to clean up the federal government's act." . . .  GOP Rep. Bentley writes business PACs promising to "lead the battle" against President Bush's proposal to abolish them -- and asking for money for her 1990 campaign. . . .  Sen. Mitchell's advice to visiting Supreme Soviet members drawing up rules for their legislature: "Don't copy ours."  An American Telephone & Telegraph Co. unit, AT&T Nassau Metals Corp., said it was soliciting bids for its Gaston, S.C., and Chandler, Ariz., metal-processing operations, which produce annual revenue of about $400 million.  The unit didn't disclose any asking price, and an AT&T spokesman in Parsippany, N.J., said he couldn't supply one.  An industry analyst, Robert B. Morris III in Goldman, Sachs & Co.'s San Francisco office, said the value of the operations isn't clear because AT&T hasn't disclosed their book value or earnings.  AT&T Nassau said the operations on the block are no longer "strategic to the core business" of the company, which is telecommunications.  The Gaston operation processes metal scrap and supplies copper rod, largely to AT&T itself.  Also on the block is a small metal chopping operation in Chandler.  Increasingly, copper-based technology has been superseded by light-wave technology, Mr. Morris said.  PaineWebber Group Inc. ordered a major pullback from program trading amid mounting pressure on Wall Street from some of its biggest investors.  Other big brokerage firms also showed signs of retreating from controversial computer-assisted trading, which has become a liability for Wall Street after this month's 190-point, Friday-the-13th plunge in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  Yesterday, Goldman, Sachs & Co. said it will campaign for significant curbs on the most common form of program trading -- stock-index arbitrage.  Also, other firms including American Express Co.'s Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. unit and Oppenheimer & Co. -- are debating whether to follow PaineWebber's lead and pull back from program trading.  And Sears, Roebuck & Co.'s Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. unit, which used to be the 10th-biggest program trader on the New York Stock Exchange, said it is sending a program-bashing letter to more than two million clients over the next month, among other actions that may include a nationwide advertising campaign.  "Program trading is simply an idea whose time has passed," said Dean Witter Chairman Philip J. Purcell.  Program trading, which last month accounted for a record 13.8% of New York Stock Exchange volume, refers to a variety of computer-assisted trading of large amounts of stocks, stock-index futures and options.  Much of the trading is geared to short-term gains caused by brief price swings in volatile markets.  Wall Street pulled back briefly from program trading after the October 1987 stock crash.  But then it charged back in, emboldened by post-crash studies that exonerated program trading from causing the crash (though not from causing big price swings).  And now it's reeling from a renewed outcry -- this time not only from small individual investors, but from major institutions that control big trading commissions.  The criticism came to a head Tuesday when Kemper Corp., a big insurance and financial-services firm, cut off four Wall Street firms that engage in program trading -- Oppenheimer, General Electric Co.'s Kidder, Peabody & Co., Morgan Stanley & Co. and Bear, Stearns & Co. -- from getting any more of Kemper's stock-trading business.  Other big investors are following Kemper's lead.  Yesterday, another institutional investor -- Keystone Group Inc., a Boston mutual-fund company -- said it will boycott firms that engage in index arbitrage.  The firm manages $2.5 billion in stock mutual funds.  "These firms, by using proprietary index-arbitrage trading techniques, have been competing with their own customers," said Albert H. Elfner III, president of Keystone.  "Their actions can hurt long-term, fundamentally oriented investors, and have undermined public trust in the fairness of the markets."  Another institutional investor, Penn Mutual Life Insurance Co., said it might join Kemper in avoiding program-trading brokerage firms.  Such companies as Keystone, Kemper and Penn Mutual are dependent on business from small investors, who have been peppering them with complaints about program trading and have retreated from the financial markets since the 1987 crash.  "We haven't decided to blacklist any firms.  But there's a chance we might," said David Wilson, head of Penn Mutual's $100 million stock portfolio.  "We are very upset about what has happened to the stock market.  Program trading is almost like sitting on a calm beach and have a tidal wave hit you."  Penn Mutual owns the regional brokerage firm Janney Montgomery Scott Inc. in Philadelphia.  Yesterday, several officials from Janney visited the New York Stock Exchange to lobby against program trading.  The firm's executive committee is considering drafting an anti-program-trading letter to its clients and to Congress.  Donald B. Marron, PaineWebber chairman and chief executive officer, said the firm decided after the close of trading yesterday that it would stop doing index arbitrage for clients.  It already had ceased that form of trading for its own account.  "It seems clear to us that index arbitrage is a big contributor to {the market's} volatility and it's reducing confidence in the market for institutional and retail clients," Mr. Marron said.  He said index arbitrage is "clearly, purely a speculative, hedging arbitrage strategy" that is "contributing to excess volatility."  PaineWebber, the fifth-biggest program trader on the Big Board so far this year, will continue to engage in other forms of program trading besides index arbitrage, and indeed is Wall Street's foremost practitioner of non-arbitrage forms of program trading in terms of volume.  But Mr. Marron said these other forms of program trading, such as using computers to buy or sell a range of stocks but not stock futures, help bring "liquidity" to the market.  Goldman, which doesn't do index arbitrage for itself but does for customers, is concerned about the fallout.  "Our corporate, institutional and individual clients are concerned about what they perceive to be excessive volatility," said Robert E. Mnuchin, senior partner in charge of Goldman's equity trading.  "We share their concern.  Consequently, we will recommend {to regulators} significant curbs on electronic access for waves of stocks which add volatility to the markets."  He declined to comment further.  Shearson, the 11th-biggest program trader, also doesn't do index arbitrage for itself.  Yet some officials at a regular management meeting Wednesday night urged the firm's leaders to pull out of the practice completely, to appease small investors.  "The question was: Do we get mileage out of not doing it for clients?" said a Shearson official.  But so far, "the answer is no."  Oppenheimer, a relatively minor program trader, is also reviewing its index-arbitrage operation.  Not only was it stung by Kemper's boycott, but it suffered an approximate $2.5 million index-trading loss during the Friday-the-13th plunge.  An Oppenheimer spokesman said index chief David Liptak had left the firm and wouldn't be replaced.  For the time being, James Wiess, an associate of Mr. Liptak's, "is now our index arbitrager," said the spokesman.  The program-trading debate has caused splits even within some Wall Street brokerage firms.  At Kidder Peabody, for example, the firm's leaders staunchly defend its aggressive use of index arbitrage for both Kidder's own account and for customers.  Kidder is the most active index arbitrager on the Big Board so far this year, trading about two million shares a day in the strategy.  However, Kidder's 1,400 brokers aren't so sure about index arbitrage.  Said Charles V. Sheehan, Kidder's managing director in charge of retail business: "To try to talk to {stockbrokers} about the virtues of program trading is like trying to talk about the virtues of nuclear power to the Audubon Society."  He conceded "there is a little bit of a conflict there" between Kidder's active program trading and its wooing of individual investors.  There's a similar split at Merrill Lynch & Co., the Big Board's 3rd-biggest program-trading firm.  Although a Merrill spokesman stressed the firm does program trading only for clients -- "These are our clients and we have a responsibility to them" -- the argument doesn't go over on the firm's front lines.  Program trading is "scaring small investors away," said Michael Keyes, a Merrill broker in Ogden, Utah.  The New York Stock Exchange insists it remains sympathetic to the individual investor.  Richard Grasso, Big Board president, said "it's too early to reflect on the comments" made this week by Kemper and the other program-bashing firms.  But, "we value our relationships with those who use the marketplace and are certainly sensitive to their needs and desires."  When Kemper cut off four program-trading Wall Street firms from getting any of the big insurance and financial company's trading business, it complained that the Big Board has "vested interests" in its big member securities firms that engage in program trading. ---  Christopher J. Chipello in Boston contributed to this article.  @ Top Program Traders  Average monthly program trading volume for 1989 through September, in millions of shares  @ STOCK-INDEX OTHER  @FIRM ARBITRAGE STRATEGIES TOTAL  @Morgan Stanley 30.3 25.7 56.0  @Kidder Peabody 37.8 15.4 53.1  @Merrill Lynch 18.1 19.1 37.1  @Salomon Brothers 7.7 27.8 35.3  @PaineWebber 3.8 29.4 33.2  @Bear Stearns 16.6 10.1 26.6  @Susquehanna 20.7 1.5 22.2  @Goldman Sachs 2.5 15.6 18.1  @LIT America 17.3 0.2 17.5  @First Boston 10.4 5.2 15.7  Source: New York Stock Exchange  National Medical Enterprises Inc., Los Angeles, said the completion of the spinoff of its long-term care operations will be delayed until early next year because of regulatory complexities.  The health-care services concern announced the spinoff plan last January, then revised it in May and said it hoped to complete it by Nov. 30.  But the process involves relicensing and other transfers for about 360 separate nursing-home facilities in more than 30 states, the company said, adding that it now plans for the transaction to be completed by Feb. 28.  The new company, Hillhaven Corp., is expected to have about $150 million in equity, a 2-1 debt-to-equity ratio and to be 10%-owned by NME.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, National Medical shares closed at $36.125, down 25 cents.  London share prices closed sharply lower Thursday after the market's confidence in U.K. corporate profits was shaken severely by bellwether Imperial Chemical Industries PLC's disappointing earnings in the third quarter.  Stocks rose in Tokyo for the first time since Monday, and ended mixed in Frankfurt.  In London, ICI, which is part of the Financial Times 100-share index, said its pretax profit for the quarter dropped 12%, significantly worse than market expectations.  Its profit for the first nine months of the year rose only 9%, also short of market expectations.  As ICI's share price fell, the 100-share index followed.  The index closed at its intraday low of 2129.4, down 32.5 points.  "ICI is a bellwether of U.K. corporate profitability," a senior dealer with Warburg Securities said.  "Its results were disappointing.  The market followed."  The 30-share index fell 31.4 points to close at 1720.5.  Volume was 443.6 million shares traded, better than 374.6 million Wednesday, but still a relatively thin session.  ICI finished 73 pence a share lower at #10.97 ($17.70) on turnover of 3.4 million shares.  Analysts had anticipated soft earnings in petrochemicals and plastics, but said they were surprised by trading losses in ICI's specialty paints and films operations.  Dealers and analysts also said that ICI's troubles in specialty paints helped underscore growing worries over the U.S. economy.  ICI's paint operations are heavily involved in the U.S.  Those concerns were fortified by Wall Street's continued slide, with the Dow Jones Industrial Average down 35.25 points at 2618.03 when London closed.  In other shares, U.K. textile group Tootal rose 7 to 120 pence on conditional clearance from regulators for Coats Viyella's bid for Tootal, so long as Coats spins off its U.K. sewing thread business.  Coats slid 5 to 142.  Tokyo stocks rebounded sharply from two consecutive daily losses, helped by index-related buying by investment funds in the afternoon session.  The Nikkei index closed up 236.09 points at 35678.49.  The Tokyo stock price index of first section issues was up 25.01 at 2697.58.  First section volume was estimated at 850 million shares, down from 1.1 billion Wednesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index rose 36.36 points to 35714.85.  On Thursday, the market opened in a bullish mood with participation from institutional investors, who had refrained from active trading in the past couple of months.  Market observers attributed improved sentiment to the recent stability of the dollar, which offset expectations that the U.S. currency might surge above the 145-150 yen level.  The Nikkei continued to gain during the afternoon session, briefly reaching above its recent record level.  Trading focused on large-capitalization issues that are related to domestic demand and made a sharp contrast to export-related shares.  Export shares were spurned because of continuing uncertainty on Wall Street, said Shin Tokoi, deputy general manager of Japanese equities at County Natwest Securities, Japan.  Outstanding winners Thursday were non-life insurance and securities companies.  Yasuda Fire & Marine advanced 90 yen to 1,680 yen ($11.90).  Taisho Marine & Fire was up 80 at 1,620, and Tokio Marine & Fire advanced 40 to 2,230.  Securities companies also made across-the-board gains as recent increases in stock trading volume are expected to boost their commission income, traders said.  Yamaichi Securities gained 120 to 1,940, Nomura Securities surged 260 to 3,450, and Nikko Securities gained 110 to 1,940.  Steel shares also ended higher.  Sumitomo Metal was up 22 to 703, and Nippon Steel advanced 24 to 735.  Frankfurt prices ended mixed in thin trading after an early rally led by Deutsche Bank fizzled during the session.  The DAX index, which reached a peak around 1500 early in the day, closed at 1482.62, up only 1.54 points from Wednesday.  Deutsche Bank surged at the opening on news that the bank has 10% holdings in several large companies, including insurer Allianz and reinsurer Munich Re.  Because the shares are kept at the historically lowest value on the books, they constitute huge hidden reserves, traders said.  The disclosure late Wednesday came as Deutsche Bank announced the issue of 1.2 million new shares for placement in the Tokyo market.  Deutsche Bank jumped 28.5 marks early in the session, pulling the broader market along, traders said.  But profit-taking soon wiped out these gains, traders said.  While Deutsche Bank was still 12 marks higher at 657 ($358) at the close, most other blue-chip shares had small losses.  Traders said the late decline points to a deep sense of unease in the market.  Many investment funds have already closed their books for the year, a dealer said.  "People have made excellent profits in the first 10 months, and they don't want to risk that any more.  The mood is very cautious, so I don't think we will go firmer any time soon."  But other traders said there are good buying opportunities at the lower levels because the market should soon pull out of its slump.  They pointed to last year's example, when the stock market staged a major rally just before the Christmas holidays.  Among other banks, Dresdner Bank gained 1.5 to 321.5 after receiving official authorization to acquire Banque Internationale de Placement in France, but Commerzbank slipped 0.5 to 246.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Zurich, lower in Paris, Brussels, Milan and Amsterdam, and mixed in Stockholm.  Stocks closed higher in Sydney, Taipei, Wellington and Seoul, lower in Hong Kong and Singapore and mixed in Manila.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 24 Oct 23 Year  @U.S. ..................... 316.4 317.1 + 23.5  @Britain................... 643.1 654.3 + 17.8  @Canada.................... 426.4 427.8 + 16.2  @Japan..................... 1550.9 1555.7 + 9.2  @France.................... 521.2 531.2 + 17.7  @Germany................... 241.0 242.4 + 15.9  @Hong Kong................. 2068.9 2070.9 + 1.9  @Switzerland............... 216.5 220.7 + 25.2  @Australia................. 329.4 333.1 + 13.5  @World index............... 533.4 534.9 + 7.9  Paramount Pictures Corp., New York, named Arthur Cohen, executive vice president of advertising at Revlon Inc., as the new president of marketing for its motion picture group.  Movie studios rarely turn outside the industry for marketing executives.  A few years ago, for example, Coca-Cola Co., which owns 49% of Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc., sent one of its soft drink marketing executives, Peter Sealey, to run marketing at the studio.  Mr. Sealey didn't stay long, however, leaving after a series of management changes.  Columbia is in the process of being acquired by Sony Corp.  Mr. Cohen fills a post vacated earlier this year by Sidney Ganis when Mr. Ganis and Paramount's head of distribution, Barry London, were named co-presidents of the motion picture group.  Paramount Pictures is a unit of Paramount Communications Inc.  Prior to joining Revlon in 1986, Mr. Cohen held a number of marketing and advertising posts.  From 1982 to 1985, he was president of the ill-fated Tele1st venture of the ABC Video Enterprises unit of Capital Cities/ABC Inc. Tele1st attempted to sell movies via a service that enabled subscribers with videocassette recorders to tape movies delivered on a special scrambled channel overnight.  New Hampshire Yankee Co., operator of the Seabrook, N.H., nuclear power facility, said the Nuclear Regulatory Commission fined it $50,000 in connection with improper procedures in shutting down the plant during low-power testing last June.  Edward A. Brown, president of New Hampshire Yankee, said it accepts the decision and will pay the fine.  He noted that the NRC called the event an "aberration" and never questioned the safety of the plant.  In June, the plant's No. 2 executive, George Thomas, was fired because of improper control-room procedures at the plant before the shutdown.  New Hampshire Yankee is 35.6%-owned by Public Service Co. of New Hampshire.  Braniff Inc. said it has retained Merrill Lynch Capital Markets to advise it on alternatives -- including a possible sale -- as the cash-strapped airline maneuvers through bankruptcy-law court proceedings.  The carrier, a unit of BIA-COR Holding Inc., sought Chapter 11 protection Sept. 28, a day after it abruptly canceled flights and laid off 2,800 employees.  Braniff, which had launched ambitious expansion plans over the past year, blamed its difficulties on the collapse of expected financing.  It was Braniff's second bankruptcy-law filing in a decade.  The carrier sought Chapter 11 protection in 1982, emerging with new owners -- the Pritzker family -- who sold it in 1988 to a group of real estate investors.  A bankruptcy court in Orlando, Fla., where the case is being heard, approved Braniff's request to retain Merrill Lynch.  Braniff currently operates 46 daily flights to 11 cities.  Before the filing, it flew to more than 40 cities.  Michael B. Jager, a construction industry consultant, was elected a director of this natural gas utility and its savings and loan subsidiary, PriMerit Bank.  He succeeds Edward M. Berol, who retired.  Rio Algom Ltd. said it agreed to acquire Uranium Resources Inc. for $2.55 a share, or about $66 million.  Rio Algom, a Toronto-based mining concern, said the transaction is subject to a comprehensive review of the Dallas-based company's business and the signing of a definitive agreement.  Uranium Resources earlier this month said it had signed a non-binding letter of intent for the acquisition of all of its shares but didn't identify the proposed purchaser.  The closely held uranium producer also said it agreed to pay Rio Algom $2 million plus expenses if the proposed deal isn't completed and Uranium Resources enters certain other transactions.  Rio said the proposed acquisition reflects its expectation that uranium prices will begin to pick up in coming months from their recent depressed state.  Separately, Rio Algom said it agreed to pay Whittaker Corp. of Los Angeles $30 million to acquire Whittaker Metals, a metals distribution business with four facilities in the Southwest region.  Rio said Whittaker Metals' geographical base complements Rio's Vincent Metals business, with outlets mainly in central and southeastern states.  Brunswick Corp. posted a third-quarter loss of $103.1 million, or $1.17 a share, reflecting a $100 million pretax charge due to the restructuring of its marine products group.  In the year-earlier third quarter, the Skokie, Ill.-based company earned $43.2 million, or 50 cents a share.  Sales fell 18% to $627.7 million from $767.9 million.  Brunswick said a 28% decline in its marine sales during the quarter reflected the continued industrywide decline in domestic retail sales of marine products.  Brunswick also has interests in defense and aerospace products.  The company said the charge, which amounts to $79.2 million after taxes, reflects the write-off of certain assets and the estimated costs associated with the reorganization.  In July, the company said it would begin scaling back manufacturing operations in its marine group and reduce the group's work force by 20%, or about 4,000 employees.  For the nine months, Brunswick had a loss of $65.4 million, or 74 cents a share, compared with net income of $176.1 million, or $2 a share.  Sales fell to $2.19 billion from $2.53 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Brunswick closed at $14.50, down 37.5 cents.  After more than a year of losing accounts and watching its reputation slide, Ogilvy & Mather's New York office hired away a top creative executive from flashy Chiat/Day/Mojo as its creative head.  Ogilvy, a unit of London-based WPP Group, named Bill Hamilton, 47, to the top creative post in New York.  Mr. Hamilton had been an executive vice president and creative head of Chiat/Day's New York office, known for its funky work for Arrow shirts, Nynex yellow pages and Anne Klein II.  At Ogilvy, he succeeds Norman Berry, who left the agency in June but now plans to return to the parent company, WPP.  Chiat/Day said Lee Clow, the agency's president and chief creative director, will fill in as acting New York creative director until the naming of Mr. Hamilton's successor -- or possibly successors -- within the next few weeks.  Mr. Hamilton faces a daunting task in reviving Ogilvy's stagnant New York office.  Just a few months ago, Maxwell House yanked its $50 million account from the office, following the loss last year of the $40 million Hallmark account.  The office has won just a single piece of new business -- and a tiny one, at that -- this year, and new business wins weren't substantial last year, either.  The office is suffering from "a dead battery," as Alan Gottesman, an analyst with PaineWebber, puts it.  And while it can be turned around, he says, "It ain't easy, and it's been parked underneath a snowdrift for a very long time."  The New York office is just one of many Ogilvy outposts, plenty of which are performing well.  But it is the largest and most visible.  With about $800 million in billings, it's bigger than most entire agencies.  And while it has won praise for some of its creative work, especially for American Express, it hasn't been able to attract substantial new business.  Ogilvy last spring hired Michael Lesser, 47, from Lowe Marschalk to head up the New York operations, but Mr. Lesser hasn't had a strong creative leader to work with him.  Industry executives generally lauded the move to bring in Mr. Hamilton, saying the office needs a kick from the outside.  But they questioned whether there might be a culture clash between buttoned-up Ogilvy and Mr. Hamilton, an 11-year veteran of Chiat/Day's freewheeling, no-walls-no-doors culture.  Mr. Hamilton, after all, presided over -- among other things -- the weird U.B.U. Reebok campaign while at Chiat/Day.  Ogilvy creates more-mainstream ads for clients including American Express, Seagram and Mattel.  But in an interview, Mr. Hamilton said a culture clash "is part of the agenda.  I think they want some infusion of a different attitude about how you go about communicating the advantages of a certain client."  He added, "A certain amount of chaos is very good in agencies."  And he said he hopes within three months to be "playing football in the halls at 5:30 in the afternoon."  Mr. Hamilton talked broadly of some of the changes he'd like to make at Ogilvy.  Chiat/Day is one of the few American agencies to successfully use British account planning -- a method Ogilvy attempted briefly and largely unsuccessfully, and which Mr. Hamilton hopes to ultimately bring with him.  In account planning, an executive with a research background represents the consumer, working closely with creative and account executives.  Mr. Hamilton also said he might also bring over some Chiat/Day veterans, though from non-New York offices.  Mr. Hamilton accepted the job after repeated discussions not just with Mr. Lesser, but with WPP Group's chief executive officer, Martin Sorrell, who has taken a hands-on approach with his acquisition.  "I probably wouldn't have accepted the job had it not been the combination of Mike {Lesser} and Martin," he said.  "I've always been intrigued by those things people say can't be done.  Most of the wags and the pundits of the world will say it's pretty tough stuff to turn around an agency that's been going in one direction for a long time," he said.  "But I don't think it {the issue} is turning it around -- I think it's getting back to where it was 10 or 15 years ago.  There are pockets of brilliance there now."  ---  Kraft Taps Margeotes  Kraft General Foods Group has asked Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss, a small New York agency, to try its hand at some creative work on a new product.  A Kraft General Foods spokesman said Margeotes has been given an assignment to do "some development work on a venture project."  Executives close to the Glenview, Ill.-based food giant said the work is for a new coffee beverage product currently in development.  Margeotes, whose clients include Godiva and Maccabee beer, has had a string of new business wins.  It recently picked up the ad accounts for Haagen-Dazs, Newsday and for a number of jewelry lines from Crystal Brands.  Separately, the Kraft General Foods spokesman said it selected D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles, New York, to handle its Sealtest Free non-fat ice cream account.  Executives estimated that account is worth about $6 million.  The account had been handled by McCann-Erickson. ---  Ad Notes. . . .   LINTAS LAYOFFS: About 20 people were laid off at Lintas's Ceco Communications subsidiary in Warren, Mich., on Tuesday.  Dick O'Connor, chairman and chief executive of Lintas:Campbell-Ewald, said the office isn't growing as expected.  Heating oil futures prices fell sharply after some market players moved to reduce their exposure to the vagaries of weather.  Balmy autumn days might be blissful for the average Joe, but not for the speculators on the New York Mercantile Exchange who bought heating oil aggressively in September and October, betting on an early, harsh winter.  As October draws to a close, weather is still generally warm in Europe and in the U.S., especially the Northeast where much heating oil is consumed.  In New York Mercantile Exchange trading yesterday, many who had been counting on dips in the mercury started liquidating heating oil.  The selling pushed November heating oil futures contracts 1.2 cents a gallon lower to 57.24 cents, one of the most sizable moves in either direction during the past several trading sessions.  Petroleum futures prices had been caught in a tug-of-war, pulled in one direction by continuing strong demand and in the opposite direction by continuing high output from the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  But yesterday's drop in heating oil pushed crude significantly lower, as well.  West Texas Intermediate, the U.S. benchmark crude, fell 24 cents a barrel to close at $19.38 a barrel for December delivery.  Some traders have said December WTI could well continue downward to as low as $18.50 a barrel.  Even reports of a Persian Gulf incident between former war foes Iran and Iraq failed to shake crude's doldrums.  Shipping industry sources said two Iranian gunboats attacked an Iraqi tugboat near an Iraq offshore oil terminal in the northern part of the gulf.  Details remained sketchy, the sources said, but Iraq reportedly didn't consider the attack to be a hostile act.  Neither did the petroleum markets seem to pay much attention to reports that Alaskan officials had refused to let a Unocal oil tanker dock at a refinery because it didn't have an oil-spill contingency plan approved by the state.  One broker said the markets might have been more bullish had a tanker been refused access to Valdez, the terminal port for the Alaskan pipeline and site last spring of the biggest oil spill in U.S. waters.  Only gasoline managed to escape the slide that dominated other petroleum futures trading.  Unleaded gasoline for November delivery ended yesterday's session .23 cent a gallon higher at 53.63 cents.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: The prices of wheat futures contracts dipped amid reports of beneficial rain in the winter wheat growing regions of Argentina and forecasts for widespread rain this weekend in the U.S. in winter wheat states such as Kansas and Oklahoma, said Victor Lespinasse, a floor broker for Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago.  In the U.S., winter wheat is planted in the fall and harvested in the early summer.  The prices of corn futures contracts rose slightly.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices jumped to life, bestirred by a highly volatile stock market and the resignation of a key figure in the Conservative government of British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher.  December gold climbed above the critical $375-an-ounce level to settle at $375.40, up $3.10.  December silver added 7.7 cents to close at $5.237 an ounce.  January platinum tacked on $3.60 an ounce to settle at $490.  Market analysts said that continued declines and volatility in the stock market contributed generally to enhanced investor interest in precious metals, but that the British political news was the main factor boosting prices: Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson resigned.  Sir Alan Walters, Mrs. Thatcher's economic adviser, also announced that he will resign.  With the metals markets closed in London when the news was announced, a lot of U.K. buying came to the U.S., said Peter Cardillo, commodities trading adviser for Josephthal & Co. in New York.  Mr. Cardillo noted that the drop in the British pound following Mr. Lawson's resignation fueled the metals' rally as investors sought a safe haven.  He said he believes the rally in the metals is going to be very short-lived.  William O'Neill, research director of Elders Futures Inc., said that if December gold can close above $375 for two consecutive days, he would regard that as a bullish sign.  However, he expected any strong rallies to be met by producer selling.  "Both the Soviet Union and South Africa must sell these rallies," he said.  The two countries are major producers of precious metals.  But he also noted that if uncertainty continues in the stock market, that might create some investor interest in precious metals.  That interest has been lacking for a long time, he said.  COPPER: Futures prices fell.  The December contract dropped 1.35 cents to settle at $1.142 a pound.  Mr. O'Neill said copper's price action this week indicates general weakness.  "It easily violated major support at $1.19 and then {yesterday} closed under secondary support at $1.15," he said.  He believes the next area of technical support is at the $1.10 level.  Mr. O'Neill said the market was hit on Wednesday with the news that the atmosphere surrounding the negotiations on the strike at Bougainville, Papua New Guinea, may have improved.  But he said he doubts that a settlement is anywhere in sight.  He also believes that the market may have already discounted any good news that might be associated with this strike.  Mr. Cardillo said that copper is reflecting a weakening U.S. economy and that he would be neither a buyer nor a seller at these levels.  COCOA: Futures prices dropped again, extending the declining trend.  The December contract settled at $961 a metric ton, off $38.  The contract's low point yesterday, $956, was both a life-of-contract low and a 14-year low price for cocoa.  The decline was apparently sparked by rumors that the Ivory Coast, a major African producer, sold 20,000 tons in London on Wednesday.  Mr. O'Neill said the market is so fragile and weak that it can't absorb any selling.  Bert Ruiz, soft commodity specialist at Balfour, Maclaine Futures Inc., said that all week he has seen increasing open interest and declining prices -- an almost certain sign that additional selling of contracts is taking place.  Open interest is the number of outstanding contracts that remain to be settled either by an opposite trade or delivery.  "I think trade interests are hedging their physical cocoa with new sales," he said.  He also pointed out that the volume on Wednesday was 8,839 contracts, which for cocoa is extremely heavy.  Mr. Ruiz said that the producers of cocoa have no choice but to sell their stocks because of their need for hard currencies.  He believes that the major cocoa buyers are well aware of the sad state of the market and are taking advantage of the weakening prices by doing "scale-down buying."  That is, they mostly buy just enough cocoa to satisfy their current needs -- a common strategy in a falling market.  Hercules Inc. put its "nominally profitable" Electronic & Printing Products subsidiary on the auction block, saying the unit doesn't fit in with the diversified chemical company's recent change in strategic goals.  Earlier this year, Hercules decided to sell its peripheral businesses and concentrate its resources on its core chemical businesses, including advanced materials and food ingredients.  The electronic and printing unit, which has annual sales of about $80 million, is the first unit to be sold under the restructuring.  Hercules, based in Wilmington, Del., said it has received "numerous unsolicited inquiries" over the last 18 months about the unit's availability.  It is seeking a buyer who will run the business under current management and "whose strategy is to maintain strong growth."  The subsidiary produces materials used in printing and in the fabrication of printed circuit boards.  Norwegian industrial and energy concern Norsk Hydro A.S. said pretax profit dropped 1.9% to 4.12 billion Norwegian kroner ($599.1 million), or 10.30 kroner a share, in the first nine months from 4.20 billion kroner, or 11 kroner a share, in the corresponding period last year.  Norsk Hydro said group operating income for the first nine months rose 15.5% to 5.35 billion kroner from 4.63 billion kroner a year earlier.  The company said operating profit for oil and gas increased substantially, while operating profit for agriculture, light metals and petrochemicals was weaker than in the same period in 1988.  In the third quarter, per-share earnings were 2.00 kroner, up from 1.60 kroner a year earlier, but lower than the 2.30 kroner to 3.00 kroner expected by analysts.  Chemical Waste Management has turned into one of the market's best-performing stocks by advancing 76% in the past year.  Its reward: a swarm of short sellers.  Short sellers are backwards investors: They borrow stock and sell it, hoping the price will go down.  Eventually the shorts must "cover" by purchasing shares to replace the borrowed ones.  But if a stock declines enough in the meantime, they profit.  What with all the garbage-disposal problems clogging the headlines, it's easy to see why the shares of the nation's largest hazardous-waste concern have zoomed ahead to yesterday's close of a post-split 22 1/8.  But the stock now trades at a dizzying 32 times the latest 12-month earnings for the company, more than double the multiple of the market as a whole.  That handsome multiple, a badge of success, is also a red flag for the shorts, who like to bet that a stock can't stay hot forever.  Between Sept. 15 and Oct. 13, the New York Stock Exchange says, the total number of Chemical Waste Management shares sold short leaped to 5.3 million from 1.9 million -- the largest increase for any stock on the Big Board.  The company says it hasn't any idea who is doing the shorting or why.  A spokesman said he can't comment further because a stock offering is in progress.  The offering will increase the public's stake to 23% and decrease that of the parent company, Waste Management, to 77% from 81%.  Money managers and analysts generally agree that the stock has had a huge run and is now expensive.  Some go further and say that owning it could be . . . well, hazardous.  "We love the company, we expect to be owners again, but we think for the moment it's at least adequately priced," says Gerald Levine, a partner at Weiss, Peck & Greer.  The firm sold much of its Chemical Waste holding earlier this year, government filings show.  Mr. Levine says he can understand short sellers' motivation.  "When they see a stock extend on the end of a long up move, that is often a sign the stock is going to roll over," he says.  Alliance Capital Management, a unit of Equitable Life Assurance Society, has sold at least 927,000 shares this year.  It won't comment on the sales.  Kenneth Hackel, a money manager who runs Cash Flow Investors in Fort Lee, N.J., says Chemical Waste is "not my cup of tea."  It sells for 38 times operating cash flow, he says, while the typical industrial company sells for only 7.7 times that yardstick.  Pricey though it may be, Chemical Waste still is a risky short-sale candidate.  It has a superb record of earnings growth and a strong balance sheet.  Citing those attributes, several well-known short sellers say they aren't the ones doing the shorting.  Shorting because of a high stock price alone is "a recipe for death," said Julian Robertson of Tiger Management in New York.  Chemical Waste Management is "not our kind of short," said Joe Feshbach, one of the three brothers who run Feshbach Brothers, generally considered the nation's largest short-selling firm.  The company, he said, is too well-capitalized to "go away."  But Mr. Feshbach thinks other hazardous-waste companies' stocks "could be a fruitful area {for shorting} because a number of companies have reported disappointing earnings" recently.  He said his firm has shorted the shares of one small company, which he wouldn't name.  Analysts say hazardous-waste companies that have posted disappointing earnings include Canonie Environmental Services, Environmental Systems, Groundwater Technology, Gundle Environmental Systems and Rollins Environmental Services.  But Chemical Waste's earnings for the third quarter were "sparkling," says Kay Hahn, an analyst with Chicago Corp.  She recommends the stock, and says short sellers are "taking their life in their hands."  Also bullish is Remy Fisher, a vice president with J.W. Seligman & Co., a New York money-management firm that has been increasing its Chemical Waste shareholdings.  "It doesn't seem like anything could tarnish {Chemical Waste's} growth prospects," she says.  She points out that Chemical Waste has about 40% of the hazardous-waste industry's revenue, and that it's hard for new firms to enter the field because of government regulations and neighborhood opposition to hazardous-waste treatment plants.  Nevertheless, some analysts expect Chemical Waste's torrid growth to slow a bit.  Earnings for 1989 will be up about 30%, says Deborah Thielsch of First Boston, compared with 34% growth in 1988.  For 1990, she expects a 25% gain.  That's still enviable growth, but Ms. Thielsch is neutral on the stock, citing its "incredibly high" price-earnings ratio.  ---  Chemical Waste Management (NYSE; Symbol: CHW)  Business: Hazardous waste management  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $700.2 million  Net income: $116.9 million; or 58 cents a share  Third quarter, Sept. 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 20 cents vs. 17 cents  Average daily trading volume: 287,209 shares  Common shares outstanding: 200.6 million  Note: Figures adjusted to reflect 2-for-1 stock split paid in October 1989.  Costa Rica is nearing an agreement with its creditors on a plan for restructuring $1.8 billion of its commercial debt, a Bank of America executive said.  Costa Rica is one of several debtor countries trying to buy back some of their loans under a U.S. initiative named after Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  Negotiations have been rushed in order to be completed in time for President Bush's trip to Costa Rica, and the agreement is likely to be announced today.  People involved in the negotiations said the accord will reduce Costa Rica's foreign debt principal by more than 60%.  "We are reasonably close to an agreement on a Brady-type plan for Costa Rica," said Peter McPherson, Bank of America's executive vice president.  His comments were the first signs of an imminent breakthrough in negotiations between Costa Rica and its commercial lenders.  Bank of America, which chairs a committee representing Costa Rica's creditors, said the prospective plan would enable the country to buy back about $1 billion of debt at a "substantial discount."  The repurchase is to be financed by fresh credits from the International Monetary Fund, the World Bank and donor governments.  Costa Rica also would be able to pay overdue interest on its still-outstanding loans at "more favorable terms" than regular debtors, other U.S. bankers said.  Assets of the nation's 476 money market funds rose $1.26 billion to $357.49 billion in the week ended Wednesday.  The Investment Company Institute, a Washington-based trade group, said assets of 236 general-purpose funds rose $300.1 million to $116.91 billion; assets of 96 broker-dealer funds rose $1.72 billion to $155.76 billion; and assets of 144 institutional funds fell $751.4 million to $84.82 billion.  "The movements in assets differed markedly across fund categories," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist for the institute.  Money market funds were offering lower yields, but individuals nonetheless "kept adding money to their account balances," Mr. Dreyer said.  Most of the money flowed into funds in the broker-dealer category, he said, suggesting that investors liquidated some equity holdings because of recent turbulence in the stock market.  "By contrast, assets of institutional funds actually declined as money managers, anticipating further easing of yields, moved into direct money-market instruments of slightly longer maturities and intermediate-term bonds," Mr. Dreyer said.  A study of patients in eight Public Health Service hospitals found that cancer-related deaths among seamen were significantly higher than among other patients.  The research, recently presented at a scientific conference in Italy, was conducted by the U.S. Public Health Service Hospital in Staten Island, N.Y.  The study was prompted by a previous finding of a similar mortality pattern among American merchant seamen who died in that hospital in 1975 and 1976.  The latest report, the first of several planned, didn't draw any direct link between the cancer death rate among seamen and asbestos used in ships as fire retardants and insulation.  But Leonard Jaques, an admiralty attorney who handles asbestos-related cases for seamen and who provided his clients' records for the research, said "the connection was a natural presumption."  The researchers compared deaths between 1973 and 1978 at the Staten Island hospital with that of the eight public health hospitals for the same period.  The group found that at the Staten Island facility, cancer was the cause of death in 55% of the seamen, compared with 28% among non-seamen; respiratory cancer accounted for one in five deaths among seamen, compared with one in 12 among non-seamen.  The data collected from the eight other hospitals showed that cancer was responsible for 46% of seamen deaths, compared with 37% among non-seamen.  Respiratory cancer accounted for one in five seamen deaths versus one in eleven for non-seamen.  "The cancer mortality `excess,' particularly respiratory cancer, is not specific to the Staten Island facility, but is characteristic of the Public Health Service Hospital System as a whole," the report concluded.  The research group was headed by Dr. Howard R. Kelman, chief of health services research at the Staten Island hospital.  GORBACHEV ANNOUNCED unilateral cuts of nuclear arms in the Baltic region.  The Kremlin leader unveiled a plan to reduce nuclear weapons in the Baltic Sea, including the scrapping of Moscow's nuclear-armed submarines by 1991.  Gorbachev, on an official visit to Finland, also said the Soviet Union has removed all tactical nuclear missiles that could strike northern Europe.  In Moscow, leading progressives have drafted a blueprint designed to push the nation closer to a free-market system.  The plan includes liberalizing the system of prices, breaking up industrial monopolies and putting unprofitable state-owned companies out of business.  The U.S. signaled the Soviet Union that it is willing to discuss an offer by Foreign Minister Shevardnadze to curtail military bases in Europe.  ---  LAWSON RESIGNED as Britain's finance minister amid a policy dispute.  In a letter to Prime Minister Thatcher, the chancellor of the exchequer said he was leaving his cabinet post because "the successful conduct of economic policy" wasn't possible so long as Sir Alan Walters remained as her economic adviser.  Sir Alan, however, also quit.  Thatcher named Foreign Secretary Major to succeed Lawson, and Home Secretary Hurd was appointed foreign minister.  Sir Geoffrey Howe, deputy prime minister, said in the House of Commons that London's economic and monetary policies would remain "unchanged."  ---  An East German Politburo member met with opposition leaders in East Berlin for what were considered the first substantive talks on demands for Western freedoms.  Communist authorities urged pro-democracy activists to halt protests for internal changes, but about 100,000 people in Dresden ignored the appeal and staged a rally.  ---  South Africa has test-fired an intermediate-range ballistic missile that could carry nuclear warheads and was built with help from Israel, a U.S. official said.  The aide said Israel and South Africa also are cooperating on the development of a long-range missile.  Premier Shamir denied that Israel provided any technology to Pretoria.  ---  The White House has reached an accord with the Senate Intelligence Committee on new rules for covert operations to give Bush a freer hand to involve the U.S. in foreign coup plots.  The panel agreed to rescind Reagan-era curbs and give U.S. agents wide latitude to join coup planning, officials said.  ---  Bush extended most-favored-nation trade privileges to Hungary, saying it had honored its pledge of political and economic restructuring.  The president's move, which came three days after Budapest declared itself a democracy, made Hungary the first country to be freed from a 1974 law denying U.S. trade credits to most communist nations.  ---  House-Senate negotiators cleared a $3.18 billion anti-drug and anti-crime initiative, trimming domestic and defense spending to pay for it.  The package would put more emphasis on treatment, education and prevention programs favored by Democrats than Bush's smaller plan.  ---  San Francisco Bay area officials urged residents of tent cities in the agricultural community of Watsonville to move to shelters, expressing concern over health and safety dangers from unrefrigerated food and open cooking fires.  Tolls on bridges went back into effect, and traffic officers resumed issuing tickets in the region.  ---  The U.N. announced that its high commissioner for refugees, Jean-Pierre Hocke, resigned amid allegations of financial impropriety, mismanagement and favoritism to Western donor nations.  The 51-year-old Swiss's resignation is effective Wednesday.  ---  A China Airlines jetliner crashed into a mountainside in eastern Taiwan and all 54 people aboard, including at least one American, were believed killed.  The incident occurred shortly after the Taiwanese plane took off from Hualien, enroute to Taipei.  ---  Former HUD chief Pierce informed a House subcommittee that he will again refuse to answer its questions about mismanagement and political favoritism at the department he led for eight years under Reagan.  He refused to testify last month, invoking his right against self-incrimination.  ---  Bush is scheduled to travel to Costa Rica today to participate in the Central American nation's celebration of 100 years of democracy.  The president has ruled out any talks with Nicaragua's Ortega during the two-day gathering, where leaders of 18 nations are expected to discuss regional issues.  ---  Christian and Moslem forces traded artillery fire across Beirut's sectarian dividing line, the first major breach of an Arab-sponsored cease-fire that began about a month ago.  An Arab League envoy, meanwhile, traveled to Beirut from Damascus to help arrange a meeting of Lebanon's lawmakers to choose a new head of state. ---  Pakistan's opposition introduced a noconfidence motion in Islamabad's Parliament.  Prime Minister Bhutto predicted that the move to oust her would be defeated.  The U.S., meanwhile, has told the opposition parties that any change in government must be accomplished without compromising the country's fledgling democracy.  ---  A Chinese government spokesman said martial law, entering its sixth month in Beijing, will be lifted soon.  The spokesman, quoted in the People's Daily newspaper, didn't offer a timetable.  Premier Li Peng declared martial law May 20 amid studentled pro-democracy protests.  ---  National Football League owners elected lawyer Paul Tagliabue as commissioner, succeeding Pete Rozelle, who announced his retirement in March after 30 years in the post.  The 48-year-old Tagliabue, an NFL counsel, is to serve a five-year term.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS, or REITs, were the darlings of investors in the 1960s.  But they started to fall on hard times in 1974.  These pooled investments in trusts, which drew income from owned properties or from interest on mortgages, were hit by the real estate doldrums of that year.  Overbuilding, inflation, high interest and materials costs, mortgage defaults and some questionable lending practices combined to hurt REITs.  Cash-pressed, REITs in 1974 began to sell out at bargain prices, merge with stronger ones, omit dividends and even fail.  That year 19 of the 20 biggest losers on the New York Stock Exchange were REITs; as much as 96% of their market value was wiped out.  In their heyday, after their debut with federal blessing in 1960 as a spur for real-estate investments, they were popular because they had tax-free status if they paid 90% (currently 95%) of their profits to shareholders.  "The outlook for the industry is grim," said Howard Foster, an E.F. Hutton analyst, in January 1974.  He predicted that the number of REITs would plunge to 50 from 207.  Some did fail within a few years, but there are 169 today.  Since the real-estate recovery in the early 1980s, REITs' assets have risen steadily to about $41 billion currently from a record $40.6 billion last year and $7 billion in 1980.  In 1974, the figure was $21.2 billion.  Avon Products Inc. posted a third-quarter profit of $34.6 million, reversing a year-earlier loss.  The cosmetics, jewelry and gift products concern had per-share earnings of 46 cents in the latest quarter.  A year earlier, it reported a loss of $405.9 million, or $7.78 a share, due to a one-time $425 million charge for discontinued operations.  Sales rose 8% to $785.1 million from $725.6 million.  Avon said sales in the direct-selling division dropped 2% as sales of new products, especially gift and jewelry lines, were below expectations.  The weak sales are expected to continue into the fourth quarter, Avon added.  "Third-quarter net was on target with expectations," said Andrew Shore, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  But the third quarter isn't the problem, Mr. Shore added.  "It's the fourth quarter and what might linger beyond that."  Last month, Avon executives indicated that the company would experience a $75 million to $90 million revenue shortage due to weakness in its gift and decorative lines.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Avon closed at $26.875, down 87.5 cents.  The company's retail prestige fragrance division, which includes Giorgio Beverly Hills and Parfums Stern, posted 35% higher sales.  Earlier this month, Avon said it agreed to sell its Valentino fragrance business and the inventory of its Parfums Stern unit to Italy's Valentino Group for about $12.3 million in cash and notes.  In the nine months, Avon earned $80.3 million, or 97 cents a share, compared with a net loss of $461.1 million, or $7.20 a share.  Revenue rose 11% to $2.27 billion from $2.05 billion.  THE U.S. ECONOMY GREW at a moderate 2.5% annual rate in the third quarter despite the worst trade performance in six years.  The expansion, matching the second quarter's pace, was fueled by strong consumer spending, especially for autos.  But analysts expect GNP growth to slow in the current quarter.  An inflation gauge slowed to a 2.9% growth rate from 5% the previous quarter.  ---  The Big Three car makers all posted quarterly losses in core North American auto operations for the first time since 1982.  Expectations of slow sales and price wars are dimming the outlook for the current quarter.  GM is seeking to buy up to 15% of Jaguar, marking its first salvo in a looming battle with Ford for control of the British luxury car maker.  ---  Stock prices tumbled amid growing concern about corporate earnings.  The Dow Jones industrials closed off 39.55 points, at 2613.73.  Most bonds eased, but long-term Treasury issues edged up.  The dollar also gained, especially against the British pound.  ---  PaineWebber Group ordered a major pullback from program trading amid mounting debate about the practice at Wall Street firms.  ---  AT&T was allowed by the FCC to continue offering discount phone services to big-business clients.  The agency also plans to review its regulation of the long-distance market.  ---  A capital-gains tax cut has stalled in the Senate.  Democratic leaders have bottled up the plan and may be able to prevent a vote indefinitely.  ---  Treasury Secretary Brady said the SEC should be given the authority to close the stock markets in a crisis.  Earlier, SEC Chairman Breeden said he doesn't want such power because it could end up disrupting the markets.  ---  Regional thrift regulators claimed that phone calls were bugged during the examination of Lincoln S&L and that federal officials delayed Lincoln's seizure until it had become the costliest thrift failure ever. ---  Federal Express pilots voted against joining a union, a major victory for Chairman Frederick Smith.  ---  Intel's most powerful chip has flaws that could delay several computer makers' marketing efforts.  But the bugs aren't expected to hurt Intel and most computer manufacturers.  ---  Bethlehem Steel agreed to form a joint venture with the world's second-biggest steelmaker, Usinor-Sacilor of France, to modernize part of Bethlehem's ailing BethForge division.  ---  The Treasury will hold an unscheduled auction of securities next week to raise $17 billion.  The unusual move is intended to buy time for Congress to debate a debt-limit increase.  ---  Private-sector union contracts signed in the third quarter granted an average annual wage increase of 3%, slightly below the second-quarter rise but still above year-ago levels.  ---  Quantum Chemical suspended its cash dividend in favor of a stock payout.  It also posted a quarterly loss.  ---  Navigation Mixte rejected as too low a $1.77 billion bid by Paribas, which is seeking to boost its stake in the French conglomerate to 66.7%.  ---  France's Banque Indosuez surprised London markets by moving to become the dominant shareholder in merchant bank Morgan Grenfell.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 175,240,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2613.73, off 39.55; transportation 1205.19, up 5.87; utilities 215.67, off 0.82.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3425.60, off 1.79.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.22, off 0.26; spot index 131.04, up 0.31.  Dollar: 142.10 yen, up 0.58; 1.8400 marks, up 0.0047.  Maclean Hunter Ltd. said its board approved a shareholder-rights plan that would prevent a suitor from gaining effective control of the company without shareholder approval.  The plan is similar to modified "poison pills" recently adopted by several other Canadian companies.  But it leaves open the possibility of an acquisition of Maclean Hunter without approval by its board.  Under the plan, holders other than a suitor would be able to buy additional shares at 50% of the market price, if a person or group acquired 10% of Maclean Hunter's Class X voting shares.  The plan wouldn't be triggered if the board approved the acquisition or if the suitor made an offer for all shares outstanding and the offer was approved by 50% of holders, other than the bidder, at a special meeting.  Ronald Osborne, president and chief executive officer of the publishing, broadcasting and cable-television concern, said the plan is meant to ensure that all shareholders enjoy any takeover premium in the event of an acquisition.  He said he didn't know of any planned takeover moves against the company.  Mr. Osborne said Maclean Hunter Holdings Ltd., owned by certain directors and subsidiaries of Maclean Hunter, has a voting interest of about 20% in the company; no other holder has as much as 10%.  The plan takes effect immediately, pending shareholder confirmation at its annual meeting in April.  The company said holders also will be asked to approve the reclassification of Class X and non-voting Class Y shares into a single class of voting common shares on a one-for-one basis.  It said the market value of Class Y shares had traded at a "significant discount" to Class X shares.  Separately, Maclean Hunter said third-quarter net income fell 12% to 19.2 million Canadian dollars ($16.4 million), or 12 Canadian cents (10.2 U.S. cents) a share, from C$21.9 million, or 14 Canadian cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue was up 6.8% to C$336.5 million from $315.2 million.  House and Senate negotiators approved a $3.18 billion anti-drug and anti-crime initiative, cutting domestic and defense spending 0.43% to pay for it.  The package would put more emphasis on drug treatment, education and prevention programs favored by Democrats than President Bush's smaller proposal.  It is part of a compromise $26 billion fiscal 1990 spending bill for the Transportation Department and highway and airport trust funds that the House is expected to ratify Tuesday.  The negotiators made only small changes to the Senate-passed plan, which was the product of more than a week of negotiations between senators and Bush administration officials.  When added to previously approved programs, anti-drug spending authority for the current fiscal year would reach $8.8 billion, $900 million more than Mr. Bush requested and $3.1 billion more than in fiscal 1989, which ended Sept. 30.  The initiative, which also contains funds for Mr. Bush's anti-crime package, would provide about $1 billion for federal prison construction, another approximately $1 billion for various federal treatment, education and prevention programs, and about $500 million for federal law-enforcement and drug-interdiction agencies.  The measure approved yesterday doesn't include increased anti-drug funding that was already incorporated into other spending bills.  Of funding for anti-drug programs, nearly $2.1 billion in spending authority would be offset from other federal funds in order to avoid enlarging the budget deficit.  More than $1.3 billion of the cuts would come from new defense budget authority, or $797 million in direct spending.  Foreign aid accounts would be reduced by $82 million in spending authority, or $42 million in direct spending.  Domestic spending authority would be cut by $678 million, or $401 million in outlays, although some accounts will have new anti-drug and anti-crime money added back to them.  Budget authority measures the level of money appropriated by Congress to fund federal programs, and outlays represent the direct spending that results as these accounts are drawn down.  The specific offsetting spending cuts are to be determined by the 13 House and 13 Senate appropriations subcommittees.  In some cases, those decisions have already been made and the results reflected in spending bills approved by the House and Senate.  Separately, the Drug Enforcement Administration said it launched a new attack on domestic indoor marijuana cultivation.  The DEA said its agents yesterday executed 38 search warrants in coordinated raids in 42 states.  The targets were stores selling equipment used for growing marijuana indoors, the agency said.  The DEA said late yesterday afternoon that it expected more than 100 people would be arrested in connection with the raids.  The agency estimated that marijuana production in the U.S. has more than doubled since 1986 to at least 4,350 tons in 1988.  That amount represents about 25% of the marijuana available for use in the country, the DEA said.  A simmering feud between the Thatcher government's two senior economic experts erupted with the abrupt resignation of Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson, sending shock waves through an already shaken financial community and prompting an emergency cabinet shuffle.  Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher named Foreign Secretary John Major to succeed Mr. Lawson.  Sir Geoffrey Howe, deputy prime minister, rushed out a statement in the House of Commons that the government's economic and monetary policies would remain "unchanged."  Meanwhile, Sir Alan Walters, Mrs. Thatcher's controversial economic adviser and Mr. Lawson's nemesis, also announced his resignation.  The pound, which has already slid about 10% against the West German mark in recent weeks, plunged further on the news.  In late New York trading yesterday, sterling was quoted at $1.5765, down sharply from $1.6145 late Wednesday.  And brokers were bracing for a grueling Friday in financial markets here.  "You're going to get quite a major fall in the equity market and the gilt markets," said Gwyn Hacche, U.K. economist with James Capel & Co. "Markets hate uncertainty."  Despite the Howe statement, the Thatcher government's economic policy appeared to be in chaos.  One major question is just how the government will handle matters on which Mr. Lawson and Sir Alan differed explosively.  The two men clashed bitterly over the importance of exchange rates in setting monetary policy and the wisdom of Britain fully joining the European Monetary System, which links together the major currencies in the European Community.  Though jolted by the surrounding confusion, Mrs. Thatcher emerged in undisputed command of her government's economic program.  Neil Kinnock, Labor Party leader, dubbed the 46-year-old Mr. Major a "lap dog" unlikely to veer from his boss's strongly held views, as Mr. Lawson sometimes did.  From the standpoint of the financial markets, however, the prime minister's positions seem murky -- in large part because she has presided over dueling advisers for the last six months.  "I don't know where Thatcher stands," said Paul Horne, an economist with Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. in Paris.  "She's played such a cat-and-mouse game with her advisers."  Although sometimes arcane economic debates undergirded the Lawson-Walters rift, the 57-year-old Mr. Lawson's surprise departure boiled down to a simple stand of he-goes-or-I-go.  In his letter to Mrs. Thatcher, Mr. Lawson stated: "The successful conduct of economic policy is possible only if there is, and is seen to be, full agreement between the prime minister and chancellor of the exchequer.  Recent events have confirmed that this essential requirement cannot be satisfied so long as Alan Walters remains your personal economic adviser."  The upheaval leaves the Thatcher government isolated within the European Community.  Six months ago, the British prime minister's two senior cabinet members -- Mr. Lawson, chancellor since 1983, and Sir Geoffrey, then the foreign secretary -- both supported Britain's early entry into the EMS.  With Mr. Lawson out of the cabinet, and Sir Geoffrey in the less-influential job of deputy prime minister, there's little to counter Mrs. Thatcher's innate suspicion of the EC's exchange-rate mechanism.  Sir Alan, brought back to Downing Street last spring as her adviser, adamantly opposed it.  Indeed, the final fracas in the Lawson-Walters battle involved the EMS. Sir Alan, who also works in Washington, D.C., as a consultant to the World Bank and a fellow at the American Enterprise Institute, said in a article to be published in a U.S. economic journal that the EMS was "half-baked."  The scoff, coming from the man many consider Mrs. Thatcher's most influential adviser, sparked considerable worry.  It not only conflicted with Mr. Lawson's views but ran counter to the position Mrs. Thatcher took at the EC summit in Madrid last June.  There, she said that Britain would join the EMS once the EC had completely liberalized restrictions on capital movements and exchange controls, and once Britain's inflation rate had fallen into line with the rest of the EC. Economists expect those conditions to be met in 1990 or 1991.  Mr. Lawson stated in a House of Commons debate this week that Sir Alan's views "aren't the view of the government."  And in a subsequent television interview, he said, "I think it is right that advisers do not talk or write in public."  Worn down by the feud, he then made it clear to Mrs. Thatcher that he expected the controversial adviser to be ousted.  In remarks in Commons yesterday afternoon, the prime minister disappointed him.  As she has done in the past, she stated her support for Mr. Lawson but insisted on keeping on an adviser who opposed and disparaged his policies.  The EMS views of Mr. Major, who served as Mr. Lawson's deputy in 1987, aren't fully known.  Speaking in the House of Commons last night, he said of Mr. Lawson, "I was proud to serve in his team and proud that he has been and will remain a good friend."  To a great extent, the Downing Street blow-up is the result of Mrs. Thatcher's management approach.  Fond of playing her senior advisers off against each other, the prime minister has often allowed rivalries and animosities to bubble up within her cabinet.  Financial markets prefer a clear message from the government on its economic priorities and strategies.  Since the spring, the Thatcher government has instead broadcast a cacophony.  Mr. Lawson carefully watched exchange rates and stood ready to increase U.K. interest rates when the pound slid too sharply against the dollar or the mark.  By contrast, Sir Alan was viewed as a "free-floater," or one who was inclined to let the currency markets set the level for the pound.  Last summer, when the skirmishing became obvious, Smith Barney's Mr. Horne said that the antipathies were "adding confusion to an already murky situation" in which sterling was becoming an increasingly volatile currency.  "I question the strategy of having an alternate economic adviser," he added.  Mrs. Thatcher's ties with Sir Alan were cemented during her first term, when the straight-talking economist served for three years as a key adviser.  According to a former Downing Street aide, she would then say to him, "You get the economics right, and I'll get the politics right."  ---  Craig Forman and Richard E. Rustin contributed to this article.  Some important people plan to gather here soon to say nice things about Brian P. Monieson.  The occasion isn't a tribute to the former Chicago Mercantile Exchange chairman, however, but a hearing at which federal commodity regulators hope to ban him from the futures industry.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission alleges that Mr. Monieson was warned that some brokers at his GNP Commodities Inc. were bilking investors and that he failed to stop them promptly.  One of the brokers in question was one of Mr. Monieson's best friends.  The case has become the most closely watched civil commodity enforcement action in recent memory, with the futures industry's top officials rallying to Mr. Monieson's defense.  His scheduled character witnesses at the Nov. 6 hearing include: U.S. Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter, who was Merc president under Mr. Monieson; Leo Melamed, chairman of the Merc's executive committee, and Robert K. Wilmouth, president of the National Futures Association, an industry-funded regulatory group.  Mr. Monieson's attorney in the matter is Jerrold E. Salzman, the Merc's influential outside counsel.  The GNP brokers allegedly "allocated" trades, meaning they initiated futures trades without the required customer account numbers and then kept the profitable ones for themselves and stuck customers with the losers.  Mr. Monieson, a childhood math whiz and self-described computer nerd, denies these charges and expects that he and GNP will be exonerated.  Noting that GNP processed some nine million trades last year, he says, "Who the (heck) would know what's going on with 50 trades out of nine million?"  If he loses at the hearing, Mr. Monieson can appeal to the full panel of CFTC commissioners and then to the federal courts.  Messrs.  Melamed, Salzman and Wilmouth came to their friend's aid despite the fact that the Merc and the National Futures Association brought similar failure-to-supervise charges against GNP, though not against Mr. Monieson personally.  To some, the case shows the fallacy of self-regulation, a concept the futures industry cherishes.  In theory, traders and brokers will police themselves because widespread fraud would discredit the industry and frighten away investors.  This "enlightened self-interest" is supposed to overcome the built-in conflicts of interest.  "The problem with self-regulation is always that the regulators are tinged with self-interest," says David Ruder, the just-departed chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In this case, Mr. Ruder says, "it would seem they're acting in two capacities -- that people of that stature would testify in a disciplinary case.  One would counsel the avoidance of an appearance of a conflict."  Mr. Ruder adds of Mr. Yeutter: "It seems odd that people in high government positions would intervene to testify."  Mr. Salzman says the Merc gave him permission to represent Mr. Monieson, adding there's no conflict because he has recused himself from the Merc's case.  "I've had a long personal relationship with Brian," Mr. Salzman says.  "I couldn't say no."  Mr. Melamed and Mr. Wilmouth both said they see no conflict because their organizations didn't charge Mr. Monieson personally, and they're only testifying to his character.  Mr. Yeutter couldn't be reached for comment.  In an interview in his corner office in the Merc tower, Mr. Monieson contends he is a victim of his own celebrity.  "The CFTC was looking for something high-profile," he says.  The investigation already has been costly to Mr. Monieson.  In January 1987, he was two weeks away from the sale of his firm for as much as $40 million.  But the deal hit a snag.  The Federal Reserve Board, which had to approve GNP's sale to Banque Indosuez, a French bank, learned of the CFTC investigation.  A distressed Mr. Monieson called the CFTC, and asked its two top lawyers no fewer than five times to divulge confidential details of its probe into GNP.  They refused, even after Mr. Monieson warned that the deal's collapse would become an "international incident" between the U.S. and France, according to a memo one of the lawyers wrote.  The Banque Indosuez deal fell through.  Mr. Monieson, 53 years old, wears the expensive clothes of a successful trader but his mannerisms are more those of a preoccupied math professor.  His office is filled with toy pigs to remind him of the fortune he made trading pork bellies.  And behind his desk hangs a more recent sign of success, a futures trader's Picasso: a Leroy Nieman painting, depicting a horse race.  Mr. Monieson's defense at the CFTC hearing will partly be that he is a busy man and wasn't personally involved in GNP's retail brokerage business.  During his years as Merc chairman, 1983 through 1985, Mr. Monieson played host to prime ministers and crown princes; his attorneys have prepared charts showing the many Merc meetings he attended and the time he spent away on business.  The lawyers probably won't mention his interest in horse racing, though Mr. Monieson says it remains a hobby.  Mr. Monieson, born on Chicago's North Side, by age five was a faithful reader of the Racing Form, regularly joining his father at the track, he says.  Later, he bet the ponies with a high school friend, Myron Rosenthal, who would become his partner in GNP and other ventures.  In 1965, he and Mr. Rosenthal set up what would become Indecon Inc., a computer processing firm.  An early offshoot was their computerized tip sheet for harness racing -- cranked out using "the same type of equipment used in important space research and big business," Mr. Monieson told subscribers.  Programming unexpectedly led him into trading in the early 1970s when a customer, a pork processor, commissioned a computer program on the supply and demand of bacon, but never used the program.  Mr. Monieson and Mr. Rosenthal got together $50,000 and started trading pork belly futures at the Merc based on the program's predictions.  They formed GNP in 1973 not out of any desire to run a futures clearing firm, Mr. Monieson says, but because they were tired of paying brokerage commissions.  A decade later, GNP was trading all over the Merc floor, mostly in financial futures.  Yet pork bellies still held a fascination for Mr. Monieson, and his trading in that pit would earn him a dubious distinction: the only Merc chairman to be found guilty of committing trading violations while running the exchange.  Mr. Monieson and Mr. Rosenthal were fined, $10,000 and $70,000 respectively, for taking speculative positions beyond the exchange's limits.  Mr. Rosenthal's fine was bigger because he allegedly had exceeded position limits before.  Mr. Monieson, likening the fine to "a parking ticket," says he did violate the rules but contends the position limits are set too low for today's trading environment.  Three associates held pork belly positions nearly identical to those of the GNP owners and appeared to be acting at their direction, according to an internal Merc account of the case.  A company controlled by Mr. Monieson and Mr. Rosenthal lent the other traders more than $6.5 million to help finance the trades.  One of the associates was Norman Furlett, a GNP salesman and one of Mr. Monieson's closest friends.  Mr. Furlett's job was to call up investors and get them to trade futures.  GNP got a commission.  Ira P. Greenspon was in the same line of work, and in October 1985 joined GNP.  What GNP didn't know was that Mr. Greenspon already was under investigation by the CFTC for alleged trade allocating at his previous firm.  The CFTC later concluded that Mr. Furlett had been allocating trades as well.  According to separate Merc charges against the two men and GNP, which haven't been made public, during the first two months of 1986, accounts they maintained, including one named Horse Trading, had profits of $62,372.95.  Four customer accounts the Merc reviewed had combined losses of $20.988.12 for those months.  Robert L. Sutermeister, a retired trucking company owner in Dayton, Ohio, says he lost nearly all of the $10,000 he sent the brokers.  Larry Margler, a McKinleyville, Ca., engineer, says he lost about $3,000 of the $5,000 he turned over to Mr. Furlett.  Between June 1985 and May 1986, the CFTC alleges, Mr. Monieson was warned by at least five GNP employees that Mr. Furlett and Mr. Greenspon were defrauding customers.  After the Banque Indosuez deal collapsed in January 1987, the two salesmen left GNP.  Their attorney, James Koch, says they deny any wrongdoing and that both men have agreed to leave the futures industry.  Two New England banks reported substantial third-quarter net losses, reflecting the continuing woes of the region's developers and lenders.  One Bancorp, Portland, Maine, buffeted by loan write-downs and expanded loss reserves, reported a net loss of $48.5 million, or $5.92 a share.  In the year-earlier period, the bank holding company reported net income of $523,000, or six cents a share.  Holyoke, Mass.-based Heritage Bancorp, also hurt by the depressed New England real estate market, reported a net loss of $8.9 million, or $1.22 a share, compared with net income of $3 million, or 40 cents a share.  One Bancorp, which had warned that it planned to take a $49.8 million loan-loss provision in the third quarter, said it expects things to get worse, but more slowly, in the future.  "Barring marked and unanticipated declines in real estate values, we expect our growth rates of nonperforming loans to slow," Vincent E. Furey Jr., president and chief executive officer, said.  After taking write-downs of about $75 million in the last 12 months, he said the company is in position, "to address accelerated disposal of problem assets."  One Bancorp's primary capital-to-asset ratio is 6.6% after third-quarter charges.  Under federal regulations, a 6% ratio is the standard.  However, the company said it isn't in compliance with certain standards it agreed to last fall in connection with two Massachusetts acquisitions.  Mr. Furey said the company is working to restore its capital ratio to regulatory compliance and expects to reach an agreement with regulators during the fourth quarter.  He said he expects a formal written agreement documenting One Bancorp's plan to reduce problem assets and return to compliance.  The third-quarter loss reflected a $49.8 million provision for loan losses and write-downs of $8.5 million on foreclosed real estate.  One Bancorp said its loan-loss reserve of $59.4 million at Sept. 30 was 2.9% of loans outstanding and 35% of $170 million in nonperforming loans.  At June 30, reserves of $52.2 million were 2.4% of loans outstanding and 35% of $150 million in nonperforming loans.  Loan and real-estate write-downs have reduced $195 million in nonperforming assets by 28% from their original loan value, One Bancorp said.  Nonperforming assets consist of $170 million in nonperforming loans and $25 million in real estate acquired by agreement or foreclosure.  As a result of the losses, stockholders' equity declined to $76.6 million, or $9.35 a share, at Sept. 30, from $125.1 million, or $15.27 a share, at June 30.  For the first nine months of 1989, net losses at One Bancorp totaled $74.5 million, or $9.12 a share, compared to net income of $9.7 million, or $1.13 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Heritage Bancorp said it added $17 million to its loan-loss reserve, making the reserve $24.7 million or 1.6% of total loans and 35% of nonperforming loans.  Nonperforming loans increased from $32.2 million as of June 30, 1988, to $69.6 million as of Sept. 30, 1989.  Assets at Sept. 30 totaled $1.73 billion.  Chairman Richard B. Covell said he expects that Heritage will rebound in the fourth quarter and return to a positive mode of operation in 1990.  "We are aggressively pursuing workout strategies with respect to nonperforming assets in an effort to resolve these problems as expeditiously as possible, while simultaneously minimizing losses to the company," he said.  For the nine months, Heritage reported a net loss of $10.9 million, or $1.49 a share, compared to net income of $8.3 million, or $1.12 a share.  McDonald's Corp., under pressure by environmental groups to stop using polystyrene containers, announced a program here to foster recycling of the plastics at 450 of its New England restaurants.  Environmentalists, however, attacked McDonald's program as a public relations ploy and the wrong way to address the nation's garbage crisis.  Under the program, McDonald's restaurants will be equipped with recycling bins for plastic items and with posters encouraging customers to use them, the company said.  The plastic will be sent to a plant in Leominster, Mass., near Boston, which is owned by a joint venture recently formed by plastics makers.  It then will be processed into plastic pellets for use in making products such as trash cans, flower pots and food trays, but not food containers, McDonald's said.  The program will reduce trash, help educate youngsters about recycling and "is a big step toward a better environment," asserted Shelby Yastrow, McDonald's senior vice president, environmental affairs.  However, it will be a small step for McDonald's as a whole.  The program will include 4% of the company's 11,000 restaurants.  And because many customers won't participate, such as people who drive through, it is likely that less than 2% of the company's plastic containers will be recycled under the program.  McDonald's said it plans to expand the program when and if more plastic recycling plants are built near its restaurants.  The plant in Leominster is the first of five planned by the National Polystyrene Recycling Co., the plastics-industry joint venture.  It was formed earlier this year by Dow Chemical Co., Mobil Corp. and six other concerns in response to concerns about growing amounts of non-biodegradable plastic trash.  Paul Keough , acting regional director for the Environmental Protection Agency in Boston, said, "We hope that other large companies follow McDonald's lead to undertake similar programs."  But Amy Perry, a spokeswoman for the Massachusetts Public Interest Research Group, a Boston offshoot of Ralph Nader's lobbying outfits, argued that the program "just serves to legitimize increasing the use of throwaway plastics.  It would be far better for McDonald's to use durable goods {that could be reused for serving food}, instead of promoting the throwaway society."  Last year, a network of environmental groups commenced a "McToxics Campaign" to pressure McDonald's to stop using polystyrene.  Among other things, the groups have urged consumers to mail used McDonald's plastic containers to its Oak Brook, Ill., headquarters.  Concerns about plastic trash also have sparked legislative initiatives, such as one in Berkeley, Calif., to ban polystyrene products as of January.  Such laws are causing major headaches for companies like McDonald's, which increasingly must wrestle with different local rules across the nation.  "Political pressure has been a factor" in the introduction of recycling programs by plastics makers and sellers, conceded Ken Harman, National Polystyrene's acting president and chairman, at the news conference, which was held in a McDonald's restaurant next to Boston's Children's Museum.  Some of the pressure became evident during the news conference when a McDonald's customer startled company officials by blurting out, "Why do you produce so much trash in the first place?"  The customer, Jeff Simpson, a visitor from London, later explained that he was vexed by all the plastic, paper and cardboard that came with the McDonald's breakfast he had just eaten.  The recycling program "is laudable," he said, "but why not use china plates?"  The current debate over reinvigorating individual retirement accounts boils down to this: Would you prefer your tax break as an appetizer or as dessert?  Democrats would give taxpayers an immediate incentive to sock away more savings: Save $2,000, and you can deduct $1,000 on your tax return.  Republicans would defer the tax break: Save $2,000, and you'll escape taxes on all the interest that sum earns over the years till you retire.  Addressing the nation's savings shortage is once again politically fashionable.  And there is ample reason for concern.  The dearth of savings limits the resources available for investment in the future and forces the U.S. to import foreign savings.  But some economists suggest the politicians' new infatuation with IRAs may be misplaced at a time when Congress and the president aren't taking the more important step of shrinking the federal budget deficit.  "If increasing savings is the object," says economist Jane Gravelle of the Congressional Research Service, "a reduction in the deficit would be a more certain and more powerful way of achieving such an end." (The nation's total savings is what's left after substracting government borrowing from household and corporate savings.)  The differences between the two IRA alternatives involve more than partisan manuevering -- although there's plenty of that.  The shortcoming of offering immediate rewards for putting money in an IRA, as the Democrats propose, is that it will widen the budget deficit by an estimated $12.5 billion over the next five years.  "The big problem is the up-front cost," says Sen. William Roth (R., Del.), chief Republican cheerleader for IRAs.  The shortcomings of delaying the reward, as Sen. Roth and Sen. Robert Packwood (R., Ore.) propose, is that it may not boost savings much and, if it does, it may widen deficits in the future.  "It looks like you haven't given anything away, but five, 10, 20, 40 years later, little bomblets go off," says Henry Aaron, a Brookings Institution economist.  Although IRA fans in Congress have been talking about restoring incentives that were curtailed in 1986, they gained momentum only after Senate Finance Committee Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) seized on IRAs as an alternative to cutting capital-gains taxes.  Republican senators, unwilling to concede the popular IRA issue to Democrats, suddenly embraced a scheme Sen. Roth had been pressing with little success.  The Bush administration, which was planning to unveil an IRA proposal of its own next year, was quick to do the same.  Both proposals would allow withdrawals not only for retirement, but also for buying a house or paying tuition bills.  Between 1981 and 1986, any worker could put $2,000 a year into an IRA and deduct that sum from his taxable income.  As banks and mutual funds advertised heavily, hundreds of billions of dollars flowed into the accounts.  Economists still disagree on how much was new savings and how much was shifts of existing savings by taxpayers in order to cut their tax bill.  Economist David Wise of Harvard University figures 70% was actually new savings; many prominent economists -- including Michael Boskin, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers -- agree that IRAs did result in significant new savings.  But Mr. Aaron, among others, continues to insist that the data are inconclusive.  And Robert McIntyre, director of the labor-backed Citizens for Tax Justice and an admirer of the 1986 Tax Reform Act that limited IRAs, goes further.  "They don't work," he contends.  "They just give people a tax break for savings they would have done anyway."  In any event, IRA contributions fell sharply after the 1986 law that restricted the full tax break to couples earning less than $40,000 a year and individuals earning less than $25,000.  Balances in IRA and Keogh accounts (retirement accounts for the self-employed), which had swelled by $75 billion in 1986, grew by only $48 billion in 1988, including interest on past contributions.  It isn't clear how Americans would react to the new IRA proposals because they are so different from the old scheme.  Some economists predict any IRA plan will boost savings because brokerage houses, mutual funds and banks will advertise them heavily.  "It may well be that saving, like life insurance, is sold, not bought," says Lawrence Summers of Harvard University.  He notes that as IRA ads vanished, even many middle-income Americans still eligible for the full IRA tax break stopped contributing.  Comparing the two proposals on the table, many economists say a rational person ought to prefer the Republican version because it offers a much bigger tax break.  Under the Democratic plan, a 40-year-old in the 33% tax bracket who saves $2,000 in an IRA would cut his tax bill by $175 immediately.  When he retires 25 years later, his $2,000 -- assuming it were invested at 5% -- would be worth $6,773.  But $5,773 of that would be taxed when withdrawn from the IRA.  Republicans wouldn't give any up-front deduction for depositing $2,000 in the IRA.  But at retirement 25 years later, the entire $4,773 in interest could be withdrawn taxfree, along with the already taxed $2,000 initial contribution.  Nonetheless, some economists argue that Americans simply won't save unless the government gives them an immediate reward.  "This instant gratification overcomes the usual bias against savings," says John Skinner, a University of Virginia economist.  The clincher, he says, is that people who owed money to the Internal Revenue Service were far more likely to put money in an IRA than those who were due a refund.  On the other hand, the case for delayed gratification is bolstered by evidence that a surprising number of upper-income Americans still are putting money in IRAs even though the only tax break is deferring tax on the interest the contributions earn.  The Employee Benefit Research Institute says about 23% of all workers earning more than $50,000 a year made IRA deposits in 1987, down from 56% in 1982 but still nearly one million people.  Donald Underwood, head of retirement planning for Merrill Lynch & Co., says he was surprised to discover that more money flowed into the firm's IRA accounts in 1988 than in 1987. (A big IRA fan, Mr. Underwood's license plate reads: IRA KEOGH.)  Merrill Lynch is convinced the Republican IRA plan would appeal to its customers, and it is lobbying strongly for it.  "I think people are really concerned about what the tax rate will be in the future," Mr. Underwood says.  The higher tax rates go in the future, of course, the more valuable the future tax breaks.  The bigger the incentive the government offers for savings, the more tax revenues a scheme would lose -- or so many economists reason.  But that's not how Sen. Roth and his allies look at it.  First, they would allow people with old-fashioned IRAs to shift the money to the new ones as long as they pay tax -- at today's lower tax rates -- on the previously deducted contributions.  That would raise $11.5 billion for the Treasury over the next five years, congressonal tax experts estimate.  But allowing the interest buildup on those contributions to escape taxation would cost the Treasury far more than that sum in the long run, the Congressional Budget Office says.  "It's a huge giveaway," Mr. Summers protests.  Second, Sen. Roth insists that the extra savings his plan would produce would spur so much extra economic growth that the Treasury wouldn't suffer.  The claim is an echo of the supply-side promise that the 1981 tax cuts that bear Sen. Roth's name would finance themselves through added growth or added savings.  ---  @ Comparing IRA Proposals  @ Bentsen Plan  @ Maximum contribution: $2,000 a year.  @ Deduction: 50% of contribution.*  @ Uses: For retirement, college tuition, purchase of first home.  @ Taxes: Withdrawals of interest are taxes as are 50% of contribution.  @ Roth-Packwood Plan  @ Contribution: $2,000 a year; increases to $3,000 after 1995.  @ Deduction: None.*  @ Uses: For retirement and, up to 25% of balance, for purchase of home, college tuition and books, catastrophic health expenses.  @ Taxes: Withdrawals of contribution and interest are tax-free.  @ *Taxpayers eligible for full IRA deduction under current law would continue to have that option  Telerate Inc., which has rejected an $18-a-share tender offer by Dow Jones & Co. for the 33% of Telerate that Dow Jones doesn't already own, said the two companies began talks yesterday to try to negotiate a friendly transaction.  However, the talks didn't produce any changes in the $576 million Dow Jones offer, which a committee of Telerate's two independent directors has rejected as inadequate.  Peter Skinner, vice president and corporate general counsel for Dow Jones, said yesterday's talks took place both on the telephone and in person.  "We discussed the bid, but Dow Jones and its board of directors believe the bid is full and fair," Mr. Skinner said.  He said no future talks are currently scheduled, but added that Dow Jones representatives will meet again with Telerate officials if Telerate seeks a meeting.  Telerate disclosed the opening of negotiations in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, which said that "there can be no assurance that such negotiations will continue or will result in revised terms that will be satisfactory to the special committee."  The talks followed an effort by Telerate to place a strongly worded advertisement attacking the Dow Jones offer in yesterday's editions of The Wall Street Journal, according to two people familiar with Telerate.  After Telerate submitted its ad to the Journal Wednesday, the people said, a lawyer for Dow Jones telephoned a Telerate lawyer.  Soon thereafter, Warren H. Phillips, chairman of Dow Jones, telephoned Neil S. Hirsch, chairman of Telerate.  As a result of the conversations, the people said, Telerate decided not to run the ad yesterday, and Dow Jones agreed to meet with Telerate.  Mr. Skinner said that Dow Jones executives had been told that the ad would be submitted by Telerate and were advised of its content.  The Dow Jones executives indicated to Telerate executives that such an ad would not be "helpful," Mr. Skinner said, and Telerate decided not to run the ad.  A spokesman for Telerate declined to elaborate on Telerate's filing with the SEC.  Telerate stock rose 87.5 cents to close at $20.50 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  Dow Jones fell 62.5 cents to close at $36.625.  Many of Wall Street's takeover-stock speculators bought relatively large positions in Telerate stock after Dow Jones announced its tender offer on Sept. 21.  The traders are betting Dow Jones will increase its $18-a-share offer in order to acquire full ownership of Telerate, an electronic distributor of financial-market information.  Several takeover stock traders said yesterday they expect Dow Jones to offer at least $21.  Some analysts, investment bankers and institutional investors who have studied Telerate have said they believe the company could fetch between $25 and $30 a share if it were put up for auction.  But the takeover stock traders, who declined to be identified, said they believe it is unrealistic to expect Dow Jones will pay that much, considering it already owns about 67% of Telerate.  Bruce Thorp, an analyst at Philadelphia-based Provident National Bank, said Dow Jones's tender offer reflects a typical premium for the purchase of a remaining minority stake.  He thinks Dow Jones will end up paying $20 or $21 a share for Telerate.  "The offer will be sweetened, not because it has to be, but because it will make for a smoother transaction," Mr. Thorp said.  "Dow Jones could bludgeon its way through the process and get it for less, but they won't do that.  Dow Jones is not going to squeeze as hard as it could."  Dow Jones declined to comment on Mr. Thorp's speculation.  Telerate's proposed ad, headlined "What Now, Dow Jones?" was in the form of a letter to Dow Jones directors.  "How can a company of Dow Jones's reputation persist in a coercive attempt to squeeze out the minority shareholders of Telerate at a low-ball price of $18 a share?" the ad asked.  A copy of the ad was obtained from a person familiar with Telerate.  "We are forced to consider Dow Jones's actions as hostile -- to Telerate's shareholders, management, and employees," the ad said.  It was signed by Mr. Hirsch, three other Telerate directors who are employees of Telerate, and two outside directors.  People familiar with Telerate said the ad was intended to encourage Dow Jones to begin negotiations and was submitted to the Journal for that reason.  "We could have run it in the New York Times," one person familiar with Telerate said.  As evidence of their contention that the current Dow Jones offer is too low, takeover-stock speculators pointed to an SEC filing by Dow Jones disclosing that Dow Jones managers had proposed offering $19 a share for Telerate.  However, that proposal was overruled by Dow Jones's board, which decided to offer $18 a share.  After the Telerate special committee rejected the Dow Jones offer as inadequate, Mr. Phillips of Dow Jones said, "We are proceeding with our $18-a-share offer and continue to believe that the offer is fair to all Telerate stockholders."  The offer is scheduled to expire Nov. 3.  Separately, a hearing is scheduled for Monday in Delaware Chancery Court on a motion by certain Telerate shareholders seeking a court order to block the Dow Jones tender offer.  Dow Jones paid between $10 and $15 a share for most of the 63.6 million Telerate shares it owns.  The shares were purchased in various transactions, starting in August 1985.  However, Dow Jones paid $28.75 a share for one block of about 10.5 million Telerate shares in September 1987.  That price represented a premium of 16.8% above the then-market price of Telerate shares.  In addition to The Wall Street Journal, Dow Jones publishes Barron's, various community newspapers, and operates financial news services and computer databases.  In a highly unusual move that buys time for Congress to debate a debt-limit increase, the Treasury Department announced it will hold an unscheduled auction of securities next week to raise $17 billion.  The auction is expected to be held on Monday and will settle on Tuesday, just hours before the current debt-limit legislation expires.  If Congress hasn't enacted a new debt limit by midnight Tuesday, the Treasury will have to suspend all sales of securities, including savings bonds.  The extraordinary auction, however, should give the Treasury enough cash to cover Social Security checks due out Nov. 3.  In a letter to congressional leaders, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady said the government will now be able to operate through Nov. 8 without a debt-limit increase.  The Treasury's action comes in response to a continuing stalemate on Capitol Hill over the debt-limit legislation.  Democrats want to use the debt-limit bill as a vehicle for enacting unrelated legislation that the administration opposes, and the administration is considering using the bill as a vehicle for a cut in the capital-gains tax.  In recent days, the battle has become a game of chicken, and it had raised the prospect that the government might run out of cash next Friday and be unable to mail Social Security checks.  Treasury officials said they decided to take their extraordinary action to make certain that Social Security recipients get their checks.  They also said the administration may still seek to attach a capital-gains tax cut to the debt legislation despite the intensifying controversy.  "The secretary believes capital gains is a top priority and that any available vehicle ought to be used," said Assistant Treasury Secretary Roger Bolton.  Existing debt-limit legislation allows the Treasury to borrow as much as $2.87 trillion.  But so far, the government's debt totals only $2.853 trillion.  That means the government can legally sell another $17 billion in debt, provided it acts by Tuesday.  On Tuesday, the debt limit expires, and the limit drops back to $2.8 trillion.  If that occurs, no new securities can be issued without violating the debt-limit law.  The Treasury's regular auction of Treasury bills, scheduled to settle on Thursday, is expected to be canceled.  In addition, all sales of savings bonds and special securities issued to state and local governments will cease.  The details of next week's unusual auction will be announced today.  In his letter to congressional leaders, Treasury Secretary Brady called the move an "extraordinary administrative action."  He said that it "is important Congress act on debt-limit legislation no later than Nov. 7, in order to ensure adequate time to arrange market borrowings to avoid default."  Mr. Brady also said that he is "aware of no other realistic measures, other than debt-limit legislation, that could further extend the anticipated date of default."  The debt-limit debate has become an annual ritual between the administration and Congress.  Increasing the limit is necessary to keep the U.S. from defaulting on its obligations, but the increase always creates intense controversy in Congress.  Legislators like to amend the debt-limit bill with extraneous legislation because they believe it's a difficult bill for the president to veto.  This year, the debt-limit debate promises to be particularly intense because of the battle over capital gains.  The administration and its Republican allies see the measure as a possible opportunity to pass a capital-gains tax cut.  Their hope is that Democratic leaders in the Senate wouldn't block it for fear of being blamed for the government's default.  The California Department of Insurance charged Farmers Insurance Exchange and Mid-Century Insurance Co. with discriminating against three groups of automobile insurance customers.  The department didn't specify how many consumers have been hurt by the alleged discriminatory practices, saying only that they "affect a substantial number of people."  The department claims, however, that Farmers and Mid-Century, both members of the Farmers Group of Insurance Cos., are steering customers who might qualify for Farmers policies toward higher-priced Mid-Century policies.  The customers affected are under the age of 25, youths living in households of preferred policyholders and drivers under the age of 50 who seek minimal coverage, the department said.  "As Mid-Century's rates are up to 40 percent higher than Farmers for the same coverage, we have a situation in which the companies effectively raise rates for the new business by denying coverage in Farmers," Roxani Gillespie, the state's insurance commissioner, said in a prepared statement.  "And that's discrimination in our book."  A spokesman for Ms. Gillespie said the department expected to hold a hearing on the matter within 30 days.  Farmers Group of Insurance is a unit of B.A.T Industries PLC.  In Los Angeles, Farmers strongly defended its practices, saying its rating guidelines are "fair and reasonable and in line with common industry practices.  We have carefully considered our underwriting practices and we believe they are in compliance with the law and its intent," said John Millen, a spokesman for the company.  Mr. Millen said Farmers would review the insurance department's charges and respond within the ten days allowed.  Credit Lyonnais S.A. said it agreed to acquire slightly more than 50% of Thomson-CSF Finance S.A. in an asset swap between the two French state-controlled groups.  The bank said it will acquire the stake in the finance unit of defense and electronics group Thomson-CSF S.A. in exchange for almost 14% of its own capital.  No value was given for the transaction, which will create the sort of financial-industrial tandem common in West Germany and Japan.  Although Thomson's banking activities will become a Credit Lyonnais subsidiary, they are to remain a separate entity and, according to sources, will continue to handle Thomson's own international financing needs.  Thomson-CSF Finance, the largest finance unit of any French industrial company, also will gain access to products offered by Credit Lyonnais, France's secondbiggest commercial bank in terms of assets, behind Banque Nationale de Paris.  The accord will strengthen Credit Lyonnais's corporate financial affairs because of Thomson-CSF Finance's expertise in using hedging and treasury-management products.  Thomson-CSF Finance posted profit of 1.8 billion francs ($288.9 million) in 1988, an official said.  He added that Thomson consolidated earnings won't be affected by the accord.  Credit Lyonnais reported 1988 consolidated profit of 2.06 billion francs after payments to minority interests.  Thomson common shares and Credit Lyonnais non-voting stock were suspended yesterday before the announcement at their respective Wednesday closing prices of 194.50 francs ($31.22) and 642 francs ($103.05) each.  They were expected to resume trading today.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL --------------- %  @ COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @ CalFed Inc $.88 ... $.68 (9) 29.41  @ FirstFed Fin'l .70 ... .55 (5) 27.27  @ Pacific Enterpr .69 ... .59 (5) 16.95  @ Franklin Resour .84 ... .77 (5) 9.09  @ NEGATIVE  @ Businessland $.14 $.23 (4) $.18 (4) 22.22  @ Anheuser-Busch .83 .88 (3) .88 (7) 5.68  @ Timken Co .24 ... .51 (3) 52.94  @ Consol Freight .22 ... .43 (11) 48.48  @ Amer West Air .18 ... .25 (7) 28.00  @ Millipore Corp .36 ... .48 (11) 25.00  @ Amdahl Corp .30 ... .39 (4) 23.08  @ Foxboro Co .30 ... .39 (4) 23.08  @ Van Dorn Co .28 ... .34 (3) 17.65  @ Harsco Corp .55 ... .62 (4) 11.29  @ Norfolk Southern .87 ... .97 (9) 10.31  @ Datascope Corp .18 ... .20 (5) 10.00  @ Calgon Carbon .40 ... .44 (5) 9.09  Source: Zacks Investment Research  @ Money Market Deposits-a 6.22%  @ Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.04%  @ Six-month Certificates-a 7.98%  @ One-year Certificates-a 7.99%  @ Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.92%  @ Five-Year Certificates-a 7.90%  @ U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Swedish real estate and building concern Skanska AB said its group pretax profit for the first eight months rose 58% to 1.49 billion kronor ($233 million) from 946 million kronor ($148 million) in the corresponding period last year.  Skanska said group sales in the first eight months increased 29% to 17.64 billion kronor from 13.67 billion a year ago.  PPG Industries Inc. said it will expand production at its Barberton, Ohio, chemical plant to increase total capacity by 50%.  PPG termed the expansion a "multimillion-dollar project," but didn't give details.  The plant makes plastics used for lenses in sunglasses and safety glasses.  The University of Toronto said it will drop its objections to the offer by Institut Merieux S.A. to acquire Connaught BioSciences Inc. for 942 million Canadian dollars (US$803.7 million) after reaching a research agreement with the French vaccine manufacturer.  Under the terms of the accord, similar to an agreement reached last week between the university and Merieux's rival bidders for Connaught, Ciba-Geigy Ltd. and Chiron Corp., Merieux agreed to spend 15 million Canadian dollars (US$12.8 million) to fund vaccine-related research in Canada, C$9 million of which would go to the university's research programs.  The university had sued Connaught, arguing its directors had broken a 1972 agreement not to sell the company to a foreign concern by recommending Merieux's offer to shareholders.  A decision in the case, heard last week by the Ontario Supreme Court, is expected this week.  A decision in the university's favor could block Connaught's directors from recommending Merieux's offer to shareholders, but couldn't block the company's sale.  James Keffer, vice president, research, at the university, said the university isn't favoring one bid over another.  "Both of these agreements are good, both add substantial benefits to Canada," he said.  "Ciba-Geigy {and Chiron} are offering slightly more investment dollars to Canadian universities and some new products, but Merieux is proposing to build a new biotechnology center."  Ciba-Geigy, a Swiss pharmaceutical company, and California-based Chiron, a pharmaceutical research concern, are offering C$866 million, or C$30 a share, for Connaught.  The Canadian government said earlier this month that the proposed Merieux acquisition didn't appear to offer enough "net benefit" to Canada to approve.  "Reaching an agreement is an advantage to both the university and Merieux, both in terms of business and politically, since the university has been quite vocal about the issue of foreign ownership," said Philippe Stoeckel, president of Merieux Institute Inc., Merieux's U.S. subsidiary.  THE HIGH-SCHOOL dropout rate in Pope County, Ill., is markedly lower than one stated in a page-one article Oct. 13, according to the area's high-school principal.  The figure in the article was based on federal data provided by the Lower Mississippi Delta Development Commission.  (See: "River of Despair: Along the Rich Banks of the Mississippi Live Poorest of U.S. Poor --- They Endure a Lack of Jobs and Plantation Mentality, While Landowners Thrive --- Where Dreams of Blacks Die" -- WSJ Oct. 23, 1989)  TRW Inc. said it increased its stock buy-back program to four million common shares.  The company's buy-back was previously set in 1987 at two million shares and TRW has already purchased 1.5 million shares.  The automotive, aerospace, industrial and electronic products concern has about 60 million shares outstanding.  Investors gave an unexpectedly warm welcome to Resolution Funding Corp.'s first auction of 30-year bonds, which helped lift the spirits of the entire bond market.  Resolution Funding, the government agency created to raise cash to bail out the troubled thrift industry, received bids totaling $13 billion for the so-called bailout bonds.  It accepted $4.52 billion of the tenders at an average yield of 8.15%, slightly lower than analysts had expected.  The bid-to-cover ratio on the bonds was 2.87 to 1, better than on the Treasury's own 30-year bonds in recent auctions.  The ratio, which reflects the number of bids received for each bid accepted, is used to gauge investor demand.  "This was an excellent response to a new security," said Michael E. Basham, deputy assistant secretary of the Treasury.  "We were very pleased."  Treasury officials were also surprised.  Until yesterday, institutional investors had showed little interest in buying the securities.  After dealers complained that potential buyers were concerned about debt repayment, the Treasury released a statement yesterday reiterating that timely payments were guaranteed by the government.  Traders said the auction was saved by a small number of dealers who bought huge amounts of the bonds.  "There's no doubt that the auction went better than expected," said William Sullivan Jr., a senior vice president at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The fact that bond prices were firm prior to and after the auction was a sign that "the market is in very good shape."  Bond prices often fall right before new supply is released.  Traders said a strong market tone was set early in the day when a bid to buy $1 billion of long-term bonds hit the market.  Bond dealers identified the buyer as Nippon Kangyo Kakumaru International Inc., a Japanese brokerage firm that purchased the bonds on behalf of a client.  Eishi Wakabayashi, a Nippon Kangyo executive vice president, confirmed that the firm "bought quite a bit" yesterday and last week, but he declined to elaborate.  Last Thursday, the firm was said to have purchased close to $2 billion of long-term bonds.  Joel Kazis, head of government trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., said the billion dollar bid "helped to support the market going into the Refcorp auction" and "showed that there are real buyers for long bonds."  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond, which jumped 1/2 point on the Nippon Kangyo bid, ended 1/8 point higher, or up $1.25 for each $1,000 face amount.  Mortgage-backed securities rose less than 1/8 point, but municipal bonds ended unchanged to slightly lower.  Investment-grade corporate issues and junk bonds were unchanged.  At the Resolution Funding auction, traders said much of the appetite for the new 30-year bonds came from dealers who are "stripping" the bonds and repackaging them as zero-coupon securities.  Strips are created by separating the interest payment portion of the bond from the principal portion, called the corpus.  The two pieces are then sold separately at a deep discount to their face amount.  Zero-coupon securities pay no interest until maturity, with the return to investors consisting primarily of the bond discount.  Among the big buyers at yesterday's auction was Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. Jack Norris, a Drexel executive vice president, said the firm bought a sizable share of the bonds, but he wouldn't be specific.  He said Drexel intends to strip at least $500 million of the bonds the firm purchased.  "We've had very strong strip demand" from institutional investors, he said.  Meanwhile, the market paid close attention to comments by Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan, who testified before a congressional hearing.  However, credit market analysts were unable to discern many clues about the future course of monetary policy from the Fed chairman's remarks.  Among other things, Mr. Greenspan said he endorses a bill by Rep. Stephen Neal (D., N.C.) that would require the Fed to pursue policies aimed at eliminating inflation within five years.  Treasury, Agency Securities  Treasury bonds ended with small gains yesterday, which was better than some economists had expected considering the large amount of new supply that has hit the market this week.  Including yesterday's $4.52 billion of Resolution Funding bonds, the government has sold $30 billion in new securities this week.  Today, investors will be scrutinizing the government's report on gross national product for the third quarter.  Economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect real GNP to have grown at a 2.5% annual rate in the third quarter, about the same as in the second quarter.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond was quoted late at 102 22/32 to yield 7.88%, compared with 102 18/32 to yield 7.89% Tuesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 100 24/32 to yield 7.87%, compared with 100 22/32 to yield 7.88%.  Here are details of yesterday's Resolution Funding auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ Applications $12,973,968,000  @ Accepted bids $4,522,068,000  @ Accepted at low price 90%  @ Accepted noncompetitively 131,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) 99.709 (8.15%)  @ High price (Rate) 99.821 (8.14%)  @ Low price (Rate) 99.709 (8.15%)  @ Interest rate 8 1/8%  The bonds are dated Oct. 30 and mature Oct. 15, 2019.  Corporate Issues  Several new issues hit the corporate market yesterday.  Among the new issues was Arco Chemical Co.'s $100 million in 30-year debentures, which were priced to yield 9.50%.  In the junk bond market, Blockbuster Entertainment Corp. issued $300 million of zero-coupon convertible notes, also known as liquid yield option notes.  The notes, underwritten by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, were priced at $308.32 per $1,000 note to yield 8%.  The size of the offering was increased from the originally planned $250 million redemption amount.  In secondary trading, prices of investment grade and high-yield, high-risk junk bonds ended unchanged yesterday.  However, there were some notable exceptions.  Certain SCI Television Inc. junk bonds fell after the company announced a debt exchange offer.  Meanwhile, junk bonds of Public Service Co. of New Hampshire surged on news of a bidding war.  As expected, Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. postponed a $1.15 billion junk bond offering for TW Services Inc. Donaldson Lufkin said takeover-related financing is being restructured to include more equity and less debt.  The investment banker said the new deal under consideration calls for $600 million to $700 million in high-yield debt to be offered.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended 2/32 to 3/32 point higher after giving up early gains of as much as 8/32.  Government National Mortgage Association 8% securities for November delivery finished at 94 1/4, up 3/32; 9% securities at 98 18/32, up 3/32; 9 1/2% securities at 100 18/32, up 3/32; and 10% securities at 102 14/32, up 3/32.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities were at 97 23/32, up 2/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% issue was yielding 9.32% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note held at 1.46 percentage points.  In derivative markets, the Federal National Mortgage Association issued a $300 million real estate mortgage investment conduit backed by its 9% securities through Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Municipals  Bidding for a $223 million sell list and a handful of medium-sized new issues dominated an otherwise uneventful session.  Active dollar bond issues were mostly unchanged to off 1/8 in light late dealings.  The 176-item bid list was made up largely of bonds due in eight years or less, with most maturing within five years.  Many are state general obligations.  In the new issue arena, underwriters led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. set the preliminary pricing for $80 million of Michigan general obligation bonds, the first offering of such debt by the state since 1986.  The sale was designed by state officials to stimulate savings by residents.  The issue launches an $800 million bond program, given the go-ahead by voters in November 1988, to fund environmental protection and recreation projects.  Another Shearson group had the winning bid for $134.8 million of wastewater system improvement revenue bonds issued by the Trinity River Authority of Texas.  The bonds yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7.25% in 2016.  An unsold balance of $22.2 million remained in late order-taking.  Foreign Bonds  Most foreign government bond prices rose in light trading.  Mark bonds rose about 1/8 point.  The 7% bond due October 1999 rose 0.12 to 100.05 to yield 6.99%, while the 6 3/4% notes due July 1994 rose 0.05 to 97.75 to yield 7.32%.  Britain's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 15/32 to 112 21/32 to yield 9.94%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 1/8 to 98 25/32 to yield 12.78%.  Japan's No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 95.53, up 0.31, to yield 5.355%.  Marsh & McLennan Cos. said it agreed to acquire the rest of Gradmann & Holler, a leading West German insurance brokerage firm in which it has held a 15% stake for 15 years.  The transaction, for cash and stock, would represent the biggest European takeover since 1980 for New York-based Marsh & McLennan, the world's largest insurance broker.  It's also the first major sign of the long-awaited consolidation in the European insurance industry as the European Community Commission moves toward a single market by 1992.  Protective barriers will start coming down within the insurance industry next summer, when big industrial companies will be able to buy insurance from carriers in any other EC country for the first time.  That's why "we have been working hard to develop a single, more unified presence in Europe," said A.J.C. Smith, Marsh & McLennan's president, at a London news conference yesterday.  Analysts speculated that Marsh & McLennan would spend between 250 million marks ($136.4 million) and 350 million marks for the rest of Gradmann & Holler, or roughly 25 to 30 times the private firm's estimated earnings.  "This is paying a big price to maintain their virility as the world's leading insurance broker," said Philip Olsen, an analyst at Kitcat & Aitken, a U.K. brokerage firm.  Earlier this year, New York Life Insurance Co. agreed to acquire Windsor Group Ltd., a first step toward establishing a presence in the European market ahead of 1992.  But most U.S. insurers haven't rushed to change the way they do business in Europe because they believe the European market will still be dominated by a handful of domestic companies.  Under the proposed combination, Marsh & McLennan would gain a majority stake in Gradmann & Holler that would increase over time to the rest of the remaining 85%.  The three managing general partners would receive a "significant" number of Marsh & McLennan shares, said Walther L. Kiep, a partner who would also join Marsh & McLennan's board.  Mr. Kiep said he sought the combination because "all our large clients in Germany are becoming European companies or multinational companies and they expect an insurance broker" to serve them as well in Paris as in Germany.  ---  Beatrice E. Garcia in Philadelphia contributed to this article.  e/  WASHINGTON -- United Technologies Corp. won an $18 million Army contract for helicopter modifications and spare parts.  The company will modify one UH-60A Blackhawk transport helicopter to the prototype MH-60K configuration for use by military special forces.  Ingalls Shipbuilding Inc., a division of Litton Industries Inc., was given a $15.5 million extension on a contract for shipyard services.  Furukawa Electric Co. said it plans to increase production of computer memory devices on a large scale in the U.S. and Japan.  As part of the move, its affiliated U.S. company, International Components Technology Corp., purchased a Mexican plant formerly belonging to KSI Disc Products Inc.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Together with two existing plants in the U.S., Furukawa said it will expand its current local monthly production of memory disks to 1.4 million sheets from 800,000.  In Japan, Furukawa said it will raise production at a plant outside Tokyo to 300,000 sheets monthly from 100,000.  Furukawa said the U.S. market is strengthening as related computer technology gains in sophistication and quality. 